2
NIX'S MATE.
CHAPTER I.
A cold sweet, silvery life, wrapped in round waves.
Leigh Hunt
.
Help me, Cassius, or I sink.
Shak.
Julius Csar
:
Oh, she, that hath a heart of such fine frame,
To pay this debt of love, but to a brother,
How will she love when the rich, golden shaft
Hath killed the flock of all affections else
That live in her.
Shak.
Twelfth Night
:
An
October morning in New England! They
who appreciate the beauties of Nature in the chill air
of Autumn, when the hoar-frost hangs heavily on
the brown grass, and the forest-foliage has assumed
the diversified robe so peculiar to the northern
regions
of the United States; particularly they who
have loitered among the uplands of Massachusetts
and in the vicinity of Boston, have seen the sun rise
from the blue Atlantic, and break the clouds into a
thousand fragments of purple and gold, while his
beams glittered on the ripples of the ocean,and
this on an October morning,have seen a vision of
magnificence and beauty perfectly characteristic of
that glorious country which is already developing the
scheme of broad philanthropy, of which the pilgrim
fathers were the first medium of manifestation.
Alas for Trimontain! but one of its lofty
eminences
remains;those beautiful earth-altars which
our fathers saw from the heights of Charlestown,
when, gazing across the intersecting waters, they
marked a resting-place for the infant Liberty, where
they could rock it in security, and worship their
Creator
after the promptings of their own unfettered
hearts. Beacon-Hill, where in time flamed the
signal-fires
of patriotism, and called together the sturdy
ploughmen of New-England, to pour out their
heart's blood on the consecrated heights that look
down on the sister cities of freedom; where for many
years stood the monument of revolutionary
achievements
,
and caused the young hearts of a rising
generation
to throb with gratitude and pride while they
contemplated the deeds of their fathers,alas! that
venerable hill has fallen before the avarice of man,
and is now covered by rent-yielding palaces, where,
amidst the dance and the song, the banquet and the
wine, live hundreds who never heard of, or at least
who never saw, that sacred eminence, and who have
no sympathy with its ennobling associations.
Such, however, must be the fate of all things
earthly, and, except that the venerable landmarks of
antiquity are the symbols of better things, it matters
little that some of them are uptorn, if indeed this
intimate and inseparable correspondence be not a
conclusive reason against their disturbance.
Such has been the rapid progress of improvement
in time-honored Boston, that a very few years have
brought about astonishing changes in its appearance.
Were it not for the old State House, the common,
and a few other memorials which remain, it would
be difficult for one who had not seen it for the last
forty years to recognize the place he had formerly
visited
.
How changed must it then be from the town of
1688, the point of time to which we are now desirous
of directing the reader's attention!
How vague and erroneous an impression have
most of the pilgrim descendants of the character of
their forefathers! How mistaken an opinion as to
their motives in crossing the world of waters, and
establishing their societies in this hemisphere! Such
has been the influence of crown writers, who were
hired to throw ridicule on the noblest race of men
which it has been the privilege of history to
remember
;
such has been the influence of concentrated
wealth and selfishness, which, time out of mind,
luxuriating
on the fat of the earth, wrung thence by the
poor and needy, have ever opposed that spirit of the
great Revelation, which was the declaration of
universal
independence. As, long afterward, light from
the Reformation advanced, men began to see things
in their true positions, and, like another sun rising at
noon-day, from the midst of the sacred revelation
streamed forth the everlasting truth that the freedom
of Christian worship, civil rights, and equality,
were inseparable. Even the ravings of Muncer
were not without their value; and though that
fanatical
advocate for the equality of man mingled
error in such large disproportion to truth, the
doctrine
in its purity has been gaining ground from that
time to this, and will finally, divested of all alloy, be
received throughout the civilized world.
The first settlers of Boston were, for the most part,
men of thoughtful and industrious habits; many
of them from illustrious families, all of them
respectable. Could it be supposed that such men as
John Winthrop, Sir Richard Saltinstall, and Isaac
Johnson, would seek an asylum in a howling
wilderness
a thousand leagues from all the delights of
civilization
,
from no higher motive than the paltry
privilege of going to meeting, where the trumpery
of external worship was swept away from their sight?
By no means. The non-conformists, who left their
father-land for America, were impelled by a deeper
motive. As the physical order of man could never
have been known but for a temporary disturbance of
2*
the vital functions, so the great idea of human
liberty
could never have been understood but from the
inculcation of its opposite. There must be some
new and sudden encroachment on the rights of man,
before the people can comprehend their true
condition
.
The Hierarchy of England effected this, and
opened to the Independents a view of human
relations
which they had never before contemplated.
Surrounded, as they were, with causes of human
suffering, so deeply ingrained in the body politic as
to make their removal hopeless, and recognizing, as
they did with the vision of seers, the progress and
exaltation of man
in the great future,
they turned
their eyes towards America, and in the sublime spirit
of
Renunciation,
resolved to co-operate with the
Divine Will in establishing universal freedom.
The great principle of action, then, which
stimulated
our fathers in America, was
renunciation of self
.
This was the foundation of their greatness. It was
this that enabled them to see wherein all men are
born free and equal; it was this which made them
love their neighbor as themselves; it was this that
induced them to forego all the allurements of
kindred
and of home, seek out a dwelling-place for
the expansion of Philanthropy and the
consummation
of the greatest good with which mankind were
ever blessed. When our fathers planted their feet
on the soil of America, the voice of God spake
through them in one great prophecy,that here the
true character of man would ultimately be
developed
;
and that, though temptations and trials might
for ages intercept the progress of righteousness, it
would finally be here established in the happiness of
the human family. Civil liberty is the ultimate form
of religious truth. Let us, the children of the pilgrim
fathers, watch and encourage its progress. The
grand struggle, forevermore, will be between
Renunciation
and
Assumption
. The reconciliation
of these opposites will be the solution of the great
problem of social existence. This will be
accomplished
,
not by the poor levelling the rich, but by the
moral elevation of both rich and poor; not by the
principle of agrarianism, but by the spiritual
principle
of
Sympathy,
which must be cherished in
the sanctuary of affliction
. Pride already equalizes
both rich and poor on the bad elevation of selfishness.
A new order of things has now appeared; a new
offspring
has descended from heaven.
The morning-star had faded in the frosty
atmosphere
,
and was now hardly visible above the eastern
horizon, when the tramp of two Bostonians, shod in
the heavy shoes worn in the year 1688, was heard
on the hard-beaten sidewalk of Green's-lane, in that
ancient metropolis, the City of the Three Hills. The
early risers, who were pacing the streets at this
unusual
hour, to the pleasant half-disturbance of sundry
sleepy citizens, who, seeing no reason for bestirring
themselves otherwise, were turning over in their
comfortable beds to take a morning's nap, were an
old patriarchal-looking gentleman and a young
man of eighteen. They were dressed according to
the costume of the time, and alike; except that the
garments of the younger had a more youthful cut,
better adapted to his years. The old man seemed to
be past seventy years of age, and his white locks,
parted
above his forehead, fell in profusion over his
shoulders
in curls. The expression of his countenance was
dignified and serene. His eyes were of dark blue, and
were full of gentleness; and his nose and mouth were
remarkably symmetrical. His neck was adorned with
a white cravat without any collar, the long ends of
the same falling on his bosom. He wore a crimson
velvet waistcoat, and a coat of the same, which were
none the fresher for time; breeches of similar fabric,
and yarn stockings of blue and white mixed; these
terminated with square-toed shoes of heavy make,
fastened with large buckles of Bristol stone. His
whole appearance was that of a very respectable
man, who was enjoying a morning walk in undress.
The younger person presented a striking
appearance
.
He was a little above the middle height, and
was elegantly formed. His limbs were built with
that roundness which is indicative of great strength,
and his step combined firmness with elasticity. His
features were of the Grecian mould, regular and
rather massive; and his light grey eyes beamed with
peculiar intelligence; add to this, dark brown, glossy
hair, which was worn after the manner of his senior,
and the sketch of the young companion may for the
present suffice. He was walking by the side of the
other, and he carried on his left shoulder two
fishing-rods
of jointed cane, and in his right hand a tin
kettle. Each of the two had a fish-basket swung
over his shoulder at the left side; and, thus equipped,
they were wending their way in silence, till the
elder
began to end his meditations, as follows:
The smelts will bite smartly this morning, Horace,
or there is no reliance to be had in a nor'wester.
Let us try Bull's Wharf this time,what say
you?
As you please, Mr. Temple, replied the young
man, his face beaming as he turned to the old
gentlemen
;
there is no better place for fishing about
Boston, than Bull's Wharf, that I know of.
Conversing after that manner, they crossed in the
direction indicated, emerging from a cluster of low,
irregularly-built wooden houses, and coming in full
view of the harbor glittering in the struggling
radiance
of day, the old man took off his hat, the
conical
crown and broad brim of which gave such a
picturesque expression to his figure; and heaving a
sigh, not of sorrow but of gratitude, bent his eyes
upward for a moment, as if in acknowledgment of
the sweet influences of morning: then turning to
his young companion, whose thoughts for the time
seemed equally absorbed in the pure and lovely, he
exclaimed,
I guess you were early at the rope-walk this
morning! Those are fine minnows, truly; ah, ha!
you have some young bass there too! Highty
tighty, man, you have bait enough to catch all the
fish in the harbor!
The young man playfully nodded assent to this
conjecture, and the conversation continued on the
subject of bait and fishing-tackle, till the
pedestrians
found themselves at the foot of the wharf
afterward
so well known as the one where the celebrated
Tea-Party performed their prodigy of patriotism.
The place alluded to stretches out from the eastern
part of the city into the harbor, and just reaches the
channel where at high tide a ship of-the-line may
ride safely at her moorings. It commands one of
the most beautiful prospects imaginable. Across a
two-mile expanse of water, Dorchester Heights,
bosoming
to the skies with luxuriant verdure, was at that
time undisturbed by any habitation of man, save one
small, rude building, where dwelt a fisherman and
his wife, to whom we shall more particularly refer
hereafter. As the eye turns to the left, the harbor
widens, till, at a short distance from Dorchester
Point, Fort Independence, then Castle Island,
presents
itself to the vision; and but a half gunshot
farther
to the left, the now-called Fort Warren frowns
on the scene, while far in the distance, ten miles off,
Boston Light-house shows itself half buried behind
the waters of the outer harbor. Midway between the
city and the light may be seen a stone beacon-mark,
placed there to warn mariners from a sunken ledge
called Nix's Mate, all that now remains of a
beautiful
island, where fruit trees once abounded, and
where singing birds were listened to by the rough
sailor as he glided by on his way from the girl he
left behind him, or on his return to her fond
endearments
.
But we pass now from a more minute
desscription
of this place, and turn to our piscatorial
adventures
.
In the meantime the young man had rigged the
veteran's fishing-tackle, having adjusted the
cork-float
to the silken line, and fixed the gimp snood
with six hooks appended, a minnow quivering on
each. As for his own, he had no chance of arranging
it; for scarcely had the old man's line touched the
water, when the cork was dragged under, and he
drew with a bending rod four large silvery smelts,
glittering, quivering, and flashing in the rays of the
rising sun, and making mist enough for a rainbow in
the spray which they scattered around them.
Here they come, my boy, here they come!
shouted the excited veteran; did you ever see finer
fellows in your life? Fresh baitmy lad, fresh
bait;here, I will take the smelts off;don't give
us that dead fellow,give us a lively onethere
that's your sort; and so saying the old man's eyes
sparkled with delight, and his line was soon in
readiness
and cast again into the water.
In ten seconds more the old sportsman pulled up
three others, measuring from six to nine inches each;
and this he continued to do for some time, hardly
ever hauling in less than two at once,so that the
junior, whose patience was almost exhausted, seemed
likely to have a small chance at participation in the
sport of the morning, till at length the half-sated
gentleman bade him take care of himself, and leave
him a while to bait his own hooks.
You have been very obliging, Horace, said the
old man, and you must overlook my eagerness this
morning; but I never enjoyed fishing so much in
my life. My old fingers are hardly fit for this
business
:
but I can't help being attached to fishingit is
a primitive pursuit, and has a good correspondence.
The young man went to work immediately, and
made the most of the time left for the diversion; but
though he was actively engaged on his own account,
he kept a sharp look-out for the wants of the old
gentleman, and it was a sight that would have made
the hearts of the mother-side anglers dance with
delight
,
when, in rapid succession, and sometimes
simultaneously
,
they broke the blue surface of the Atlantic,
and spangled the atmosphere with five or six smelts
at a haul, till both their baskets in two hours were
full to overflowing.
The sun was now well up, and our sportsmen
were just thinking of leaving, when the younger
cried out in irrepressible ecstasy, Look there! Mr.
Temple, look there! do you see the shad?
Mr. Temple turned in the direction pointed to, at
the corner of the pier where the tide was rapidly
setting in, slightly colored with the effects of a late
storm; when an effect like a flash of lightning through
the water convinced him that the signal had been
well given. The old man's eyes now sparkled
brighter than everOff with the smelt hooks,
he exclaimed, off with them, Horace, and rig the
shad snood as quickly as possible. Let me get a
shad this morning, and hey for breakfast in earnest!
The smelt-hooks were soon disengaged, and their
place supplied by another about four times the size,
with a much longer shaft in proportion fastened to a
piece of strong gimp. To this there was no lead
attached. For bait, he chose one of the largest
minnow
,
exactly resembling the bass or rock, and passing
the hook under the dorsal fin, left the bait at liberty
to swim with the line on the surface of the water.
The old man eagerly cast off as soon as all was
ready. The live bait gently touched the water as
he trolled it backward and forward to tempt the wary
but impetuous victim. Presently a shad shot by
like a thunderboltanotheranother and another,
when suddenly, quicker than thought, one hungry
fellow struck the bait, and the sportsman's winch
sprang like a watchman's rattle. The old man had
3
nothing now to do, but, as the sailors say, to keep his
line taut; for if he had given the furious fish an
opportunity
,
he would have risen, as is his habit, and
shaken the hook out of his mouth, with his head
above the surface of the water. Mr. Temple was,
however, too true a Bostonian to be taken in that
way. He kept his victim steadily in his
feel;
at
times, when it struggled hard, he eased out the line,
but on the least relaxation, he drew it tight again; till,
after full fifteen minutes of intense interest, he brought
the exhausted fish to the surface of the water, and
after drowning it, drew it safely to the shore.
In the excitement of landing the fish, the young
man unfortunately stepped back over the capstan of
the wharf, and was in an instant precipitated into
the water. Being an expert swimmer, the accident
would have been in no way alarming had he not
fallen sideways as he did. The concussion almost
deprived him of his senses, and he sank to the
bottom
,
perfectly unable to help himself. When the
old man saw this, he screamed in an agony of terror.
Not a moment was to be lost;yet what could he
do, old and infirm as he was? Despair, with
presence
of mind, gave new life and energy to his
actions. His
will
to accomplish a beneficent object
enabled him to use the means of effecting it. He
threw himself over the capstan of the wharf, and
holding the fishing-rod between his teeth, he caught
hold of the timbers, and by placing his feet between
the large stones with which the pier had been built,
lowered himself down to the water's edge. He now
passed his left arm behind one of the timbers, and
taking his rod in his right hand, reached it towards
the suffering young man, who had now risen to the
surface of the water. Alas! he had not power thus
far to help himself, and he was about sinking a
second
time, when the generous and disinterested old
man sprang instantly to his assistance.
It now seemed as if the necessity of the occasion
had inspired him with fresh youth and activity;
with newly-derived vigor he dashed the waves
aside, and reached the drowning man in time to save
him. With his left hand he held him by the
shoulder
,
while with the other he helped to keep himself
with his burden above the water.
Save him! save him! cried the benevolent old
man, entirely forgetful of his own perilous situation.
The petition was not in vain. Just then, a sailor,
who had crossed the channel, and was making
rapid
headway, by rowing cross-handed, emerged from
behind a merchant vessel which was moored at the
wharf. The cry of distress met his ear, and he
redoubled
his exertion. At the utmost need of Mr.
Temple, the boat rounded to his assistance. With
one hand the sailor sustained the silver-headed
philanthropist
,
while with herculean strength he drew
the other into the boat. The old man was then
relieved
,
and he bowed himself down, and sent up
audible
thanksgiving to the Almighty for his
providential
deliverance.
Horace Seymour now lay exhausted on the
bottom
of the boat, while Mr. Temple supported his
head on his knees.
Ah me!
thought the latter,
how sudden, how unexpected is misfortune! A
few moments ago we were too happy, my young
friend; and nowwho knows but that you are
dying
!
And the old man shuddered with the cold.
The boat was soon brought to the landing stairs,
and the old man procured a carriage. Public coaches
were then unknown, but the kindness of a
neighboring
friend supplied the deficiency. Placed with
care in the vehicle, and accompanied by himself and
the sailor, under the direction of Mr. Temple the
driver stopped in the court-yard of an elegant house,
which occupied the site of the late Washington
Gardens
.
The family of Wilmer was one of the most
ancient
in the metropolis, though they had lately
emigrated
from England. Mr. Wilmer was a lawyer of
eminence, middle-aged and highly accomplished.
His wife was the youngest daughter of a Scottish
marquis. He had met her in his travels, had woed
and won her, and now brought her over with him to
America. The fruit of this union was an only
daughter; let us introduce the reader to her.
Grace Wilmer, at the time of the unhappy
accident
we have narrated, was enjoying the freshness
of the young October morning in the spacious and
well-ordered garden of the mansion house. She
was seventeen years old, saving two months; and she
was now looking forward to the extraordinary
festivities
of her anniversary natal day, which
happening
on Christmas, enabled her mother to gratify her
daughter's innocent inclination to hilarity, while the
ordinary observances of the occasion were regarded
in course.
Mr. Wilmer was one of the earliest Catholic
settlers
;
but as he did not obtrude his religions tenets on
the people about him, he was thus far inoffensive to the
community in which he resided. Few, indeed, were
aware of his religious bias; his wife and family
regularly
attended the Congregational meetings, and
his occasional levity on those subjects which were of
importance to his neighbors, was regarded with a
charity and forbearance which we are not in the
habit
of attributing to the New England colonists of that
period. The truth is, that, at the time of our
narrative
,
the strict forms of Congregational observances
were a good deal broken in upon by influences which
could not be controlled; and some of the most
liberal
in the church ministry looked into the future
with sad forebodings, and entertained too
well-founded
apprehensions that the purity of their worship
would be soon contaminated, if not destroyed. They
did not, however, cling to any bigoted belief, that
they had already attained to a perfect understanding
3*
of the whole Christian revelation; for they looked
forward
,
in the midst of their temporary despondency,
to times of still greater illumination, when their
posterity
would enjoy a far higher degree of gospel
exaltation than was permitted to their own
understanding
.
Grace's figure was exceedingly fine, yet not more
so than that of some who are descended from her
family
and now adorn the circles of fashion and retired
life in that elegant city. Her neck and shoulders
were perfect models for sculpture, and her head was
as fine as the imagination of a young and enthusiastic
painter dreams of in his reveries of Elysium. Her
features had not that common regularity which is
generally
preferred by statuaries, and which is always
given to the Venuses and to the daughter of Latona;
but there was a harmonious beauty pervading them,
which may in vain be sought for among the marbles
of old Greece. Her forehead was rather too high
for a woman; but its perfect regularity and
whiteness
,
shaded by the brown tresses which partly fell
on each side, and, fastened by a blue ribbon, dropped
luxuriantly over her shoulders, elicited admiration
rather than fault-finding; while her large and
lustrous
blue eyes, with their long, dark shining lashes,
seemed to pierce the very skies, and drink in from
their purest depths the dewy freshness of their
coloring
.
Her nose was not perfectly straight, but it
seemed so, except in profile; and her mouth, which
was faultlessly formed, with the underlip dimpled in
the centre, was in constant action with her eyes; as
if some glad and happy thought, or some humorous
suggestion of her fancy were struggling for
utterance
.
The color came and fled, hovered and
trembled
on her cheeks, like the flashes of light on the
clouds of morning; and her eyes would sometimes
glisten with emotion, till she turned aside to dash the
bright intruder from their lids, if but a flower
chanced
to awaken an association of deeper joy, or the
thoughts of her young imagination were bewildered
with unwonted luxuriance.
The education of Grace had been carefully attended
to. The common branches of English tuition were
familiar to her, and she had acquired enough of the
higher to place her at ease in any company where
accident might throw her. She had a slight
knowledge
of Latin and of Greek,not enough to make
her pedantic, had she been so inclined; but sufficient
to enable her accurately to discriminate in the use
of her mother tongue, and to allow her to get the
sense of such chance passages as she met with in
books. More than this her father did not care for
her to acquire, but her knowledge of the French and
Italian languages was exact and critical.
Such was Grace Wilmer, who was now rambling
through the diversified walks of her father's garden,
where the frosts of a New England autumn had
already
paid many a rude visit, and left the foliage
tinted with those beauties so peculiar to the North
American forests. She had gathered a bunch of
the China-Aster, which she intended for her mother
when they should meet in the breakfast-room; and
she had fastened one, which was now glittering with
sunshine and frost-work over her beautiful forehead
beneath the band that cinctured her curl-clusters,
and she was bounding buoyantly toward the house
with her ribboned locks streaming to the breeze,
and holding out the bundle of flowers to her mother,
whom she had just discovered at the window, when
her attention was arrested by the sound of the
carriage
wheels at this unusual hour in the court-yard.
She immediately retired within the house; but
hardly had she reached the parlor, when the shrieks
of her mother, and the hurried cries of the servants,
brought the most terrible revulsion on her feelings.
Grace flew immediately to the scene of distress,
where she found her exhausted cousin supported by
two men, one of whom, Mr. Temple, she recognized
but regarded not, and her mother fainting in their
presence. Mr. Wilmer had not returned from his
morning walk.
Horace! Horace! sobbed the heart-stricken
girl, how has this happened? my poor, dear
cousin
!
and she threw herself on his neck, and wept
such tears as come scalding from the brain suddenly
overtaken by unlooked-for, overwhelming desolation.
So violent was her anguish, that her grief became
hysterical, while her eyes dropped tears fearfully
fast, and her bosom heaved with the convulsions of a
galvanized subject. She supposed her cousin to be
dead. Such a sudden transition from the free
breathing
of undisturbed delight to the choking
obstructions
of inexpressible suffering, was too much for
Grace Wilmer; and as the paroxysm of passion
subsided
,
she fainted in the arms of those who were
standing by. Horace Seymour was conveyed to his
bed, and medical aid was immediately sent for. He
was copiously bled, and, on his reviving, it was
found that there was a probable chance of his
recovery
.
Amidst the confusion attendant on bringing Horace
Seymour home, no one heeded the stranger to whom
they had been so deeply indebted. At the time Grace
fainted, it was not thought strange that the unknown
mariner received the sinking beauty, for in the
tumult
of the occasion the hand of friendship could
not be regarded as improperly exercised in
ministering
to the common distress; but the kindness and
delicacy of his attentions could not be overlooked.
He chafed her hands and temples, and sprinkled her
forehead with water, till she opened her eyes upon
him; but before consciousness was restored to her,
he had vanished from the company, and was not to
be found. Many hours passed before the afflicted
girl recovered sufficient energy to assist in the cares
of her family, and then what was her surprise to
discover
that a valuable ruby ring had been abstracted
from her finger; a ring which had belonged to
her lordly ancestors, and which her mother had
presented
to her on her last birth-day. She did not dare
to inform her parents of the loss; and she prudently
judged, that if it had been stolen from her, her best
chance of regaining it lay in present secrecy.
Little did she then dream who possessed that lost
treasure: little did she think of him who, in the
first delirium of love, had borne away that memorial
of one whose looks were burnt in upon his very
memory
,
the idolater of Grace Wilmer!
CHAPTER II.
Oh fate of late repentance! always vain;
Thy remedies but lull undying pain.
Where shall my hope find rest?
Savage
.
Misfortune on misfortune! grief on grief.
Addison's
Cato
.
Something hath been amissa noble nature
May catch a wrench.
Shak.
Timon of Athens
.
Some
obscure child of sorrow had just been
consigned
to the tomb in the Chapel burying ground, the
worm-eaten planks placed over it, the rich mould of
the grave-yard heaped thereon, and the brown sod
restored to its accustomed place;the mourners,
the idlers, and the loiterers had one by one retired,
the monotonous sound of the funeral bell still surging
on the memory, when the stranger mariner, starting
from the deep reverie in which he had been bound,
found himself alone among the monuments of the
dead.
The sun was fast receding behind the hills which
half girdle Boston with a crescent of greenery, and
the orange hue of evening, like the deep coloring of
Claude, reflecting back from all opposing objects,
partly gilded and partly veiled them in gloom.
The mariner was sitting on a square monument,
which consisted of a large slab of sandstone
supported
by four columns of the same. He had thrown
his hat on the grass, and bending his body listfully
over, appeared to be meditating deeply on the most
exciting subjects, for his features displayed
extreme
emotion. He seemed to be a young man of
about twenty-five years old, nearly six feet high,
uncommonly
well-made, with broad shoulders and
a slender waist. His head was one of those which
immediately attract attention; being finely developed
in every part, though rather too small for perfect
symmetry. The affective organs were moreover rather
larger than the intellectual; so that, judging from
the exterior, one would readily suppose that he were
better calculated for action than for speculation. His
features were perfectly regular; his eyes light blue,
and large; his nose was straight; his lips were like
those we see in the Napoleon of David, with a chin
and neck full and massive. His hair was rather light
and curling, and his complexion was browned as if
by constant exposure to the weather. He was
dressed
in loose pantaloons of blue cloth, with a short
jacket of the same, snugly fitting the body; a check
shirt with the collar turned down, was circled
at the neck by a black silk kerchief, which fell from
a slip-knot on his bosom. His feet were clad in
white stockings and thin shoes.
Edward Fitzvassal, for such was the name of the
person we have now described, was the natural son
of one of the proudest men that ever lived within
the shadows of the three hills. Possessed of
immense
wealth, that father, who appropriated large
sums to the gratification of his sensual appetites, had
lived in the hall of his ancestors in England
surrounded
by every luxury, grinding the poor till
sufferance
ceased to be a virtue with them, till at last he
was driven by their hatred to seek a shelter in
America
.
He had buried his wife soon after he arrived,
and her monument was now before the eyes of
Fitzvassal
.
She had never injured him, indeed he had
never seen her; for, long before he was a conscious
child of suffering, that woman had sunk under the
repeated injuries of her husband, and lay
slumbering
in the church-yard. He had been
acknowledged
by his father only through the desperate and
unceasing
importunity of the most abject misery which
the satiety of sensuality had cast on a lonely woman.
In consequence of this importunity, Vassal
acknowledged
his son, and bribed a young man to marry
the mother; a fellow who had followed the seas in
several distant voyages, and who, being tired of a
wandering life, was easily induced to take upon
himself such a beautiful incumbrance as Ellen
Wilby
4
and her boy, backed as the burthen was with the
gift of a small fishing schooner and a frame-house,
already referred to, situated between Dorchester
Heights and the Point, large enough to
accommodate
a small family.
Ellen yielded to this necessity with meek
submission
.
Though she was nothing but a humble
serving-maid, she had been deceived by the
ardor
of too confiding affection. Often had she
entreated her seducer to leave her in pity of her
helplessness before the seal of her ruin were
accomplished
;
for her heart's weakness spake to her in
terrible
admonitions, while she dreaded the fascination
of her charmer; and now, when the harsh reality
burst upon her that she was an outcast in the world,
and that the man on whom she had lavished her
very heart's blood in her excess of womanly
devotion
,
would not even look on her with kindness;
when she was on the point of being consigned to the
poor-house as a mendicant, and of having her infant
torn from her arms as the child of no one, to be
subjected
to the tender mercies of a cold and calculating
charity; then it was that, in the desperation of her
agony, she flew to the house of her seducer, and
through untiring importunities extorted from him
protection for her child.
It was not for herself that she cared. She was
willing to undergo any privation in which the
pledge of that false affection might not participate;
but she loved it even more than if it had been the
fruit of lawful affection; for the natural principle
developed
itself in its fulness, as it was warmed by the
strange fire that consumed her; and though it was
not the fire of heaven, the ministers of mercy
tempered
it to her endurance, and mingled joy even in
the excess of her anguish. Though she married
Abner Classon with reluctance, she endeavored to
conceal her unwillingness, and make amends for her
simulated love, by performing the duties of a wife
with apparent cheerfulness.
Poor wretch! how many thousands have the false
arrangements of society wedded to similar suffering!
How many anguish and pine in rayless misery, with
the light of their eyes fading, and the bloom of their
cheeks turning pale; whose lives are one
undisturbed
current of hypocrisy, and who array the dead
body of their hopes in the garniture of smiles!
Abner Classon was a rude sailor, wholly destitute
of any refinement. He had been, in his younger
days, eagerly sought after by the vulgar, idle, and
dissipated of Boston, as he was ever ready for a
frolic, could out-drink any competitor, would stand
by his friends in a row, and was gifted with a sort
of dry humor, which discovered itself rather in his
manner of saying things than in any intrinsic
excellence
of their own. He was seldom at home, as,
every other day, he ran down the outer harbor,
coasting
along Nahant and the neighboring fishing
grounds for cod and haddock, which he carried to
Oliver's Dock, and sold at the market value. The
proceeds he would now and then carry with him
home; but generally he found ways of spending it
at sailors' boarding-houses, where he was glad to
meet any revellers he could find, and always
willing
to pay the whole bill himself.
Such was the step-father of Edward Fitzvassal,
and under such influences was he brought up from
his childhood; for, though his mother exerted
herself
in every way to lead him in the right path, and
imparted to him the rudiments of a simple education,
the same she had herself with great difficulty
acquired
;
yet the brutality of Classon dragged him down
faster than he could rise from the disadvantages of his
situation, while the example of habitual drunkenness
threw its pestilential influence on his path.
Edward Fitzvassal grew up under such protection
to manifest forms of character almost entirely
dependent
on the circumstances by which he was
surrounded. At an early age he showed a haughty,
overbearing, and indomitable temper. In the first
flush of generous youth, when under more genial
auspices, his heart would have become attuned to all
that is lovely and admirable in nature, in art, or in
their hidden spiritual causes,he learned to realize
the false and cruel relation which he and his mother
held to the world in which they lived. Before he was
fifteen years old he had drunk deeply from the bitter
fountain of contumely, and been spurned from his
unfeeling parent's threshold in heartless disdain. He
learned to know that the consequences of another's
fault may descend to an innocent sufferer; he
learned
to realize the hard condition of a poor man, by
becoming conversant with the
apparent
happiness
of the rich; in short, he learned to compare the
outward
forms of good with the inward forms of those
evils which spring from discontent and penury; and
the flames of torturing unrest began to parch his
bosom.
How could it have been otherwise? Who was
there to open for him the deep recesses of his nature,
lacerated and bleeding by the thorns of pride and
all nameless irritation, and pour the balm of human
sympathy into his bosom? Who was there that,
having been tried as the silver is tried in the furnace,
in the nine times heated fire of adversity; that had
passed through privations, and been smitten down by
the iron mace of human agony, for temptations too
readily yielded to; that had been bowed down in
undissembling humility at the inmost shrine of
sorrow's
sanctuary, to afford a brother's consolation in
his afflictions, a guide in his labyrinth of woe?
But it was provided, as the best possible path for
Edward Fitzvassal, that he should strike into the
thick entangled forest of human life, and be his own
pioneer through the wild. Nor was he left wholly
desolate. He felt that he had courage and hope; he
4*
knew that at times his heart was visited by an
unaccountable
glow of consolation and promise,and,
though he attributed all this to his own inborn
energies
and unconquerable pride, and so mistook
another's
bounty for his own resources, he rose
sufficiently
above the influences of his condition to
assume
the semblance of endurance. Deeply was he
indebted to the gentle offices of his mother, a woman
who had learned to know and realize the immortal
from the abyss of degradation to which she had fallen.
The truths which are said to lie in the bottom of
a well are the stars that correspond with societies of
angels, and when the parched earth has drunk the
last drop of moisture which rolled there in delicious
coolness, the pilgrim, who has mainly sought to
quench his thirst at the fountain, may turn to their
realitics in heaven.
Fitzvassal had been thinking over the darker
passages
of his life as the funeral train left him to his
solitary reflections; and as he turned to gaze on the
aristocratical mockery carved on the tomb of his
father's consort, curses deep and bitter heaved from
his lungs, while he ground his teeth and snapped his
finger joints after the restless and agitated manner of
those who would but cannot fly from the horror
with which evil surrounds them.
There is a sun that shines on the inward man,
like that which brings the day-beam to the horizon;
and the dulness that gathers over us at times, is
because
we have suffered the invisible attendants of the
spirit to intercept its rays, and envelope the better
part of our nature in shadow. In vain will the
natural
sun culminate in the heavens and scatter its
brightness around us, if the spiritual sun is clouded
by our passions. There will then be no brightness
for us; no beauty will break over the face of nature;
the melody of birds will be discordant jargoning, and
the verdure of the trees like a melancholy funeral pall.
My father! groaned Fitzvassalin what has
he been a father to me? He has given me life, and
he has my bitterest curses for it.
He then remembered, that the last time he visited
his parent, he had been spurned like a dog over his
threshold: and never did demon-father receive from
his accursed progeny heartier maledictions than
those which boiled up from the hell that was flaming
in this miserable sufferer.
With unutterable anathemas, Fitzvassal sprang
from the monument, and casting his fiery eyes on the
gloom around him, hurried to the fence of the
churchyard
,
and bounded over it into the street.
Immediately
opposite stood, on a part of the most
elevated ground of the metropolis, the splendid house
where his unnatural father resided. The mansion was
built with considerable architectural style, and had
been once occupied by a colonial governor. It had
several gable ends, a manner of building common in
those days; and its exterior was rough-cast with broken
glass. Before it a succession of glaces, like steps,
well grown with grass and interlaid with
ornamental
gardening, reached almost to the street, now called
Tremont. Fitzvassal turned his eyes from it in
disgust, and went his way in sorrow.
The shadows of evening had now gathered deeply
over the town, and the heart of the wanderer, as he
pursued his solitary walk from Boston, beat
violently
with conflicting emotions. His thoughts struggled
between two opposites,hatred for his father and
love for his mother. How could he help loving one,
who, in giving him birth, hateful though it was to
him, had sacrificed every thing her heart held dear,
one who had since lived only for him; who had
wedded herself to a man she loathed, that he, her
only child, might be kept from the cold charities of
the world. True, she had sacrificed every thing in
vain,for the pittance which she expected from her
husband was generally denied her, and she was often
driven abroad amidst the inclemency of winter,
unknown
to her brutal, uncongenial partner, to beg for
that support which his beastly necessities denied her.
Though her child never knew of this as he grew up
to energetic youth, he
did
know more, much more
than his hardihood of mind dared to ponder on; and
amidst all the conflicts that environed him, and all
the despondency that hung its dark drapery over his
life, he tried to cherish the hope that by some means,
fair or foul, he would one day be enabled to make his
mother independent of the world, and his father beg
for mercy at his feet. Though his stepfather had
stood in the way of all his determinations, it could
not be hidden from the son that every thing the
abandoned man could convert into money went
immediately
for brandy; and in one hour of domestic agony
more terrible than others, he resolved to make a
desperate
effort to relieve the distresses of his mother,
and break the bondage that enslaved her.
Fortunately for Fitzvassal, an opportunity at the
time seemed to present itself, of furthering his
purpose
.
There lived at that day one of the most
enterprising
men New England ever saw; one who
was designed to work an important part in her
history
.
William Phips was born February 2d, 1650,
in an obscure village on the Kennebeck. His father
followed the occupation of a gunsmith, and William,
afterwards Sir William, was the youngest of a large
family. Reader, says the venerable Mather,
inquire
no further who was his father? Thou shalt
anon see, as the Italians express it, a son to his own
labors.
From his earliest years young Phips discovered
to those who knew him intimately, uncommon
abilities
and an adventurous disposition. With such a
spirit, unwilling to be confined at home, where there
was little else to engage his active mind but Indian
skirmishes and petty border quarrels, he left his father's
house, and shipped on board a merchant vessel which
traded to the West Indies. Ever active and obedient,
it was not long before Phips became master of a
vessel
,
and he continued for a long term to follow the
old trade to the West Indies. Many years before, a
Spanish galleon, laden with immense wealth, had
been wrecked on the coast of Hispaniola. Great as
the loss was, the circumstance had long been
forgotten
,
and was never referred to but as a nautical
legend
,
which sailors spun into long yarns with a
mixture of improbable fiction and ghostly
circumstance
.
The fact that this treasure still lay,not many fathoms
deep, near Port de la Plata, did not escape the
vigilant
mind of Captain Phips; and for several years he
endeavored to collect, as warily as possible, all the
information that tradition could afford him on the
subject. At last, during one of his voyages he fell
in with an old Spaniard, who, taking a sailor liking
to Captain Phips, communicated to him certain
information
,
in a shape more rational and tangible than
any which he had before collected: the exact spot
was pointed out on the chart where it was pretended
the treasure lay, and every assurance given that
there could be no error in the information.
This intelligence, confirming parts of the
disjointed
narratives, which the vigilant captain had
collected
,
and suggesting a reasonable probability that the
treasure might be recovered, induced Captain Phips
to make proposals to several wealthy individuals of
Boston, and among the rest, to Edmund Vassal, for
fitting out an expedition for the recovery of the prize:
but it was Captain Phips's fortune to meet with
discouragement
in every direction. The men of money
laughed at the proposed enterprise as only worthy
of a madman, and at the very idea of such an
expenditure
,
curtailed their current expenses, and began
to feel poor. But Captain Phips was made of sterner
stuff than even his best well-wishers imagined. He
determined at once to go to England, and lay the plan
of the enterprise before King Charles II. He knew
that that monarch would do any thing for money,
but, in so judging, he did not take into consideration
that he was to be called on for an outlay.
In the meanwhile the affair was talked of with
great freedom, and among the twelve thousand
inhabitants
of Boston, there were not a dozen who did
not regard the proposal with contempt. It seemed
to them about as rational a project as the more
modern
one to sail into the interior of the earth, and,
like every thing novel, it was hunted down forthwith.
The idea of such a possibility as the one proposed in
the scheme of Captain Phips, was enough to inflame
the imagination of a poverty stricken, woe-fraught,
half-crushed and despised piece of mortality like
poor Fitzvassal; and on hearing of the project, his
resolution
was formed in an instant. Decision and
resolution are qualities of no common temperament,
and these this young man, who was then already
eighteen years old, possessed in an eminent degree.
He shipped on board Captain Phips's vessel, and was
made second officer before he reached England. The
captain soon discovered that he had been in reality a
sailor all his life, which was so far true, that
Fitzvassal
had been almost every day on the water, and
from the familiarity which he had necessarily
formed
with marine affairs, had become acquainted with
the practical details of navigation.
King Charles II. at first entertained the proposed
expedition with considerable favor, but he was soon
induced by his court favorites to reject it. They
could not spare their money, ill-gotten as it was, yet
so essential to their debaucheries and infamous
pleasures
,
even with the fair contingency of increasing it
an hundred fold; so that Captain Phips was
compelled
to turn for assistance in another direction. At
length the Duke of Albermarle, son of the celebrated
General Monk, who was principally instrumental in
the restoration of England's monarchy, was induced
to regard the scheme with favor. He accordingly
invested sufficient money to fit out an armed
schooner
,
which, under the guidance of Captain Phips,
sailed
on the destined adventure.
The expedition was successful. Captain Phips
recovered wealth from the bosom of the deep
equivalent
to a million and a half of dollars, and with this
rich reward for his labors he returned to England,
and laid the treasure before his generous patron, the
Duke of Albermarle. At first it was proposed in the
king's council to seize the whole amount, on the
villainous
allegation that the enterprize had not been
clearly enough explained to the king; but the latter,
with becoming magnanimity, refused to touch a
shilling, declaring that the representation had been
satisfactory, and that the plan would have been
adopted by himself but for the advice of those very
councillors who would now deprive the lawful
owners
of their property.
Instead of robbing Phips and Albermarle of their
goods, the king conferred the honor of knighthood
on the enterprising captain; and Sir William Phips
was allowed a sum for his part in the fortunate
undertaking
equal to one hundred thousand dollars, a
princely fortune if we consider the relative value of
money a hundred and fifty years ago.
While the duke's vessel lay off Port de la Plata,
and the hands were busily engaged in stowing away
the rusty masses of double-joes, and the ponderous
bars of bullion, which the Indian divers had
recovered
from the deep, Captain Phips found it necessary
to promise the men an ample, extraordinary
compensation
for their labor, in order to keep down a spirit
of insubordination, which seemed to be breaking out
among them. They did not relish the idea of
contributing
in that way to the heaping of wealth on
wealth where there was already an undue
proportion
,
and an opportunity for providing for future
5
wants, seemed then to present itself, which would
not be likely to happen again.
It was through the influence of Fitzvassal that
the men were kept in order; for he whispered among
them that, as an immense amount of money must
necessarily be left after the schooner were laden, it
would be an easy thing to help themselves in case
another voyage were attempted, as it assuredly
would be, and satisfaction were not afforded them
according to the captain's promise. But we must not
anticipate the development of events connected with
another part of our narrative.
At the time we are now noting, Fitzvassal had
been but two days returned from his voyages.
Immediately
on his arrival he hastened to the humble
abode of his mother, and to his astonishment, found
the house locked up and deserted. There was no
indication that it had been occupied for years. In
a state of deep perturbation, he ran to the
landing-place
by the water-side, and to his great joy found
a boat, which had been fastened there but a short
time before by a fisherman, who had landed to
dig clams on the beach. He sprang into it and
pushed for the town, without knowing where to
look; but in the desperate determination to leave no
search unattempted in the hope of discovering his
mother; for there was that on his mind which
seemed
to assure him that his parent was not dead, but was
longing for his presence as the hart panteth after
the water-brooks.
It is important for us now to retrace our steps one
day, which we shall attempt in the following
chapter
.
CHAPTER III.
I told you so, Sir, they were red-hot with drinking;
So full of valor, that they smote the air
For breathing in their faces.
Shak.
The Tempest
.
A bold, bad man.
Dana
.
After
Fitzvassal had retired from the
mansion-house
of the Wilmers, he hurried rapidly toward the
northern precincts of the town, with his mind more
distracted than ever. For the first time in his life he
realized the truth that man is not intended to live
principally for himself, but for others; and the very
radiance of this revelation, disconnected from any
thing else, gave him a thrill of mixed emotion which
he had never before known. He felt, and the
recognition
of the feeling surprised him, that there are
ties which bind us to one another, stronger than the
chains of avarice and sensuality; and he perceived
the law of our being, half developed only, in his
bosom as incontrollably imperious. Need it be said,
that for the first time in his life he
loved?
Such
was, indeed, the case; nor was it remarkable that he
whose life had been one scene of tortured pride,
restraint
,
and poverty, and in its best phase one of hard
and unremitting servitude; that he who had never
been thrown, even by accident, in the path of a
female
of purity and refinement, other than that
of his forlorn and heart-sick mother; and had had
no opportunity, therefore, of calling forth those
sentiments
which lie buried in darker natures than his,
and are always susceptible of being vivified by the
sweet influences of woman, should have felt in his
situation as did Fitzvassal when he found the
flood-gates
of his pent feelings suddenly opened, and the
iron of his stern nature melted.
He had sustained in his arms the most beautiful
girl imagination had ever presented to the vision of
a poet; he had seen the roses fade away on her
cheeks, and her angelic face assume the habiliment
of death; he had chafed her temples, ah, how
delicate
!
till the own hue of loveliness came back to its
alabaster rest;he had watched the long, dark lashes
as they pressed upon her cheek, and he had seen the
bright revelation when they were lifted like the
curtains
of heaven; he had
felt
a sigh from that bosom
whose beauty was not to tell, but to be the dream of her
worshipper. He fancied that those eyes looked on
him with gratitude and interest, and he fed his
5*
thoughts with this luxurious delusion, till he peopled
his own created heaven with the progeny of hope.
With what rapture did he press to his lips that ring
which had encircled her graceful finger! Why had
he robbed her of that rich treasure? Nay rather,
why had she robbed him of his heart of hearts, and
given
him no equivalent? At that moment he
resolved
to restore the ring, and to peril every thing
for the merchandise of her affection.
Fitzvassal now wandered toward Winnissimmit
Ferry, with his mind principally occupied with the
events of the morning, when he came to a small
tavern
with a sign of a sea-gull on the wing, and the
name underneath,
A. Classon,
painted in badly
executed
characters.
His astonishment may easily be conceived when
he made this singular discovery. Instead of
entering
the house, he made the best of his way from it;
and coming to a lumber-yard in the vicinity, strolled
therein, and gave loose to his thick-coming fancies.
The name on the tavern sign he was confident was
his stepfather's,there was no other person of his
name in Boston or in its neighborhood, he was
certain
;
and he could not doubt for a moment that it
was in reality the same.
But why, if this, indeed, were his abode, had he
deserted his house in Dorchester, and relinquished the
occupation he had so successfully followed for years?
Could it be that his mother was dead?
As if at this thought, the heart of Fitzvassal,
which had suddenly been humanized by the
transcendant
influence of Grace Wilmer, melted; and the
sturdy mariner bowed his head in secret, half
suffocated
with vainly suppressed emotion. Had he
entered
the portal of the sanctuary, and bowed down
in the belief that his mother was no more; or were
his emotions of a blended texture, interwoven with
which the idea of an adored woman was most
prominent
?
It would have been a hard task for an
ordinary
pschycologist to analyse his feelings. It was
not the first time the man had ever wept; but never
before had he wept in such a cause, and never before
was he not ashamed of his emotions. He had within a
few hours found his parental hearth deserted, and
the very weeds growing on the door-stone; he had,
as he had reason to believe, saved the lives of two
human beings, one of them the cousin of the
loveliest
creation of heaven; and he now reviewed the
event with delight, associated as it was with
sensations
so entirely new and delicious. In the almost
hopeless search for his mother he had found her
worthless husband; and a thousand suspicions arose
at once to affect his feelings of filial reverence and
give agitation to his passions.
In some degree relieved by the crisis which had
passed, Fitzvassal retraced his steps toward the
Sea-Gull
,
which, on narrowly examining, he discovered to
be a common sailor boarding-house. His long
absence
from his maternal roof, he was well aware,
must have disguised him effectually; he therefore
entered
without any apprehension of discovery, it being
his desire to remain unknown for the purpose of
eliciting the whole truth about his mother in case she
were alive.
The Sea-Gull was one of those remarkable
specimens
of architecture, hardly an individual of which
now remains in this country It looked like a cluster
of houses fantastically grouped together, each
successive
story projecting over that below it,the
whole terminating above by half a dozen gable-ends.
The walls were rough cast with small fragments of
glass, and over the front door were carved the figures
M.D.CXL, showing that the edifice had been erected
nearly fifty years already. The doorway was closed
by a sort of shutter divided into four parts, and after
ascending one step, it was necessary for the visitor
to descend two more. As Fitzvassal came up, a
sailor, who was leaning over the lower section of the
door, enjoying a Dutch pipe of tobacco, gave way
for him to enter, and he immediately found himself
in the bar-room of a tavern.
The apartment was only sufficiently lofty to
accommodate
a tall man without stooping. On one
side was a large fireplace occupied by two sailors,
who were sitting opposite each other between the
jambs, on blocks of wood, regaling themselves with
the fumes of tobacco and blistering their legs before
a roaring fire of oak wood, under the coals of which
were half a dozen long iron bars terminating with a
one pound ball, appropriately denominated
logger-heads
,
the use of which formidable instruments, a
little varied in shape till they have degenerated to a
sort of poker, has descended from father to son in a
succession of generations for the perpetuation of
mulled wine and flip, and for the due exhilaration
of New England sleighing parties.
On the hearth, a half-gallon pewter vessel was
very deliberately evolving the motive power of
modern
boat and rail-road engines, little suspecting its
own importance, which, however, was partially
acknowledged
by the thirsty tars, who occasionally
interrupted
its solitary musings by transferring the
fumes to their own brains.
Within the bar, our new comer, without much
difficulty, recognized his step-father. He was
engaged
in the very laudable occupation of mixing
rum-bitters
for two wicked-looking truckmen, who had
just come in, and who now stood leaning in their
dirty frocks on the still more dirty counter of the bar.
One of them, as he rested on his left elbow, amused
himself by trying to hit with his whip-lash the head
of a nail which projected its shining head above the
sanded floor, and in doing this he recklessly scattered
the gritty particles too near the steaming flip, for the
satisfaction of the sons of Neptune.
Mind your eye there, you fresh-beef-eating
land-lubber
,
and luff awayyou're sanding our ca'boose,
d'ye hear! Shouted one of the sailors, who was
distinguished
by the enormous size of his black beard
and whiskers, and by the massive proportions of his
queue, or, shiver my timbers, he continued, if I
don't carry away some of your dirty canvass, and
be hanged to you.
I tell you what it is, bully slush-bucket, replied
he of the whip, taking his bitters from the landlord
and tossing it off at a single gulp, while he eyed the
sailor with a shake of the head in regular cadence
with his words, I'll tell you what it is, bully
slush-bucket
,
if ye drive that are team this ere way, ye'd
better not turn down our worf, if ye know what's
good for ye, no how.
The only rejoinder which the sailor condescended
to make to this reply, was by instantly springing on
his feet, and dashing his tarpaulin on the floor as his;
glove of defiance. The truckman immediately
made towards him, as if to anticipate his attack; but
the other, with inconceivable rapidity, threw his feet
into the air, and striking both of them at once with
the entire weight of his body, full on the truckman's
stomach, hurled him against the door, which, giving
way with the momentum, sent the fellow headlong
into the street.
The sailor would have followed the man had it
not been for the other truckman, who hit the former
such a blow behind the ear, that he was
immediately
knocked down and disabled. All was now
confusion
,
and a general fight seemed to be inevitable.
The truckman having come to from the effects of
the blow and fall, had gathered together several
others
of his white-frocked brotherhood, who seemed
determined to have an out-and-out row, and revenge
the disgrace that had been cast on their fraternity.
Accordingly, they marched up to the house, and
were about to commence a bombardment, when
Fitzvassal, turning aside the others with such
singular
force and authority as at once commanded their
acquiescence, placed himself alone at the door-way.
Get out of the way, exclaimed the fellow who had
floored the sailor, or I will make you swallow just
such a dose of jalap as I gave that other sick monkey
yonder; clear out, I say!
So saying, he endeavored to thrust Fitzvassal
aside, and failing to do that, made a pass at him for
a black eye; when the latter, seizing him by the
collar
with his right hand, and suddenly grasping his
right leg with the other, lifted him up with as much
ease as an ordinary man would raise a child, and
hurled him over the heads of the others far into the
street.
Such an exhibition of muscular power elicited an
involuntary shout from the by-standers,the
truckmen
fell back astonished, and unwilling to enter the
lists with such an opponent, while those within the
Sea-Gull sent up a yell of wonder and delight. At
that moment, Classon, who understood human
nature
as well as most men, came forward when he
thought mediation could be best effected, and
exclaimed
to the crowd that had meanwhile gathered
round his door;
Hallo, my hearties, where's the use of all this
squabbling? One would think that old Admiral
Tromp had raised his broomstick, and opened his
Dutch metal among us. Haul in your guns and
belay
.
You've each on you lost a man; and now, suppose
you parley. You'll have the selectmen arter you as
sure as codhook, if you don't stop. Who's for flip
and a quiet life? Come in all hands of you, the
Sea-Gull
will treat the company;who speaks for flip
gratis?
This agreeable challenge was answered by a
salute
from the crowd half whistle and half groan
for Classon was very unpopular, and the people did
not much care to be indebted to his hospitality who
was such a favorite of the odious governor's;
however
,
omnipotent rum carried the day, and, after
looking
at each other, as if to say If you will,
I
will,
they turned into the grogery.
Beer and rum are pacificators as well as
quarrelbreeders
,
and a hair of the same dog is often found
to contain much practical philosophy. Though we
might say a word for the principles of hompathy,
which the sagacious Classon practised in allaying
the popular fever, the less said about infinitesimal
doses the better.
Classon now brought out all his stone and pewter
pitchers, and filling them with the proportionate
quantities of rum, beer, and sugar, made a requisition
on the scorching fire-place for the red-hot logger
heads which were buried there like ostriches in the
hot sands of the desert. And now the sizzling of
the iron, the steaming of the flip, and the gabbling of
tongues made an uproar to which there is fortunately
nothing in the nature of things for a simile; while
the quantity of fire-water that Classon sacrificed as
a libation to the
vox populi
would have paid the
rent of his house for a month. But he was not so
low in the estimation of the powers that were, as not
to have a reason for what he did; and he consoled
himself, moreover, with the reflection, that he had
perhaps saved his house from being pulled about
his ears, and had given some fifty Bostonians a taste
of his flip; which circumstance might, in the course
of human events, serve as a sheet anchor for the
coming winter, and help to reinstate him in the fair
opinion of the people. Nor did he much misjudge;
for more trivial occurrences sometimes conspire to
give a reputation to as humble an establishment as
Abner Classon's, and to turn the tide of public odium
which beats against a man's affairs, into a current
which shall set in every way for his advantage.
The peace-offering having been accepted, the
parties
6
roared their hour away, and then departed with
glistening eyes, red noses, and heated brains, to
diversify
the different scenes of life, in which their
daily business now called them to take a part.
While the treat was going on in the bar-room
of the Sea-Gull, Fitzvassal had an opportunity of
observing
his step-father, who, though much changed
from what he had been a few years before, retained
all those distinctive characteristics which constituted
his individuality. He was a man about five feet six
inches in height, who stooped a good deal about the
shoulders, probably from the constant habit of
rowing
;
certainly in part, from his dissipated course of
life. His forehead was very low, narrow, and square,
over which his reddish, curling hair pressed in
matted
tangles. His cheek-bones were high, his mouth
large and bent down at the corners; his nose, which
had been tolerably regular, was misshapen and
sunken
in at the bridge, from a diseased cartilage; his
eyes of a greenish brown, small and near together;
and his complexion very red and sunburnt. His
skull, from the occipital to the frontal bone, was
scooped out in a hollow, and it was far more largely
developed behind the ear than in the region of the
intellect.
Fitzvassal had been observing this man, his
mother's
husband, with amazement. He had met with
all sorts of men abroad in the countries he had
visited
;
he had seen drunkards of every description;
but such another as his own step-father had never
crossed his path. The quantity of liquor which he
had swallowed within the last two hours was
incredible
;
and though the occasion was extraordinary, it
showed plainly enough that the man was in the
habit of indulging to a most insane excess in the
maddening contents of the decanter.
Classon's evil passions had always overswayed his
better nature. Had the alternative of a virtuous or
a vicious course of life been presented to him in the
pliant and ductile years of childhood, there can be
little question that the tranquil delights of the former
would have been preferred by him. Bad as he was,
profligate and reckless as he might now be, there was
a visible spark of goodness glittering in the dark
recesses
of his rocky, antral bosom, which might
have been even then kindled into a sacred monitor.
Who cares for Abner Classon? was his daily
ejaculation; and the dark spirit within him
whispered
,
Why, then, should Abner Classon care for any
human being? Thus it is that the vilest of the
iniquitous
yearn for human sympathy; and it is only
for want of this divine principle properly directed,
that so many follow up one bad step, by precipitating
themselves into the direst and most hopeless gulph
of degradation. Classon, from a long course of
vicious indulgence, had so completely broken down
the will,
that the most acute sufferings which
sometimes
followed his delirious debauches, had no other
effect on his mind than to prompt him to resolutions
which he had not power to keep. On an occasion
like the one which had just happened, he would
follow
up his potations to such an extent, that he could
not contain the dearest secret of his heart; and all
the while he was conscious of his infirmity, he
would go on pouring out the very matters it was
most important for him to keep to himself.
As Classon's temporary guests retired, the sailors
who had been seated within the fire-place, resumed
their blocks, and being a good deal excited by the
stimulant they had so liberally indulged in, began to
sing fragments of love-ballads, while the other
roared
out with that hysterical laughter which belongs
to the peculiar kind of insanity produced by
excessive
intoxication. While they were in this mood,
the man with the big whiskers, who had been so
prominent in the row, casting his blood-injected eyes
on Fitzvassal, who was endeavoring to decypher the
inscription on an old worn-out engraving that hung
in a black frame over the mantle-piece, cried out to
him as follows:
Throw us your hawser, Jack, and come to
anchor
alongside, will youI like the cut of your jib,
if I don't blow me!
Ay, ay, answered Fitzvassal, who thought the
opportunity a favorable one to pursue his
investigations
,
as Classon had now retired to replenish his
decanters, I like a snug harbor after a hard blow,
as well as any man that ever slung a jack-knife to
his button-hole.
So saying, he placed an additional block within
the jambs, and seated himself without further
ceremony
beside his jovial companion.
The rough sailor who invited Fitzvassal to the
merry junketing, touched his tarpanlin as the latter
placed himself alongside, evidently perceiving that
he had some time since graduated at the forecastle.
I thought as how, resumed the sailor with an air
of blunt deference, by the way in which you heaved
that rotten spar overboard, you might be one of his
majesty's man-o'-war's-men;but you'll excuse an
old sea-dog for any blunder o' the like, seeing as how
d'ye see, flip's good and man's dry: p'rhaps you've
no objection to trying a pull at the same windlass?
At the same time he gave a hitch at his waistband,
and with the other hand passed the beverage to
Fitzvassal
:
the latter, however, only pretended to taste
it; so, smacking his lips as a prelude to his praises,
he returned the jug to the sailor, and said:
Why, this is something like: your landlord is
an old hand at the oar, I see; one would think he
he had been the king's chaplain by the way in which
he mixes.
Ah, I see, you knows a thing or two of the secret
service;maybe you never was a man-o'-war's-man,
replied the sailor, cutting his eye over the way at
his fellow voyager,never mindall I can say is,
6*
if you knew the chaplain of the Rose frigate, you'd
see a mixer in right earnest. You've no objection I
see, continued the man in whiskers, to a drop of the
creature when ashore; nor I neither, as for that are
matter. They keep a fellow infernal short of grog
though on board these ere frigates.
And having uttered the foregoing with some
vehemence
,
he added to his other creature comforts a
huge piece of pig-tail, which he twisted off with his
grinders.
Ah? exclaimed Fitzvassal in a tone of inquiry,
then you are hands of that goverment ship lying
off there in the channel?
Ay, ay, Sir! responded both the sailors,
simultaneously
.
And she's as nice a sea-boat, Bill Grummet, as
ever
you
sailed in,
I
know,isn't she? inquired
the other man of him in the big whiskers, while he
rested his elbows on his knees and his cheeks on his
hands, his bright eyes glistening in the hollows.
For that are, answered Grummet, taking a long
intermittent pull at the flip, and wiping his mouth
with his sleeve preparatory to the resumption of
the quid which he had hauled out of his mouth for
the occasionfor that are matter, I can't say but
as how she's trig enough, and clean in the run too,
and one of the best sailers in the service.The king
has reason to like her, any how.
The king! exclaimed Fitzvassalwhat special
reason has he to prefer your vessel to any other?
I thought everybody had heard of his voyage a
few years ago, to Scotland, and how he was
shipwrecked
and all thatsaid whiskers.
Certainly, replied Fitzvassal, every body has
heard of that accident; but I don't yet understand
what your Rose frigate had to do with it.
Then I can tell you all about it, and maybe a
little more than any body that you know of has
heared yet. His royal highness that then was, the
Duke of York, d'ye see, took it into his royal head, a
few years ago, to make a voyage to Scotland. So
what must the Admiralty do, but equip the Grampus
frigate. I was in the forecastle of that are crank old
hulk,devil take the Friday in which she was
lunched
,
I
say;but that is neither here nor there, for as I
was saying, the Duke got on board at Plymouth, and
with half a dozen as slick, oily-looking Catholic
priests as ever a Portuguese man-o'-war's-man set
eyes on; and by the jingoes! the way they crossed
themselves, beat the reefers;well, we got under
way smooth enough, but the next morning, afore day,
running ten knots an hour, with studding-sails all
set, we brought up smack on a sand-bank, and began
to leak like a cullender. The sea made a clean
breach over us, and carried away the quarter-boats as
slick as a boatswain's whistle. As soon as it was light,
we had the long boat out, and in jumped the Duke;
and what d'ye think? He wouldn't let a soul get in
with him but the priests and a parcel of pointer dogs,
blast 'em! When the crew found that his royal
highness was safe, they sent up a roar of joy, as if
they had all of 'em a twenty years' reprieve from old
Davy Jones's locker.
Is this is all
true?
asked Fitzvassal with great
earnestness.
It's all as true as a log-book, resumed the sailor;
and by the soul that's to go aloft when this old
hull's waterlogged, it was too much loyalty for
my
tonnage, I tell'y.
And what became of the Grampus? inquired
Fitzvassal, deeply interested in the narrative, which
he soon discovered to be something more than a mere
sailor's yarn.
Oh, she went to pieces in an hour or so, and a
couple of hundred as fine fellows as ever you saw,
to say nothing of the women and children, went to
the bottom in a giffy.
Women and children? exclaimed Fitzvassal;
is it possible that a sailor like the Duke of York,
his present majesty, a man who has fought so well
for his country, that
he
should suffer women and
children to perish before his eyes, while he saved
himself and his pointer dogs from drowning.
It's as true as preaching, said the sailor.
Then, added Fitzvassal, you may mark my
word; he will inevitably be the last king of his
family
;
for a man who could be guilty of such
unheard-of
baseness, is as bad as bad could be. How
did you escape, Grummet? continued he.
God knows! replied the man; but I recollect
lashing myself to a spare royal-yard, and I found
myself on board the Rose as a man wakes up from
a dreamand who should I find there but this same
cargo of privileged man and dog flesh in the same
quarters. The Duke and his friends were lucky
enough to fall in with our craft. And it was for the
reason of that, d'ye see, that I said that the king had
cause to like our trig little vessel lying off there in
the stream, that's all. The Rose is well enough,
but I don't much fancy the way they have got into of
treating a fellow in his majesty's service.
The fact is, said Fitzvassel, who was any thing
but a royalist, and whom the story about the Duke
of York put in a humor for decrying the
government
of England, the fact is, that things have come
to such a pass, that the very name of king is
inseparable
from tyranny.
The king's bad enough, said the sailor, Charley
loved the galls at such a rate, that he gave the helm
to the old dog-saver, which just finished the spoiling
of him.
Whenever tyranny rules ashore, exclaimed
Fitzvassal
,
musing, you may be sure to find plenty of it
at sea. In these times you may find it wherever the
British flag waves in the wind.
Grummet looked steadily at the speaker, with an
undisguised expression of suspicion, for he began to
think that the officer-like looking man with whom he
had been so communicative, might be tempting htm
with an insidious show of frankness, and so entrap
him to his disadvantage. His penetration had
already
satisfied him that he was no ordinary man,
and the thought occurred to him that there was
danger
of committing himself by too great a freedom of
expression.
Fitzvassal instantly comprehended him, and
continued
,
lowering his voice and looking full into the
eyes of each sailor by turns; Ay, you doubt what I
say, seeing that I may be the master of a vessel
myself
;
but I tell you what it is, I can drink a can with
a ship's crew ashore, and make them mind their eye
too when abroad; and yet I never whip'd or
betrayed
a sailor.
The men stared at him with astonishment, and by
the manner in which they ducked and scraped, while
he now looked at, and spoke to them, seemed to
admit
that the authority of such a man could never be
disputed.
I hate tyranny, however, resumed the speaker,
who wished to further his design without any more
delay; I loathe it in every shape, from a king on
this throne to the landlord of a sailor
boarding-house
and
with this remark Fitzvassal pretended
to look cautiously around, as if the person to whom
he alluded might have entered unawares, and
overheard
the severity of his reflection.
I must allow, said Grummet, taking from his
pocket, in which he thrust his arm to the elbow,
a few pieces of silver, and pondering over them in
his hand, that these landlords
are
a set of sharks.
But this landlord here of the Sea-Gull seems to
be an exception to the rule, suggested Fitzvassal;
by the manner in which he treated the people just
now, one would suppose that he had been a partner
of some lucky buccaneer. That man is too
geneous
to rob an honest tar of his wages!
Oh! he is free enough with his money, and
well he may be if all's true that's said of him,but
num's the word for that, replied Grummet, yet
the man who would treat his own wife as he
does
His
wife!
interrupted Fitzvassal, who had
inadvertently
struck the very key for which he had
been sounding, his wife! and how has he treated
her,
pray?
Bad enough, but that's no affair of mine, d'ye
see.
Where
is
his wife? what of her? who knows
any thing of Classon's wife? exclaimed her son,
who was so hurried away by this miserable gleam
of intelligence about his mother, that he was
completely
thrown off his guard.
This lubberly landlord lets her be supported in
the Poor-House, said the sailor, at least so they
told me the other day; but people along-shore beat
the marines for tough yarns; p'rhaps its a lie
after
all.
The Poor-House? exclaimed Fitzvassal; how,
in the name of mercy, could she be suffered to go to
the Poor-House while her drunken husband is
rioting
here on the fat of the land?
Why, they tell me as how, said the man of hair,
that this here landlord, Abner Classon, is chief
rigger
to the governor, and that he lets him do as he
likes for reasons best known to himself. If he will
do dirty jobs for Sir Edmund, why, I suppose Sir
Edmund won't be outdone in obligations, that's all.
The scoundrel! ejaculated Fitsvassal; but
and he checked himself, remembering, after a
moment's
hesitation, that he had already expressed
himself
too warmly, but it is no affair of our's, as you
truly enough remarked just now; it is no affair of
our's; come, said he, taking up the jug and passing
it along, let us drink confusion to all tyranny and
rascality on sea and on shore.
The men rose from their seats, doffed their
tarpaulins
,
and making a leg, drank one after the other,
and pledged the sentiment which had been offered.
After which, making a move for departure,
Fitzvassal
insisted on settling the tavern score himself, and
having whispered in Grummet's ear that he would
like to see him again shortly, received their hearty
good-morrows, and once more found himself alone.
Fitzvassal was more than ever determined not
to make himself known to his step-father. He saw
at a glance the exact position in which his mother
must be placed, and he resolved that his first
business
should be, to relieve her, as soon as possible, at
all hazards. There were reasons, however,
for not doing so immediately. He did not doubt
that the extravagance, excesses, and villainy of
Classon
had driven his mother to the last pass of
distress
and poverty; but when he took into
consideration
the flourishing appearance of the man's affairs,
and the hint just dropped by the sailor, of the kind of
service which it was reported this man performed for
the Governor, he felt every reasonable assurance
that the liability of the husband had been overruled
by the lawless dictator who governed the colonists.
He determined to sound Classon, but, if possible, not
to reveal himself; that he might procure
information
respecting his father, and others who could be
useful to him in carrying out his designs.
While he was musing after the foregoing manner,
Classon entered the room, with his arms laden with
the replenished decanters; then turning to his
unrecognized
step-son, whom he had not heard from for
so long a time he supposed him to be dead, he
opened
the converation as follows:
What, all alone, hic! my hearty? I hope you
7
hav'nt heaved all my customers into the streetas
ye did that bull-headed, piratical, big whiskered
hic!bullyhey?
You mean the truckman, landlord, responded
Fitzvassalthat big-whiskered fellow was fighting
for the quarter-deck of the Sea-Gull, against a fleet of
dirty-rigged land-lubbers.
Truehic! truesaid Classon, his glazed
eyes rolling in their sockets, and his kness bending
under him, while they scarcely sustained the weight
of his bodyI'd forgottenotten all about it
I hate quar'ling ye know, as I hate witchcrafthic!
and all abominationsdidn't I get the weather-gage
of them ere chapshic!just now; hey?
You managed like a jolly old Admiral! replied
the other, clapping Classon on the shoulder with that
kind of familiarity which he knew to be agreeable to
such characters when in his conditionold
Blake himself couldn't have done better.
Ha! ha! ha! chuckled the flattered inebriate
do y'know now, hic! that I took a liking to ye
as soon as ye came into the Sea-Gull?and when I
saw ye batter that chapwhew!And Classon
made a sort of drunken war-whoop, which plainly
indicated how steeped was his brain already in the
fumes of alcohol. The man then seemed to muse
awhile, and he shook his head as his eyes swam over
the floor, see-sawing his hand horizontally, as if he
were feeling for something in the dark.
Ye seeresumed heI am over-working
myself for the good of sosocietyhic!I am
peace-maker of the townand so ye see I've got my
line all in a snarl this morninghic! plague on this
sour stomach!did ye ever have a sour stomach,
hey?
I'm not much troubled with ill health, said his
step-son
I can'thic! 'magine what it is, resumed the
publican, that is ruining my digestionand
he was going on to lecture on dietetics in a manner
consoling to his darling inclination, when Fitzvassal,
who was not disposed to breathe the pestilential
atmosphere
of the man any longer than was necessary,
interrupted him
You had a fine jail-delivery of rum and beer
this morning, Admiralyou were liberal with your
grog.
Yes, hic!cried the otherit costs me a mint
of money to carry my, hic! schemes; but massa
hic! pay for 'em, as the Indian said, hic!
Fitzvassal was not at that time prepared to guess
that his step-father alluded to the strong box of the
governor, which his instrument could use on all
such occasions as suited his necessities with even
greater freedom that he had done that morning;
the concluding remark of Classon's passed him,
therefore, without particular attention, though he
distinctly remembered it afterward, when he became
more fully informed of the relation they bore to each
other.
But I thought, said Fitzvassal, that your
colonial
laws did not allow your indulging in such
jollifications as I saw here this morning. Your
people
have the reputation, on the other side of the
water
,
of being the most sober community on the face
of the globe. One in London would never believe
the story of what I witnessed this morning, here in
your too hospitable quarters.
Ye're a stranger in these ere parts, replied
Classon
,
any bodyhic! might have known itWe
Boston folkshic! have improved a quantity since
the days of the Rumphurra for Jemmy and liberty!
We used to behic!the stiffest and most puritan
tanical set of water-casks ye everhic!laid yer
eyes onI never see'd thehic! like on it in my
born daysbut, thanks to the spirithic! of what
d'ye call it, they have remoddled the old ship, and
hic!we are afloat again.
In what are your circumstances improved?
inquired
Fitzvassal.
In the liberty of drinking, to be sure. responded
the man of the bottles. A few years agohic! a
fellow
was limited to half a pint of winepshaw! and
thathic! was half waterand if he called for more
than thathic!at a sittingor for a reasonable
jorum of strong-watersthe commissionerhic!
had power to countermand the order, and send it
hic! hang this indigestion!back to the tap,and
if yehic! will believe it, one ofhic! these
fellows
was alwayshic! at yer elbowlest a man
should take too much liquor. A putty kind ofhic!
liberty of conscience, not to let a fellow get as drunk
as drunk as Chloe, if he likes!
Fitzvassal endeavored to keep the drunkard in good
humor by forcing a smile to his face, and he
pursued
his object by giving another turn to the
colloquy
.
What sort of magistrates have you here, in this
famous city of yours, inquired the step-sonit
seems to me they allow the people more leeway than
they do anywhere else.
They werehic! as beggarly a set of puritanical
puppies, as yehic! would like to lay yer eyes
ontill, hic! the most excellent Sir Edmund
Andros came over among us; hic! Jemmyhic!
deserves the everlasting gratitude of this generation
hic! for mending our manners.Cranfield and
Dudley were wellhic! enough, but it will be all
the same hic! a hundred years hence.
Whereupon he helped himself to a cup of rum, and
passed the decanter silently to the other, who as
silently declined, by removing it a short distance from
him.
As I washic! going to say, resumed Classon
now that Sir Edmund is governorhic! he has
put into office a very decent, liberalhic! set of
7*
Catholic magistratesas differenthic! from those
water-drinking knaves asas Edward Vassal is
Edward Vassaldid you say? exclaimed the
unknown
son of that man.
YesEdward Vassaland whathic! of that,
pray?ye have driven the idea I hadhic! out of
my hend.
I've heard of that man in England.
A pickled scamphic! that fellow, said Classon
with great bitterness, and he ground his teeth as he
spoke.
Who;
Vassal?
exclaimed the mariner, following
up the idea which he knew would open the heart of
his step-father.
Yes!
Vassal
do ye doubt it? Does any
one doubt it? I thought every body knew
that,
cried the drunkard with a volubility he had not
shown before, and suddenly assuming a kind of
mastery
over his debility.
Having often heard his name mentioned, said
Fitzvassal with a long-drawn breath of affected
indifference
,
I was about to inquire of you if the man
were yet living?
Yes; replied Classon with a smile of demoniacal
malice, he is alive, and much good may his life do
him. We shall meet on equal ground one of these
days, when there will be at least three of us to curse
each other.
This speech was uttered with a distinctness and
deliberation which showed how powerfully his
feelings
were working; his convulsions were cured by
the transition.
The decanter came again in requisition, and the
spirit seemed now to have absolutely no such effect
on him as it had had before.
You speak of
three
of you, insinuated
Fitzvassal
,
endeavoring, if possible, to draw his step-father
to the confessional, though he knew well enough
that he meant to include himself in the number
which he had devoted to the abodes of darkness;
if you excite my curiosity thus, you must not be
surprised
at my asking you extraordinary questions.
Not at all, replied Classon, who began to warm
toward the other for his condescending mannerI
had as lief let ye know all about it as not. It will
be all the same a hundred years hence.
No matter, said Fitzvassal, I don't care about
knowing.
And, indeed, the young man began to dread what
he had just before so earnestly desired to hear: for a
narrative of all his mother's wretchedness and of his
father's crimes was appalling to think of.
Don't be too modest, young manmodesty has
been the bane of many a man before you; if one
can't be frank with a sailor, where's the use of having
a tongue in his head? I have no secrets that I care
about. I don't care, for instance, who knows that I
married Vassal's mistress
Fitzvassal involuntarily shuddered.
Ay, resumed the man, brat and allbut I
do
care that I didn't make him pay dearer for it, that's
all.
His step-son gazed on him with horror while he
spoke, and his eyes blazed with the impulse of
revenge
.
The brat is dead long ago, I hope, continued
the publican, he had `gallows' written in his face
as clearly as his father had `villain;' as for that
woman
,
dn her
Hold, infamous scoundrel! cried the infuriated
young man, who could command his temper no
longer; if you utter the hellish slander which was
even now on your lips ready to blast my ears, you
shall not live another moment to curse the earth with
your presence!
And who, in the devil's name, are
you?
responded
Classon, his cheeks glowing and his eyes flashing
with consuming fire, now blown almost into a flame
by a sudden gust of passion: I should like to know
who
you
are, that have the audacity to confront me
in this manner, and insult me in my own house;
who in the devil
are
you, hey?
I am Edward Fitzvassal! screamed the other:
and if a thunderbolt had burst through the roof of
the man's house at that moment, he could not have
been more astonished. He lifted both hands, and
gazing incredulously on the speaker, reeled against
the shelves of his tap-room in perfect amazement.
And if ye are indeed the man ye say ye
are, exclaimed he, I had rather have seen the
devil come from hell than you across my threshold.
Ye come here for no goodI warrant.
What I come for, Classon, rejoined his step-son,
you may know hereafter;I did not intend to
discover
myself to you; but your scoundrel tongue has
forced me from my determination. Swear to me
that you will not reveal my name to Sir Edmund
Andros or any of the crown officers, and I will make
your fortune.
You
make
my
fortune? exclaimed Classon,
with undisguised contempt and incredulity
Edward
Fitzvassal make
my
fortune? ha! ha! ha! that
is a good joke, truly.
Fitzvassal made no other reply than by taking out
a handful of gold, and chinking it before the
publican
.
Classon gazed on him with astonishmentand
then, his countenance all of a sudden becoming
serious
,
said,
But why are ye so anxious not to be known to
the governor? He is friendly to me, and perhaps for
my sake, who am of great service to him, and for
certain
considerations
hey? would not molest
ye.
Classon! said Fitzvassal sternly, I am not
disposed at present to make a confidant of any one,
much less of
you
. Promise me that you will not
betray me! But no matteryou
dare
not do it. I
caution you though at your peril to keep a sharp
lookout
.
The moment you betray me, you lose an
independent
fortune. I want no favors of you that
you will not be paid for a hundred-fold more than
Sir Edmund Andros pays you for your dirty work.
I am able to do it, and will do it. Do you hear me?
I hear ye, replied Classon, musing.
Fitzvassal looked steadfastly at him, and placed a
purse heavy with gold in his hand.
Classon! said he, the first act you must do is
to procure the release of my mother.Who
occupies
the old houseor rather who
owns
it; for I
know well enough that it has been vacant for a long
time?No matterif you have mortgaged it, redeem
it, and have every thing comfortably provided for
her. But be careful how you go there to live
I have no wish to do so, replied Classon, who
was so confounded with Fitzvassal's show of wealth,
that he hardly realized his own whereabout: I will
do as ye desire, immediately.
I will double that purse when I see you again in
a few days, said Fitzvassaland now good-bye
for the present. Do you have the house ready for
my mother before you release her, and when she is
therebut I will communicate with you before then.
So saying, he left the Sea-Gull,and Classon,
perfectly bewildered with the events of the
morning
,
took an extraordinary cup of rum, and sat down
in his bar-room to meditate.
CHAPTER IV.
Of tyrannie and crueltie
By this ensample a kynge maie see,
Him self
Gower
.
'tis most just
That thou turn rascal.
Shak.
Timon of Athens
.
The
day before Fitzvassal arrived at the deserted
house of his mother near Dorchester Point, the
people
in the vicinity of Mount Wallaston, now
Quincy
,
were surprised at the appearance of a low built,
black, rakish-looking schooner, which, toward
sunset
,
coming up in that neighborhood, dropped her
anchor about a mile off in the harbor. The flag
of England was flying at her main-top, but as the sun
sank below the hills, it was hauled down soon after
her arrival: at the same time her sails were all
carefully
furled. There seemed to be an unusual
number
of men at this work, who by the aid of a good
glass, appeared to be dressed in blue jackets and
trowsers, the cuffs and collars of the former being
red. A number of people collected together in the
course of the evening, and a good deal of speculation
was soon afloat relative to the probable cause of this
unaccustomed appearance: for in those days the
waters
of Mount Wallaston were seldom honored by any
thing in the shape of a square rigged schooner; a few
fishing boats with an occasional wood or sand lighter,
constituting her principal marine visitors. The
general
impression was, that she was a government yacht,
which had brought important despatches to the
administration
;
and the curious who had collected to
reconnoitre her, being satisfied with this conjecture,
which was soon transferred into a piece of actual
intelligence, retired to their several abodes to discuss
the probable subject of the new orders.
For the last six years previous to the present time,
1688, the colonies had been groaning under the
arbitrary
encroachments of Charles II. and his
successor
.
The spirit of liberty, which, in opposing the
tyrannous advances of the first Charles, unhappily
degenerated into licentiousness, and led to the very
opposite of those rusults which were anticipated by
a Hambden and a Sydney, had at one time
apparently
died away in the bosoms of British subjects.
Nothing
could have seemed more inauspicious to the
great cause of human freedom than a superficial
view of the political aspect of those times. In its
most discouraging appearance, however, the
political
philosopher might have discovered the old
8
tree, though scathed by the lightnings of ambition,
and stripped of its greenest branches, to be sound at
the root, and even more energetic there, than if the
nourishment of its beneficent mother had been
diffused
through its unharmed body. The good seed,
to change the illustration, had assuredly been thrown
upon good ground; and though the tramplings of
kings and bishops were able to keep the plantsunder
for a time, there was no fear but that they would
burst forth in season and yield a plentiful harvest.
But such encouraging views were confined to
comparatively
a few persons among the millions of
British subjects who were desponding under the
adverse events which they had vainly endeavored to
control. Liberty had always been dear to them; and
since the Reformation, it had been handed down to
them from generation to generation with increasing
attractions
.
In the course of a few generations
antecedent
to the accession of Charles the first, a body of
men had arisen comprising the flower of England,
who had now become the special guardians of that
high trust, which was first executed at Runnymede.
In recognizing liberty of conscience as inseparable
from civil liberty, and thence opposing all
parliamentary
action, which was compulsory on them to
observe
certain rituals and ceremonies in religious
worship, they came in collision with that powerful
class of men which has existed in all countries, and
who, rioting on the privileges they possess, are ready
to sacrifice the rights of others, and the everlasting
principles which set forth the true relations of
society
;
so long as they may pander to their own selfish
appetites and wallow in epicurean delights.
The attrition of classes so unlike tore off the
outward
folds which had for a time enveloped them,
and revealed the interior characteristics of each.
The selfishness of the hierarchy and their
dependents
became now the pander of royalty, and it was
glory enough for that degraded class of lace-clad
slaves, if, in furthering the royal prerogative, they
could partake of the luxuries it claimed: but the
sturdy non-conformists, who had seemed nothing
more than religious zealots singularly attached to a
simple mode of worship, and jealous of control in
this peculiar prejudice, now arrayed themselves
between
the people and the crown, and protected the
former from that desolating sway which served for a
time to threaten the extinction of their glory.
The first parliament which was elected after the
Restoration gave the people little to hope. Wearied
as they had been under the domination of Cromwell,
with all their hopes frustrated, they had vainly
expected
that the sceptre of their reinstated
monarch
would not only re-establish order, but be even a
better safeguard of their rights, than if it had never
transcended the social contract: they soon found,
however, to their bitter disappointment and
mortification
,
that there could be no redress under the
authority
of the Stuarts. The descendants of Henry
the Seventh carried the ideas of divine right and
popular
subserviency to such an extent, that nothing
could be expected from them but the propagation of
errors and the perpetuation of tyranny. The
decapitation
of Charles I., instead of opening the eyes
of his son to the essential nature of the executive
office
,
served no other purpose than to infatuate him
the more with notions of kingly prerogative; and we
find his influence forthwith exerted, after the
Restoration
,
in packing a House of Commons which would
go any lengths in favoring the crown. From that
time forth there were few interruptions in a series of
executive aggressions, the inconvenience of which
was felt in the colonies as well as in the mother
country
,
till they ended in that high-handed act which
ought to have sent the head of its inventor rolling
beneath the scaffold.
Having squandered incalculable sums on his
lawless
pleasures, and exhausted the resources of war
and peace to replenish his coffers, Charles II.
conceived
the mad idea of seizing on all the charters in his
dominions, and granting them again under certain
restrictions, for what he deemed an equivalent in
money. The charter of the city of London was the
first that was sacrificed to this mad avarice, and it
was followed by all the others in the kingdom. The
colonies in New-England did not escape the
hurricane
that swept away nearly every vestige of their
ancient
liberties, and tore up the very landmarks of
civil society which their patriotic progenitors had so
carefully planted. Accordingly, in the year 1683, a
quo warranto
was issued against the New-England
chief corporations, and a judgment entered up in
Chancery. In place of their own elected governors,
who were removed to make room for him, Henry
Cranfield was commissioned by the king to rule over
New England; and these outrages were followed up,
during the next year, by the infatuated James II.,
who then succeeded to the crown, and stripped the
colonies of all their remaining privileges. The king
assumed the power of making governors,
deputy-governors
,
judges, magistrates, and military officers;
and through the former, and four commissioners,
legislated
and taxed the people at his own pleasure. In
short, the whole form and substance of the colonial
government were completely changed and destroyed.
Joseph Dudley, who was the successor of
Cranfield
,
was the miserable instrument of this
usurpation
;
but though he was odious to the people, this man
procured some favor on account of his father's
services.
All offices of any influence were now filled with
royal favorites whose political and religious principles
were diametrically opposite to those of the American
people. This state of things, with all its necessary
concomitants
,
lasted till the year 1686, when King James
I. having stretched his prerogative almost to the point
8*
of non-endurance, gave another screw to the
tyrannical
vice with which he grasped the people of New
England, and consummated his assumption of
mastery
by sending over Sir Edmond Andros, as
governor
.
At the time we are now chronicling, the people,
especially of Massachusetts, were groaning under
this man's arbitrary oppression. They were not
possessed of even a remnant of that liberty which
their pilgrim fathers had toiled so hard to maintain.
Even the lands which their hardy sires had
redeemed
from the wilderness, and paid for to the savage
proprietors (for not an acre had been wrongfully
acquired
by them,) were taken away; their titles having
been usurped by the crown on the forfeiture of the
charters,and they who were desirous of holding
them again, were compelled to pay one half their
value to the king. Enormous impositions were laid
on them in the shape of office fees, and pounds were
now exacted, where, under their charters, only a few
shillings had been required. The people were taxed
without mercy, and at the same time were not
allowed
any assembly or general court: not only were
they refused representatives, but they were not
permitted
to assemble at all, but once a year for the
choice of petty officers, so insignificant that the crown
would not condescend to interfere with them: and
even the number of the selectmen of Boston was
diminished
by the capricious interference of the
governor
.
All this, and more, was borne with as much patience
as the religious principles of the people could
summon
for the occasion; and this is saying every thing
for those who considered self-denial and the
endurance
of hardships, the most imperative of duties.
They endured, because they possessed that unshaken
confidence in the order of providence which had
been transmitted from their parents, and because they
knew, that so long as they reposed themselves under
that power, and exerted their utmost ability to
cooperate
with the supreme will, the shadows that
enveloped them and the storms that beat so furiously
against their consecrated altars, would pass away in
season, and bring again the sun of peace and liberty
with brighter and more renovating influence.
Besides
this, they were ardently attached to their mother
country, and sincerely desired to harmonize with her
in all things practicable; and their agents were even
now in London, soliciting the paternal interposition
of the sovereign to save the colonies from utter and
irremediable ruin: for, so far from their having
increased
for a number of years back, they had
obviously
diminished; since nearly all the objects for
which the children of liberty had left their
incompetent
,
criminal, and debased father-land, seemed for a
while frustrated by these high-handed usurpations.
But the people of Massachusetts had never
despaired
.
Patiently had they waited for the fulfilment of
promises which had been repeatedly given to their
petitions
,
and so long as their agents remained at court,
the hope which had sustained them under so many
privations was re-kindled by every arrival in their
waters. The people of Boston, however, had for
some time given unequivocal indications that the
chain was galling them to the quick. On several
occasions they had manifested that feverish
restlessness
which is so disagreeable to tyrants; and on a
late one, when certain soldiers were on trial for
having
deserted from the army, and a freeman had
dared to complain to the council of its unreasonable
conduct, he was told by one of its members that
he must not think the privileges of Englishmen
would follow them to the ends of the world.
Such a sentiment could not be lost on the
inhabitants
of Boston. It was not bruited abroad and
proclaimed
from the house-tops, but it was indignantly
whispered about in private; and wherever it was
heard, it roused the blood of the people to a more
tumultuous
action, than if the war-trumpet of the
most beloved monarch had summoned them to
contend
for their altars. Meetings were held in spite of
the denunciations of Sir Edmund Andros and his
council, and measures were in rapid progress for
effecting
a revolution in some degree analogous to that
which in less than a hundred years after, was achieved
by the sons of liberty.
Such is a brief outline of the condition of public
affairs, and of the popular affection towards the crown
officers, at the time when the events hereafter to be
described were secretly working for consummation;
and it will in part explain the readiness with which
the people about Mount Wallaston assured themselves
that the Grampus was a government vessel.
The sun had now sunk behind the blue hills of
Massachusetts, and the shadows of evening had
enveloped
the landscape in gloom. Two days had
passed since the arrival of this vessel, which was
still riding at anchor about a mile below Mount
Wallaston
.
At seven o'clock that evening, a person
wrapped in a long pea-jacket stood at the door of a
rude hut, which was built on the borders of the sea
at half gun-shot distance from the anchorage of the
vessel. The hut was constructed under the lee of a
bank of earth, that, breaking abruptly in that place,
sloped gradually down to the water, where was a
small boat fastened to a rock, which served the double
purpose of an anchor and a ring-bolt. The hut
was erected over a natural excavation of the earth,
which, with little assistance from art, rendered it
available as a cellar. An abundance of sea-weed
was heaped round the foundation of the tenement to
keep the frost more effectually out; and you
ascended
to the door by the aid of steps that had been
constructed out of broken spars, which the
proprietor
had gathered from the floating wrecks of
vessels that were frequently scattered along the
shore.
A challenge within of, Who's there? followed
immediately on a low tap at the door, which, on the
summons being repeated, was slowly opened by the
occupant.
What do you want here at this time of the day?
growled the inquirer, as his head peered from the
opening, and a dark lantern gleamed on the face of
the person who had disturbed him.
It is only I, Morgan! responded the visitor
I'll tell you my business presently; in the
meantime
,
I'll take a place by your fireside, if you've no
objection.
Oh, it's you, is it? said Morgan in a more
friendly
tone, come in; on which he stepped back to
admit his visitor. I thought it might have been
one of those infernal revenue officers, who are
everlastingly
prowling about these ere parts: and jest
now, I guessed that the old rats had nosed out the
cheese you know on.
It is on that very account I have called to see
you now, rejoined the guest; the moon rises at
about one o'clock, I believe, continued he, musing.
The man took down from a small shelf over the
fireplace a very dirty almanac, and after thumbing it
awhile, replied.
She rises to-night at a quarter past one
precisely
.
Very well; resumed the other, the Dolphin
must be under weigh before the moon rises; the
revenue-cutter will be after her before that hour,
unless she clears out from this place; I may be
mistaken
,
but if Sir Edmund Andros gets scent of me,
as I have reason to think that he will, farewell to
all your hopes, and to mine too, as for that matter.
You know the soundings about Nahant?
Perfectly!
Run her down to Nahant, then, and anchor her
on the sou'west shore, close by the Swallow's Cave;
if we can get her in there before the moon rises,
she will be snug enough. There is not a solitary
inhabitant on that witch place that ever I heard of,
and the fishing-boats never run round that side.
Morgan put his nose aside with the fore-finger of
his right hand, as much as to intimate to his
employer
that he thoroughly understood his meaning; and
then looking at him shrewdly, inquired,
You'll not trouble Nahant yourself, I suppose?
Not to-night; I have business of the utmost
importance
in Boston. Run the schooner as near in
among the rocks as you can, and stay at anchor till I
come; unless you are attacked, which is not
probable
.
You know there is no danger in riding that
side of the peninsula unless it blows a tornado, for
you are well sheltered from the north-east. Here is
something as an earnest of the future.
With this, the stranger placed in the hand of
Morgan
several pieces of gold, which the latter chinked
without returning any answer, except to invite his
guest to be seated.
I can wait with you an hour, was the reply,
while the visitor looked at a very elegant watch; at
eight o'clock I must see you on board.
The speaker remained silent for some moments,
and seemed to be pondering something in his mind,
while he stirred the embers with the iron scabbard of
his rapier, which, as he seated himself on the wooden
settle, projected from under his pea-jacket. At last
he turned his face round with a sort of suppressed
whistle through his teeth, and gazing carelessly on
the rude habitation of his pilot, which was almost
entirely without furniturethe bedstead being
built of rough boards on one side of the room after the
manner of the berths of a vessel, and a small deal
table
occupying the centre, on which lay a few clams,
a piece of sea biscuit, and a black bottlethe
tout
ensemble
bronzed by the flickering light that flared
up reluctantly from the hearth,questioned him as
follows.
And how long, pray, have you lived here,
Morgan
?The
last I heared of you before I left
Boston
,for
though I hailed from the old point over
there in Matapan, I always regarded myself as an
inhabitant
of the good old town of notions,you were
in Limbo for debt.
You are jest about right there, replied Morgan,
looking a little queer at his employer, and screwing up
the corners of his eyes as he spoke; and I should
have remained there to this day, for what I know on,
if the rascals, not being contented with burying me
alive one way, hadn't tried to bury me another;
but the carcass of Jake Morgan got into the clutches
of the wrong grave-diggers that time, ha! ha!
ha!
And he chuckled at the remembrance of something
of which his visitor was too uninformed to be able to
participate in his mirth.
If you haven't been the most prosperous man in
the world, Jake, said he, you have at least been
lucky enough not to lose your good humor.
Suppose
,
now, you tell me the adventure you allude to;
for by the dull face of a puritan, I'll swear that since
I hove in sight of the Light-House I have met with
hardly any thing but melancholy and misery. Come,
Jake Morgan, before we set to work let us have the
story that seems to put you in such excellent spirits.
Jake Morgan was a muscular, square-built man, of
about forty years of age. His raven, black hair,
braided into a triple cue with their ends fastened
together
,
hung half-way down his back. His face was
very pale and cadaverous, contrasting strongly with
his black beard and eyebrows; but his dark eyes,
always
moist and restless, had a very mirthful
expression
,
though it arose rather from mischievous
purpose
than from any very laudable impulse. His
9
large mouth was filled with sound, strong teeth
much yellowed with tobacco, which he could not
help exhibiting in consequence of a remarkable
spasmodic
action of the lips when interested in
conversation
.
He was always ready to tell stories, being
generally
himself the subject of them; yet he rarely
had an opportunity of indulging this disposition,
except
when he met with an accommodating customer
on his excursions to the neighboring settlements to
dispose of fish and wild fowl,for when Morgan
was out of employment as pilot, his necessities
compelled
him to resort to this means of living,and
then he was so universally regarded as an
unprincipled
and dangerous man, who could be easily
engaged
in executing schemes of mischief,that few
men were mirthful enough to pay the price of being
amused by him. He was nothing loath, therefore, to
comply with the solicitation of his present employer,
and regale him with one of his personal anecdotes.
Therefore, having drawn himself closer to the fire,
and mused and cleared his throat for the effort, after
disposing of an old soldier, which had been worn
out in the wars of his corn-grinders, and supplying
its place by a fresh recruit of nigger-head, he
proceeded
as follows:
Well, you see, as how, I'd been in the stone jug
more than a year, e'en-a-most eighteen months,
living
on bread and water, a thin diet for one whose
belly-timber had never been short of salt-junk and
pork; and all this for running up a small score at the
Two Gridirons, kept by Job Tileston;you
remember
Job, I dare say?
I think I heard of such a fellow's being hanged
some time ago, replied the guest.
The same feller, exactly, resumed Morgan; he
was taken up a year or two arter I used to patronize
him, for cutting a man's throat who put up at his
house. It was about as dirty a job as ever I heared
tell on, that are murderperhaps you'd like to hear
about it!
Perhaps you had better finish the yarn you
began
with, said the visitor, and leave that for
another
time.
Well, may be I had, replied Morgan; but it's no
yarn, I assure you; I'll bet a shilling the main part
of what I'm going to tell you is registered down in
the chronicles of Boston jail:I know it must be, if
them fellers who keep it have any regard for true
history. But to proceed without any more
palavering
,
I'll soon get through, for a short horse is soon
curried.
Well, you see, continued Morgan, after Job
Tileston had put the screws on me, there seemed to be
no earthly chance of getting out; and I had purty
much made up my mind to stay there till I died. A
good many on'em, who were not very fond of an
active
life, have done so; but I was used to knocking
round, and didn't care about staying there in the
public
boarding-house longer than I could help. Job
used to come every now and then, especially Sunday
arternoons, and look at me through the bars; many
a time had that same man of Uz looked over the bar
at me before,but that's neither here nor there.
On them occasions, though, he was more like one of
Job's comforters than Job himself,
and
the way I
used to curse him! Howsomever, it was all done in
a quiet way, and I soon got so used to being there,
boarding and lodging all free, that I wouldn't have
given a tinker's dn to be let out agin: and hadn't
it been for the meerest accident in the world, I might
have been there to this day, and then the Dolphin
might have whistled for a pilot, and the world been
cheated out of one of the best jail-bird legends it ever
yet heared on.
At the rate you are now going, interrupted the
listener, whose patience began to be a little fretted,
it will be time to go aboard before you have got
under weigh with your story.
Well, then, continued Jake, squaring himself in
earnest, I will try to tack as little as possible. It
seldom happened that I was left alone in the cell I
occupied; while I boarded there, I suppose I
chummed
with more than a dozen different persons, who
like schollards in old Mather's College, had been
examined
,
admitted, and graduated. Some on 'em out
of that same institution occupied very elevated
stations
when they leftJob Tileston climbed to the very
top of the ladderha! ha! ha! but he fell off
thoughgood again! not so bad that
His employer could not help laughing at the
fellow's
drollery, for though he had told the story a
dozen
times before, his sense of the ludicrous and
whimsical
constantly suggested the most grotesque
relations
among his fancies.
The last chum, resumed Morgan,was a queer
feller
,
who had never, as he confessed, been out of debt in
his life. There was nothing strange in that, though;
but what tickled me was, he took it into his head to
die, and then he was so
cool
about it. `Sam,' says
I, `aint you afeard to hop the twig?'`Afeared!'
says he, `what have I to be afeared on? But I tell
you what it is, Jake,' says he, `I don't much like
this paying the debt of naturits
inconsistent
.'
Soon arter this the death-rattles came over him, and
his eyes turned up in his head, and he struggled like
a good fellow
For pity's sake, interrupted the listener, pass
over the particulars of that scene; I have no stomach
for the horrors to-night.
Why, od's niggers! cried Morgan, I know'd
well enough that Sam couldn't
feel
nothinghe
didn't suffer no more than a lobster does in a pot
kicking's no sign!
Howsomever, it was all one;
a few minutes arter, and I laid him out as straight as
a salt fish, and closed his eyes; but they wouldn't
stay closed, they wouldn't; so I put two coppers I had
9*
on 'em, because them wasn't the handsomest
dead-eyes
I had ever seen, I assure you!
It was now about midnight, and while I was
fixing
Sam, I felt something cold and clammy catch
hold of my naked arm behind: by Golly! warn't I
scared then? For as soon as it got hold o'me, such
a scream came through the wall as you never
heared
in your born days. And what do you think it
was? A crazy feller next cell, who had poked his
arm through the air-hole, and finding he had caught
something, set up that diabolical screaming. I tried
to make him undo his grip, and he wouldn't; so I
cut the tendons of his wristyou needn't be
alarmed
,
it didn't hurt him nonebut he let go though,
like a monkey hold on a hot potater. I had an
extra
blanket that night, and slept very comfortable.
The next day, the carpenter brought a pine coffin,
and the turnkey and him put Sam into it;talk of
feeling
for a feller, I was a perfect mourner compared
to them ere fellers! The way they knocked Sam
about was a caution. Well, having packed away the
body, the carpenter, put the top of the coffin on and
fixed the nails, and then found that he had left his
hammer
;so
off they both started, and left me with my
late chum who now, as the thought struck me, would
be a friend indeed:the friendship you meet with in
the world has no such body to it as mine had;
good again!
While the jail folks were busying themselves
about Sam, I lay on my bundle of straw, kivered up
by the blankets; and it was while they were banging
the doors and rattling the bars and padlocks on their
way out, that I planned one of the grandest schemes
that ever entered into the head of man, or ever you
heared on. And what do you think it was? Why,
I'll tell you, for I got up in no time to put the plan in
execution. I went to work, and dragged out the
dead body of poor Sam;by the bye, I forget to tell
you that I see'd that infernal jailor put them are very
coppers in his pocket which I put on Sam's eyes to
keep 'em down,but I didn't say nothing;I say I
dragged the dead body of poor Sam out of the
coffin
,
and carrying it to my bundle of straw, I kivered
it up with the blankets exactly as I was kivered up
myself a few minutes afore when the jailer and the
carpenter was in the cell. My next step was to get
into the wooden surtout myself, which had been
vacated
by my accommodating fellow-boarder. Here I
placed myself as quietly as possible, having
snugged
the top and fixed the nails just as they had been
fixed by the carpenter.
I should have feared, interrupted the listener,
who now seemed to place some reliance on the story,
and attended with deep interest, I should have
feared suffocation in the coffin.
There was no danger o' that, resumed the
story-teller
;
I don't know but a feller might have lived
there a week, for there was a purty considerable
sized knot-hole in the coffin. Howsomever, I warn't
fool enough to trust to that; so what does I do, but
put two wedges of wood under the top of the box to
keep it from being made too tight, and every thing
being now ready, I laid as comfortable as ever a live
corpse did afore me. And this reminds me of
another
story which
Which you had better postpone for the present,
perhaps; suggested his guest.
As you like, continued Morgan, a little piqued;
but do let me tell it to you one of these daysit's a
devilish queer story about a man who was going to
be buried alive;howsomever, I will not interrupt
what is now telling. As the arternoon advanced, the
old slamming of doors and rattling of chains, and bars,
and padlocks began againwe used to hear that
constant
three times a-day for meals, and extra when
new boarders came.By and bye the door of my cell
opened, and in came I don't know how many persons.
The first thing done was to drive the nails, which
operation sounded in my ears like thunder. As soon
as this was over, the coffin was lifted from the floor
and placed on the shoulders of my pall-bearers. I
now had the satisfaction of perceiving that there was
room between the coffin and the kiver for air enough
to supply a grampus; so that, you see, I was in no
sort of danger of wanting wind,the only fear was
that those outside would get wind of
me,
good again!
not so bad that! The pall-bearers now began to descend
into the street, and to talk together as follows:
`How long has this rotten old rascal been
dead, Joe?' asked one of my body guard of another.
`About a week I should judge,' replied the feller,
spitting.
`Who's going to have him; do you know?' again
inquired the first feller.
`Doctor Sikes,' said the feller called Joe, who
was at my right shoulder; his turn comes next.
The doctor is a queer feller at buying bodies, but I
guess he got bit last week a little.'
`How so?' asked my body-guard at my left foot.
`Why, you see,' said he, `the doctor's son, and
some other chaps, were blowing it out down at the
Red Lion, and all in a nat'ral way they got as drunk
as you please;well, arter they were purty well
tired on't, and 'twas time for them to be packing, they
found that they hadn't got no money none on'em.
`I see the way to fix it,' said one; `how's that?'
said another. `Let's put Ned Sikes in a fire bag,'
said he, `and sell him to the old man; Ned's dead
drunk, and as good as a corpse,' said he. `Hurrah!'
cried they all at once, and set to work in earnest to
do it. So they hauled an old canvass bag out of a
boot-closet they know'd on, and crammed into it the
body of Ned Sikes, and off four on them started for
the doctor's house, leaving the rest of the company to
await the result of the negotiation. So knock, knock,
went they agin the old man's door, and presently he
stuck his old night-cap out of the window with his
head in it. `Who's there?' said he,`hush!' said
they,and the old feller took the hint, and came
down. The Doctor looked at the bag, and lifted one
end on it. `What is it?' said he; `a man,' said
they; `what did he die on?' said he; `rum,' said
they. `He isn't worth more than fifteen shillings,
then,' said he; `make it a pound,' said they, `and it
is yourn;' `done,' said old Sikes, and they carried the
Doctor's own drunken son into his study, and left it
on the floor in the dark.
`The doctor was gammoned
that
time, any how,'
said the man, who kept me up on the left shoulder;
`and he'll get gammoned
this
time too; for we've got
the money, and this is about the rottenest corpse I've
had the honor of bearing many a day; and if he don't
get gammoned
this
time, there is no such thing as
rum in punch.'
You're right there, my body-guard, thought I,
for once in your life at least; and the pall-bearers
just then began to laugh aloud, for they had turned
down near the bottom of the common. I know'd
that they were in the habit of burying hungry
debtors
down at that old grave-yard, and I could
calculate
purty well the whereabouts. My friends made
a terrible fuss with my body, and were already tired
enough of their burden, when we drew nigh to my
long home. They stopped, and I couldn't mistake,
then. Now was pill-garlick's great time. I began
to kick and scream at the same instant, as if heaven
and earth were coming together, and all the devils
in devildom had been suddenly unchained at once.
My pall-bearers, half frightened out of their wits,
dropped the coffin, and scampered away as if for
their lives; one on'em tumbled over a tomb-stone
and nearly broke his neck. I had no time to lose.
With a desperate effort, I drew my knees up, and at
the same time strained with my back and elbows till the
sides and top of the coffin split asunder an gin away
at once. I tore and wounded my shoulder horribly
against the nails of the coffin, and here are the scars
at this day. You ought to have seen the way I
cleared! I never stopped till I reached Nigger Hill,
and there I remained as snug as you please for the
next six months; till, accidentally mistaking another
man's wallet for my own, I was induced to remove
here, where I built this house. Since then I have
been pilot to all the scamps, saving your presence,
who have honored these parts with their
countenance
.
What think you now of my adventure?
I think, replied the other, you have had an
excellent
education for a cut-purse, and that your
adventure
of the coffin is altogether worthy of you.
Did the sharks let you alone after your escape?
I never heared any more of their
capiases,
as
they call them. I guess they thought Jake Morgan
was a leetle too hard a customer for 'em, and that, on
the whole, it would be as well to let him alone.
The time was now arrived which had been
determined
on for proceeding on board the schooner.
Accordingly, the captain of the Dolphin opened the
door of the hut, and proceeding down to the water's
edge, gave a loud and shrill whistle, which was
answered immediately by the appearance of a light
from on board the vessel. In a few minutes the
light passed down the side of the schooner, and was
seen shining over the water, and growing brighter
and brighter, till presently the plash and dip of the
oars were heard, and a barge, rowed by eight men,
with a coxswain, rounded to the wharf.
Is it you, Mr. Rogers? inquired the captain,
addressing
the man at the helm as he stepped on one of
the after-thwarts.
Ay, ay, Sir! returned the helmsman.
Step aboard, Morgan! said the captain; and
Morgan seated himself aft, along-side the officer.
Having shoved off according to orders, the barge
was on her way back to the schooner. It was not
long before they were on her deck. She was a
sharp built schooner, with raking masts; her
bowsprit
running almost parallel with her deck, like the
modern Baltimore clippers. She was of about one
hundred and fifty tons burthen, carrying six twelve
pound carronades and one long twenty-four
pounder
,
which was swung aft of the foremast. Her
bulwarks
were high, and almost straight fore and aft,
with a deck like that of pilot-boat. She was painted
black, and was, on the whole, as suspicious looking
a craft as ever fell under the glass of a revenue cutter.
It was not the first time that Jake Morgan had
been on board the Dolphin. He had piloted her in,
a few days before, having seen her signal far down
in the bay, where he had gone to fish for cod and
haddock. He was now in her cabin, with the
captain
,
and Mr. Felton, his lieutenant. They were
seated at the table, their only light that which shone
in the binnacle, and which cast a peculiar gleam
on the visages of the company. The captain turned
towards his lieutenant.
We must weigh anchor immediately, Mr. Felton,
and proceed to Nahant; I have given the pilot
directions
,
as he will continue with you till I come. I
have reason to suspect that Sir Edmund Andros has
got scent of us, or that he
will
have, this very
evening. Keep your guns loaded with grape and
cannister, and if the revenue cutter
should
come,
I know that you are able to blow her out of the
water
.
Should this happen, run out to sea, and in a
week from this time cruise off Cohasset, by the
glades. I will join you there. Otherwise wait for
me at Nahant. You may send the men for fresh
provisions to Salem. Business in town requires my
presence.
So saying, he went to his state-room, and from his
10
desk took a package carefully bound with red tape,
and placed it in his bosom; he then replenished his
pockets with gold, which he took from a sheet-iron
box; and being thus provided, he went on deck,
and descended into the barge which was waiting for
him along-side.
I shall take your boat, Morgan, this evening,
said the captain, giving a farewell nod, and I shall
probably bring it with me to Nahant. Keep a sharp
look-out!
In a few minutes the barge landed him on the
shore, and returned to the vessel.
Being now alone, he cast off Morgan's boat, and
having set the mast in the forward thwart, and
unloosed
the sail, he was soon on his way to Boston.
He beat about, however, some time, till he had seen
his favorite vessel under weigh with a stiff breeze,
and then he put his helm down, and bore directly
for the long wharf in the metropolis of New
England
.
CHAPTER V.
Fate may dash
My sceptre from me, but shall not command
My will to hold it with a feebler grasp;
Nay, if few hours of empire yet are mine,
They shall be colored with a sterner pride.
Ion
.
Ruffian, let go that rude, uncivil touch.
Shak.
The
tyranny of Sir Edmund Andros over the
people of New England was, as near as could be,
an exact counterpart of that of James II. over his
more immediate subjects. Charles II. would never
have been guilty of half the excesses which are
recorded
against him, had it not been for the influence
of his bigotted brother. What made matters still
worse was, that the then Duke of York was
himself
under the complete dominion of the Catholie
clergy, and is said to have gone so far as to write a
letter to the Pope, promising his holiness that he
would leave no means untried to establish his
religion
in New England.
The colonies were hateful to James, as
nurseries
of republicans; and he saw no security for his
crown so long as the arbitrary principles which
sustained
it were assailed by the free spirit which,
though temporarily subdued, he was aware must
prevail in that favored region. Had it not been for
the Duke of York, the charters of the people would
not have been invaded; and now that this last
vestige
of liberty was gone, James did every thing in
his power to perpetuate the slavery he had effected.
He was therefore careful to use all the religious
influence
he possessed to spread Papacy throughout
his dominions; knowing well enough, that if he
could enslave the consciences of men, there would
remain but little to be achieved in fastening on their
necks the most servile bondage.
In this spirit, and with this ulterior object, priests
were sent over to America in disguise during the
first part of his reign, who used every art in their
possession to lead the people into the snare that was
set for them; till, as the tyranny of the monarch
grew more daring, and his infatuation more
extravagant
,
the secret disguises of his conduct were
entirely
abandoned, and he set to work with the
holdness
that better became him.
One of his first acts at home was, to augment his
standing army from seven thousand to fifteen
thousand
men, and to place over this force his favorite
Catholic officers; a step which at once trampled on
the laws and liberties of the people. This conduct
was in the midst of professions diametrically
opposite
to it, and perfectly harmonized with that
contemporary
piece of villainythe revocation of the
edict of Nantes by Lewis the Fourteenth of France.
In the mean time Catholic lords were admitted into
James's privy council, and Jesuit Colleges were
established
in different parts of the kingdom. Monks
now appeared at Court, and the administration
became
entirely Catholic. So absurd and impolitic
was his conduct, that even Pope innocent XI., much
as he desired to see the whole Christian world at his
feet, disapproved of it; for he had sagacity enough
to see that, so long as it was against the sense of the
people, it could not endure, but would, on the
contrary
,
ultimately redound to his disadvantage.
In his zeal to spread his religious views and
convert
the whole empire, James now published his
declarations for liberty of conscience in the
year 1687, which so charmed the Independents, that
for the time they seemed to forget the oppression to
which they were subjected. Allured by such hopes
as this seeming liberality inspired, the people of
Massachusetts
,
through Dr. Mather,
Rector
of Harvard
University, and Sir Henry Ashhurst, their agents at
London, petitioned the king to restore their charter,
in the confident belief that their prayer would be
granted. But the king had no intention of
extending
his liberality thus far, and it was soon
discovered
10*
that his only design had been to favor the
Catholics
.
Bad men, the enemies of the people, are the same
in all ages of the world, and when in power are the
more dangerous to liberty, because their infatuation
increases with their assumption. James had now
become
almost absolute, and he lost no occasion of
taking
the responsibility of a tyrant. Though his
parliament
was thoroughly Tory, they could not be
induced
to wholly prostitute themselves to the crown.
They so far truly represented the people of England
as they resisted the royal design of forcing the
Catholic
religion upon them; for a step had been taken
in human progress which could not admit of
retrogression
,
and the religious sentiment of the country
was fixed for its allotted duration.
James, however, was resolved to leave no
electioneering
machinery untried. He visited the
counties
in person, and closeted himself with
influential
men, making a desperate effort to pack a
parliament
that would carry out all his enormous schemes.
But the virtue of the people resisted all his
machinations
,
and liberty triumphed. Historical parallels
are instructive; but we shall leave the reader to
draw them. In furtherance of his arbitrary designs
to enslave a too confiding people, the monarch of
England resolved to produce the Pope's nuncio in
public. By the laws of England no one could assume
this character without the penalties of high treason.
But, in defiance of these laws, and in direct
opposition
to public opinion, this man, by the order of
James, made his public entry into Windsor,
attended
by all the pomp and paraphernalia of his religion.
It was the duty of the Earl of Somerset, in virtue of his
place, to conduct official characters to an audience. But
he was too good a citizen to be a tyrant's instrument,
and so he lost his office. The Duke of Grafton
was not so scrupulous, and he broke the laws to
please his master. Jeffries was then at the head of
the King's Bench, or there is no telling but that
Grafton might have been Lord Chief Justice of
England
.
These acts, among others, made James so
unpopular
,
that he resolved, if practicable, to use the
influence
of the Prince of Orange, his son-in-law, if
haply he could induce that eminent personage to
agree with himself; for he was a favorite of the
English dissenters for the services he had rendered
them, while the Princess was the last hope that her
countrymen clung to. The king's object was to
make the repeal of the penal laws popular. In
pursuance
of this end, he at length obtained the views
of the Prince and Princess of Orange, which
amounted
to this, that they had no objection to indulging
the Catholics with liberty of conscience, but, on the
contrary, desired it, as they did most ardently that
the Protestant dissenters should be allowed the free
exercise of their religion; but that they would never
agree to the repeal of the test and penal laws, which
excluded the Catholics from parliament and public
offices, and were the best securities against the
overthrow of the Protestant faith.
From that time forth, the people of England, as
well as of the Colonies, began to look with more
determined
opposition on the projects of their king;
inasmuch as they could now realize a source of
protection
,
which before they had only hoped for. As
the malcontents in the kingdom increased, James
became the more obstinate. He now, in 1688,
published
another declaration, granting liberty of
conscience
,
and abolishing the penal laws; at the same
time ordering the bishops to read this declaration in
all their churches. How unpopular this measure
was, may be gathered from the fact that one minister
having told his congregation, that, though he was
compelled to
read
the declaration, they were not
obliged to stay and
hear
it read, they immediately
left the house, and he recited it to the deserted pews.
In the meanwhile the two parties in England,
through the judicious councils of the Prince of
Orange, united against their common enemy, the
king. So long as a Catholic monarch possessed
the throne of England, the Stadtholder saw the
impossibility
of attaching that kingdom to the Protestant
alliance of the princes of the empire, Holland, Spain,
and Savoy, against the ambitious schemes of France.
The birth of the Prince of Wales, which happened
this year, shut out the princess from the succession;
so that all hope of securing the Protestant faith in
England seemed to have expired. The Prince of
Orange, therefore, entered into a closer
correspondence
with the malcontents, who promised him their
full assistance if he would co-operate with them in
the re-establishment of their liberties.
James now began to perceive the true state of
affairs
,
and forthwith he ordered his fleets to be
equipped
,
and new levies to be set on foot for the
protection
of his dominions. It was the same fear that
impelled
him to despatch the Rose frigate to Boston; for
he had learned through the Massachusetts agents
that the people were becoming restless under the
privations and impositions they endured, and that
unless their charters were restored, it was impossible
to foretell the consequences which might follow.
The king, therefore, thought it advisable at this
juncture, to send an armed vessel to Boston, that the
turbulent people there might be overawed, and kept
under the provisional authority.
It would have been well for George III., nearly a
century after, if he had taken counsel from history,
and learned of what stuff his North American subjects
were made, and how they worked in the traces
of despotism. It is delightful to observe, at this
period
of our history, the broad advancing shadow of
those mighty events, which in their majestic march
were even then heralded in the distance, and which,
so long afterward, came up in their appointed time in
the consummation of the age.
The Rose frigate was now lying off in the
channel
of Boston harbor, where she had been for about
a week previous to the events which we have
already
recorded. She was now the topic of
universal
conversation, not only in the metropolis, but in
all the neighboring towns. Reports of various kinds
were in circulation relative to her intentions, but
nothing satisfactory could be determined. No
intelligence
had yet reached the people of New England
as to the state of affairs in the mother country; and
though their hopes had all along reposed on Mary
when she should ascend the throne, that consolation
was now taken away by the birth of the Prince of
Wales. Still they confided in the influence of the
Stadtholder, who occupied so important a position in
European politics; and they now heard with
satisfaction
that overtures had been made to him by the
most considerable of the English nobility and
gentry
.
In this state of uncertainty and suspense were
the inhabitants of Boston, expecting on the one
hand, the restoration of their ancient liberties, and
on the other, enduring all the miseries which the
privation imposed. The Rose frigate had been in
their waters for a week or more,Sir Edmund
Andros
had been summoned from New-York,he had
repeatedly met with his council; yet nothing had
publicly transpired, by which it could be ascertained
that any thing had been done for their relief: and,
what excited their suspicion, and made them still
more restless, was, that a further change had, since
the arrival of the frigate, been made in many affairs
of the administration, which, so far from inspiring an
expectation of relief, confirmed their darkest
suspicions
.
Among other movements which alarmed
them was, that several guns had been dismounted from
Fort Hill near the residence of the governor, and
transported on board the frigate; and, in addition,
the arsenal had been deprived of munitions of war,
which were sent to the same destination. The
officers
of the vessel, nevertheless, associated with the
citizens, and seemed by their conduct willing
to allay any apprehensions of evil. But the
jealousy of an injured community is not so
readily
appeased.
There was a group of men standing together at
the end of Long Wharf, an extensive pier which
runs out to the channel of the harbor at the
north-eastern
part of the city, from the termination of the
principal business place, then known as King's
Street. They were looking towards the frigate,
which, as she lay at anchor about a mile off, was
then swinging round with the turning tide, her guns
one by one becoming visible, till her whole broadside
was presented to the town. As her flags streamed to
the breeze in the blaze of noon-day, from her black
masts and rigging painted against the marbled
atmosphere
,
she presented a truly gallant appearance;
and the group of men who were beholding her,
seemed
to take a pride in her beauty.
Several merchant vessels were lying about that part
of the harbor, and half a dozen pleasure-boats were
skimming lightly to and fro, with parties of ladies
and gentlemen, whom curiosity had prompted to take
a look at this important stranger. Most of the stores
on Long Wharf were closed, and the truckmen were
standing about, sunning themselves against the walls,
or perched on the anchors that lay rusting on the
ground. A number of sailors were there also, who
seemed to have nothing to do but to smoke their
pipes in the sunshine, sing ballads, and spin long
yarns.
Among the group of persons to which we have
referred, was a man who seemed to be a master
mechanic
,a
personage about fifty years old, of a
muscular
,
and powerful frame. There was something very
striking in this man's appearance; he had an
expression
of severity about his eyes and mouth, and
he exhibited great vehemence of enunciation and
action, which seemed to make an extraordinary
impression
on those around him. His head was large,
and his features were regular but hard; and his dark
eyes flashed energetically as he spoke. His teeth
were uncommonly white, and they appeared more
so from the darkness of his close-cut mustache. The
other men appeared to be mechanics also. Two of
them were pump and block makers, and the fourth,
who was the principal talker after the
master-mechanic
,
was a calk-and-graver.
And who cares, said the master-mechanic, who
was an anchor-smith, addressing the calk-and-graver
more particularly, but turning his rapid glances
occasionally
towards the others, who cares, neighbor
Bagnal, whether that fine-built vessel is any finer
for
our
bone and muscle or not? She is in want of
refitting if ever a vessel was, but Boston mechanics
don't get any such job as that in a hurry.
If I could get the calking of her, followed
Bagnal, it would give me my winter's wood and
something to boot, I guess. But no luck like that
now a days! I never knew business at such a
standstill
;
did you, Randal?
Never, replied Randal, for that was the name of
the anchor-smith, never!but unless times alter,
it will be the fault of us, the mechanics of Boston,
if we don't re-model, and re-rig, to say nothing of
re-anchoring the public ship.
We are the boys for that business, any day,
exclaimed
the two pump and block makers.
And what do you suppose that yonder
man-o'-war
is sent
here
for? inquired Randal, shaking his
head as he spoke.
It's more than I can do, to tell you, replied
Bagnal
;
but I'll bet the best month's wages of any
11
man's money, that she didn't carry away those
eighteen-pounders
from Fort Hill, and the grape shot and
pikes from the arsenal, for any convenience of our's,
any how.
And I'm just your way of thinking, said
Randal
:
but never mind, my boys, there's more
bending
to be done yet, before you make horse-shoes of
us Yankees, depend on
that;
and he cast a glance
of defiance across the water at the frigate, and
involuntarily
stamped his foot as he spake.
Bagnal! continued the same speaker, pulling
the man he addressed by the skirt of his coat, why
didn't you come to the meeting of our ward last
evening, at the engine house in High Street?
I never knew, replied Bagnal, nor heard of
any meeting, till it was over.
You deserve never to be at another, rejoined
Randal, as long as you live. There was some
speaking to the point, and the best spirit you ever
heard of.
And what would the Governor say to
that?
asked Bagnal, smiling as if he anticipated the answer.
Who cares for the Governor, I want to know?
exclaimed the excited mechanic; the devil take all
such governors, say I;
governors,
indeed!
ginger-bread
men, dolls, jumping-jacks, man-milliners. I
want to know whether our great-grandfathers came
over here to be governed this way? Can any body
answer me
that?
Of course they did no such thing, replied Bagnal,
followed by the echoing assent of the others.
And even if they
did,
resumed Randal, it
would be no reason why we should knock under to
such a lace-bellied set of knaves,and by the fire of
thunder, he continued, lowering his voice as he spoke,
this King James is no better than his underlings.
Not a whitnot a whit; echoed the hearers.
Or else, pursued the speaker, when he came
to the throne, why did he make such fair promises
without any intention of fulfilling them? We might
have known it would be so; and for my part, I never
had any doubt that it was altogether owing to
him
that the last king seized on the charters of the
kingdom
.
Why did the people submit to that,
at the time?
that's what puzzles me, said Bagnal.
It's more than I can tell you, replied Randal;
but you know how easily a colt is broke to the
saddle
.
At first a little kicking and bolting, but very
soon it seems to come as natural as lying.
But I hope that isn't the case with
men,
ventured
one of the pump and block makers.
And why not? said Randal: the man who
submits to the least infringement of his rights,
without
putting a stop to such infringements
peremptorily
,
once and for ever, has lost the only chance he
ever can have of being free. He is situated
precisely
like a woman who has not checked the advances
of licentiousness. If her pursuer has gained
any
advantage, she may attribute her integrity, if it be
retained, to any cause but to the energy of virtue.
According to all that, replied Bagnal, when a
community is once under the thumb of a despot, it
must remain there for ever.
And so it must, added Randal, but for the last
remedy.
Well. said the other, for my part, the sooner
it comes the better, for there never was quite such a
tyranny as ours.
The attention of the group was now turned more
particularly in the direction of the frigate, for one of
her barges was seen advancing toward the shore.
They kept their eyes upon it some time, remarking
the accurate fall and dip of the oars, till Randal
said to them:
Come, let us clear out from this place, for, as sure
as we come in the way of those fellows, we shall
get into a row. There is no use of kicking up a
rumpus at this time of the day,come!
Having made this remarks, Randal turned away
from the bottom of the wharf where he had been
standing, and, followed by his companions, entered a
shop which provided ship-stores. Here they seated
themselves on some barrels which contained sugar
and flour for retailing, and after calling for bread and
cheese, and something to wash the same down, they
resumed their conversation.
There's no use of denying it, said Randal; but
we are on the eve of a revolution. The king, in
trying to cram the Catholic religion down our throats,
is changing the very character of the people
Hallo
!
there, Classon, he exclaimed, as Abner Classon
just then passed by on the wharf,heave to, and
give an account of yourself.
Classon hearing his name called, slackened his
pace, which was directed down the wharf, and
looked
in at the shop door.
Come in, cried Randal, what are you afraid
of? Though we are all Whigs here, we are not
hungry enough to devour such a Tory as you are;
come in, he continued good-naturedly, I want to
have a talk with you.
Classon, who was easily attracted where eating
and drinking were going on, entered readily when
he found the little knot in the shop so agreeably
engaged
;
particularly as they seemed well disposed
towards
him.
You are always at it, somehow, it seems to me,
said Classon; and since your are so pressing, I don't
care if I
do
take a drop of something, for the sake of
drinking his majesty's health
Randal was about to make a truly republican
ackknowledgment
of this proposal, when a tumult was
heard on the wharf at the place they had just left.
Cries of
help! help!
mingled with oaths and
blows, all at once saluted their ears.
11*
The barge! exclaimed Randal.
The bargemen and the truckmen are fighting!
cried Bagnal.
They've insulted the king's officers! shouted
Classon.
Down with them! down with them! screamed
Randal.
So saying, the latter seized a bundle of axe handles,
which, among other articles of a miscellaneous
nature
,
were on sale at the shop, and taking one
himself
,
distributed the rest among his surrounding
associates
,
with whom he sallied forth to join the town
side of the combatants. What was his astonishment,
when, arriving at the scene of disturbance, he found
ten British sailors, with three officers, from the
frigate
,
endeavoring to drag six men to their barge; in
short, a press-gang in the act of kidnapping certain
inhabitants of Boston.
To the rescue! to the rescue! shouted Randal.
Hurrah! hurrah! to the rescue! cried a dozen
others who were by, and had provided themselves
with bludgeons from the same convenient store
house that served Randal.
Let us alone! let us alone, you infernal
scounrels
,
exclaimed the men, four of whom were
truckmen
and two sailors, we are free citizens of Boston;
help! dn you, let us alone: and they struggled,
but in vain, to be released.
Take them to the barge, the blackguard
landlubbers
and whimpering sea-calves, said the chief officer
to the men, while he brandished his cutlass over his
head; drag them into the barge and push off, before
those fellows get heremake haste!
But the assailants from the shop were too quick
for the British press-gang, and Randal with his
followers
were among them in a moment.
Release those men instantly, demanded Randal,
or by the hammers of hell, we will throw every
man of you over-board!
At that moment bang went a pistol from one of
the British officers, the ball from which passed through
the high-crowned hat of the last speaker, and at the
same moment the man who fired it lay rolling on the
wharf. The signal for battle having been thus
promptly followed up, the affray became
immediately
general. To defend themselves from the
assailants
,
the men were instantly released, who readily
joined their friends, and commenced an attack on the
common enemy.
In vain the officers endeavored to rally their men.
Their assailants multiplied every moment, and they
were driven, much battered and bruised, to their
boat. Two of the officers were thrown from the
wharf, and were with difficulty taken up by the
barge. The other made the best of his way there
with the men, and they were fain to escape at all with
their lives. As long as the barge was within hitting
distance, the officers and sailors in her were liberally
saluted with stones, and they revenged themselves as
well as they could by sending back the most
diabolical
threats and imprecations. While this skirmish
was going on, Classon, who dared not take sides so
openly against his fellow-townsmen, though at heart
disposed so to do, as soon as he perceived that the
day was going against the press-gang, skulked
silently
away, and taking the shortest cut he could find,
ran directly to the dwelling-house of the Governor.
The reports of this outrage, and the gallant
bearing
of Randal and his friends, spread like wild-fire
through the town and the surrounding villages, much
magnified and distorted from the truth, as all such
matters invariably are; and amidst the various
conjectures
that occupied the public mind, it was now
believed that the Rose frigate meditated unheard-of
enormities, and was sent to Boston to rivet those chains
which the tyranny of England's kings had so
mercilessly
thrown round the people.
CHAPTER VI.
Here is a manbut 'tis before his face
I will be silent.
Shak.
Troilus and Cressid.
Ultima Cumi venit jam carminis tas.
Virg. Pollio.
As soon as Fitzvassal arrived at the pier in
Boston
,
after leaving the Dolphin well under-weigh for
Nahant, he proceeded immediately to the house of
Mr. Temple, which occupied a beautiful position in
the western part of the town. On inquiry for him
he was promptly introduced into an elegant
apartment
,
which Mr. Temple occupied as a study.
The instant Fitzvassal cast his eyes on that
venerable
man, there was a recognition between them, and
his surprise may be imagined when he discovered in
the person of the gentleman to whom he had
rendered
such signal service, a man who occupied a
distinguished
part in the public affairs of the day, and
with whom he had on the present occasion the most
pressing business.
After the interchange of such courtesies as
naturally
arose from their meeting for the first time
since the memorable event mentioned in the first
chapter, Mr. Temple begged his visitor to be seated:
at the same time Fitzvassal presented him with a
packet which he had brought with him.
Mr. Temple cast his eyes on the envelope, and
immediately
rose from his chair.
I am indebted, then, to Captain Nix, for his
kindness
in bringing this packet? courteously demanded
the venerable man.
Fitzvassal bowed, and replied:
I have the honor, Sir, of bringing you those
despatches
from Sir William Temple.
Really, said Mr. Temple, I very little
suspected
under how great an obligation I was to the gallant
Captain Nix, the other day, when he was
instrumental
in saving the life of my young friend Seymour,
and my own. You are very welcome, Captain,
very.
I was but too happy, replied the pretended
Captain
,
in doing any service to my fellow-men.
Thank you, responded Mr. Temple; will you
permit me to glance at these papers? Any news
from England, you may readily believe, must excite
our earnest curiosity.
Fitzvassal entreated him to use no manner of
ceremony
,
and Mr. Temple broke the seal of the
packet
.
The first paper he opened was a letter from his
kinsman, the baronet, which ran as follows:
Herewith I send very important papers for the
instruction of our friends in Massachusetts. The
bearer, Captain Nix, is a gentleman in every respect
worthy of your confidence. Treat him as he
deserves
I
am much afflicted with the gout, and keep
entirely out of public business. The Prince of
Orange was never so popular as nowbut you
understand
how little I can engage in the events of the
day. I am afraid that his majesty's persecution of
the bishops will subject him to inconvenience.
Your kinsman,
Temple.
My cousin is a profound statesman and a
prudent
politician, thought Mr. Temple; but if he
thinks that men will give him credit for all that he
has promised to the king, I incline to fear he will be
mistaken.
My kinsman, said he, raising his eyes from the
paper, and resting them on the supposed Captain Nix,
alludes to the persecution of the bishops. The
other papers may contain an account of that affair,
but I'm at present wholly in the dark about it. I
perceive
by Sir William's letter that you are a good Whig,
so we may talk about these matters without the
slightest reserve. What
is
this affair of the bishops?
Fitzvassal having been in London at the time,
was fortunately enabled to give an account of that
irritating transaction, which he proceeded to do as
follows:
The king, it seems, had published a second
declaration
of indulgence, by which the Catholics were
to reap too many advantages, and this was ordered
to be read in all the churches. Some half dozen of
the most influential among the bishops, thinking that
they would act contrary to the law if they complied
with this order, petitioned the king to rescind it: but
his majesty, instead of yielding to their request, had
them all sent to the Tower
To the
Tower!
exclaimed the astonished Mr.
Temple; is it possible?
Such is the simple truth, replied Fitzvassal; but
you would have been much more surprised if you
had observed the people when they saw the
ecclesiastics
in the boats on their way thither.
And what did the people do? inquired Mr.
Temple.
Why, Sir, they seemed as if they would go mad.
The whole line of the shore was stowed as close as
possible. Men and women, and even boys and girls,
sent up the most frantic shouts and screams, and even
ran into the water, begging for their blessing, and
calling down the wrath of heaven on their
persecutor
.
It was a rare sight for republicans, and as I
live, I believe one half of England is republican at
this hour.
You are wrong there, my good Sir;
republicanism
can never flourish in England, at least for a very
long time. The moral soil that is necessary for the
sustenance of republicanism is worn out there.
This is the only country where it can ever truly
flourish, you may depend on it.
But the psuedo-captain Nix could not
understand
why republicanism should not thrive as well in
England as in America, and he seemed to think that
what he had himself witnessed there was a positive
proof that it could.
You may observe all the possible difference,
Captain Nix, continued Mr. Temple, between the
republicanism which springs up in the midst of a
court and aristocratic influence, and that which is
generated in the uncontrolled bosom of man. The
plant is an exotic in England, and is only warmed
by a hot-bed;
here
it is indigenous, and is at home
in the open air.
It may be so, said the young man deferentially;
I have never paid much attention to these subjects
but one can't help being something of a politician
in England, where they seem to talk of nothing else
but Dutch wars and state alliances; Whig, Tory,
and Church influence. I never was so tired of any
thing in my life as of the everlasting gabble that
12
was going on from morning to night in the
coffee-houses
and taverns; but the Prince of Orange, after
all, is uppermost in every man's mind.
And what do they say about the Prince,
now-a-days
?
On that subject there are as many opinions,
said Fitzvassal, as upon any other.He is
certainly
exceeding popular, though.
But we, some of us, know more on that head
than the people do; said Mr. Temple, looking at
the supposed Captain Nix, confidentially.
Yes, indeed! replied the other, with a
mysterirous
smile, that was intended to disguise the fact
that he did not understand at what the venerable
gentleman was driving; I presume those papers
contain the substance of every thing.
No doubtno doubt, returned Mr. Temple;
but I hope matters will not be precipitated in
England
.
I believe that if things are prudently
managed, James may be compelled to abdicate, and
William of Orange be placed on the throne.
In an instant Fitzvassal's mind was illuminated
upon the whole matter in hand, and he discovered
at a glance the actual posture of public affairs; he
therefore promptly replied:
You may depend on our prudence, Mr. Temple,
we are well persuaded that it is absolutely
necessary
to act with the utmost caution.
Mr. Temple now proceeded to examine the
documents
which had been transmitted from his
kinsman
in England, and among others he found a
communication
from the Massachusetts agents,
lamenting
that, though they had used every endeavor,
and applied every argument to persuade the king to
restore the charter, he peremptorily refused to do so;
so that there remained but little hope of its final
accomplishment
.
The old gentleman's countenance fell when he
received
this intelligence, and he turned to the other
mournfully, saying;
So then, it seems that the king has refused to
restore
our charter! Can this be possible? he added,
musing; can James be so infatuated as to suppose
that the people of this colony can much longer
submit
to these arbitrary encroachments? Captain
Nix! I hope that you will not find it necessary
to return immediately to England. I can see a
storm brewing in the political horizon, in which it
will require all the stout hands we can pipe to
quarters
to keep the ship afloat. We may require your
services.
And you shall most assuredly have them, replied
Fitzvassal, a thought suddenly flashing across his
mind that an opportunity might now offer itself to
further his suit with Grace Wilmer, who occupied
so large a share of his mind and nearly all his
affection
.
You shall most assuredly have them, Mr.
Temple. My vessel, which is armed for any
emergency
,
will be ever ready at a moment's warning.
Thank you, thank you heartily, Captain Nix;
and if, in the mean time, you are in want of stores,
ammunition, or even money, you will find no
difficulty
in procuring them. You shall be amply
provided
.
Where is your vessel?
Fearing that Sir Edmund Andros would find
these papers, and discover my relation to the
malcontents
,
I thought it prudent for my officers to keep
her down the bay, out of sight;for, to tell you
the truth, Sir, just such an emergency as that you
have suggested, presented itself to my mind from the
first.
It was wisely thought, said Mr. Temple.
This now is a great relief to my mind; are you in
want of any thing?
I am most liberally provided, replied Fitzvassal,
it is not probable that either I or my vessel will
require
any thing during our stay.
It would be desirable for you, if you could make
it convenient, to reside in the town, urged Mr.
Temple
;
for if you find it necessary to be absent, it
would not be an easy matter to communicate with
you.
I can readily manage that, replied Fitzvassal;
but it may be necessary first to absent myself for a
day or two, in order to make suitable
arrangements
.
I must introduce you, said Mr. Temple, to the
members of the Committee of Safety, which is
hardly
known to exist. Only the leading men in Boston
are in the secret. You are aware that I hold a
conspicuous
station;it is as chairman of that
committee
that I do so. Of course you know nothing
about it when away.
I think I comprehend you fully, returned the
other, and it would give me great pleasure to meet
with your associates.
It will be necessary for you to conduct yourself
with great circumspection while you remain in
town, said Mr. Temple, the officers of Sir
Edmund
Andros are extremely vigilant; and if it were
suspected that you are the agent of the English
Whigs, there is no calculating with what severity
they would treat you.
It appears to me, replied Fitzvassal, from all
that I can discover, that you are enduring a more
humiliating
tyranny in America than in England.
Usurpation seems to have gone greater lengths here
than there, and it would appear that this country had
been selected on purpose to ascertain to what extent
unbridled ambition might impose on
human
patience
.
And you will find, when you come to know the
people better, said the venerable Temple, that, in
proportion to the patience and fortitude with which
they endure such tyranny while there is hope of its
12*
removal, will be their courage and perseverance in
resisting it when it becomes no longer a virtue to
endure. The people in the country towns are
already
on the eve of rebellion, and it is with the
greatest
difficulty that their indignation can be restrained.
The government, who now are in the city, are on
the brink of a volcano. It has been our
endeavor
to suppress any outbreak, so confident have we
been that his majesty would not refuse that justice
which we claim. Even now, when it seems to be
peremptorily denied us, if the committee will follow
my advice, it will keep back the communication of
our agents from the people, in the humble trust that
something, which we know to be in preparation, may
yet mature for our relief.
Yet it may be advantageous for the people of
these colonies, said Fitzvassal, after a long pause,
during which he seemed to be reflecting on the
observations
of Mr. Temple, that they should have such
a seasonable taste of tyranny, in order that they may
be able fully to realize its odious character.
There is much good sense in that suggestion,
replied Mr. Temple; and for that very reason the
tyranny which is here suffered, is more deeply felt,
and may be the more readily thrown off. The very
contrast of their condition now, with what it was but
six or seven years ago, before they were robbed of
their charter, will only operate to endear to them
those rights of which no earthly power can
deprive
them: for, mark what I say, Captain Nix, the
people do not recognize any deprivation of their
rights, or any actual extinction of their charter,they
are perfectly conscious of their situation, and they
know well enough that they have been called upon to
endure a trial of their faith; this trial they are
passing
through, and the time is near at hand for their
deliverance. Observe the result, and then tell me
whether the people of Massachusetts are not true to
that best blood that ever flowed in the veins of man.
While Mr. Temple spoke, his fine face glowed
with the enthusiasm of a seer, and Fitzvassal gazed
on him with admiration.
Young man, resumed the sage, who seemed to
represent the embodied truths which actuated the
great men who first colonized North America, and
now appeared to be endeavoring to transmit their
spirit to posterity in the individual personation
before
him, young man, they singularly misjudge
who regard this land merely as an unexhausted field,
where money may be more readily gamed than in
the older hemisphere. The facility for acquiring
wealth is undoubtedly greater than in England or
anywhere else, and that facility will in after-times,
even more than now, stimulate the avarice of men,
and lead them away to pioneer in wildernesses yet
unexplored, and thus lay the foundation for that
edifice
which is destined to astonish and delight the
world by the sublimity and beauty of its
architecture
.
Fitzvassal betrayed, by the expression of his
countenance, that he did not understand the drift of
this discourse.
I perceive, resumed Mr. Temple, that I am
speaking
too much in parables; but when I reflect on the
high destinies of this part of the American
continent
,
I have no language to express my thoughts,
which flow in upon my mind like realities. Every
valuable plant that has survived in the nurseries of
European civilization will hereafter be transplanted
in this garden of established truth.
Do not believe what men will tell you hereafter,
that the form of government which must inevitably
arise here, and be carried into full effect, is only an
experiment, which haply may fail in the end. Point
such men to the grandeur of those confederacies
which could never have decayed under the
invigorating
influences of America; tell them that the
experiment
of self-government, and of many
governments
under one, has been tried over and over again,
and that the object and end of every experiment was
to show future generations in America how far the
civil liberty and greatness of a nation might be
elevated
,
if they would at once take an example and a
warning from the past; and while you point with
one hand to that past, be careful to direct the other
to the future;that while you show them the
principles
on which their greatness must be founded,
they may learn to see through their apparent destiny
the more substantial glories that await them.
Every thing, continued the seer, is
progressive
;
but there never has been a complete antitype
of that progress which I see sketched out before me
in the great future, when the people of America, like
one immense heart, shall give vitality to the vast
territory
that stretches between the two oceans, and from
the lakes to the Gulf of Mexico.
Fitzvassal now gazed on the speaker with more
amazement than everand it did not escape the eye
of Mr. Temple.
Your astonishment may increase, resumed he,
if you will contemplate a population of four
hundred
millions of men actuated by one paramount
object
,
and speaking one common language.
I must confess, said Fitzvassal, that my
imagination
is not large enough to grasp so
comprehensive
a picture. To my mind, such a future
is too full of impossibilities. It can never be.
What conceivable ground is there for so
magnificent
an anticipation?
Do you imagine, resumed Mr. Temple, that
the immeasurable past has been the theatre of
unmeaning events; that innumerable millions of
men have been born, matured into thinking beings,
and then changed into non-apparent forms; that
kingdoms and empires have arisen and fallen; that
systems of government have been established and
destroyed; that the relations of man, in all their vast
extent, have been explored, the rational and affective
faculties analyzed and arranged; that the physical
regions of the universe have been investigated from
suns and their systems, to the smallest animalcules
that float in a cup of water; that in the midst of the
great elaboration of wonders, light should at certain
intervals dawn on the darkness of man's
apprehension
,
and give him a brighter intelligence; and,
what is more, can you imagine that there should be
given to man that sublime and transcendant logic,
which, taking the mighty past and the present for
the terms of a universal syllogism, he is enabled to
be the prophet of the future;can you imagine, I say,
that all this has been in vain and without an object?
When there is nothing so humble in nature, but that
its use is readily determined, who can be so
irrational
as to suppose that the aggregate of all things is
for no determinate object?
I must admit, said Fitzvassal, that you speak
according to reason; yet I cannot discover any thing
in the past, as far as my exceedingly limited
knowledge
extends, to favor the gigantic anticipations
which you entertain with respect to America.
Nevertheless you may rely on their accuracy,
replied Mr. Temple, with a glow of enthusiasm;
and I adduce my authority from the very nature of
things, as in their development they express the
determinations
of heaven.
You think, then, that this country is
destined
to
be great, said Fitzvassal, venturing another
objection
to the religio-philosophic scheme of Mr.
Temple
;
if
destiny
has any thing to do with it, what
becomes of that boasted
liberty
which is to flourish
here?
What men call destiny is only another name for
order, replied Mr. Temple: but from a habit of
associating order with nothing that is not
beauful
and pleasing, they do not recognize the relation
of end, cause, and effect, in apparently discordant
phenomena: but the truth is, that every moral
as well as physical manifestation is dependent on
spiritual causes. I do not know whether you fully
understand me, continued he, but you must
acknowledge
that when a man is about to commit any
act, he has an inseparable object in view; as, for
instance
,
pleasure or the gratification of the mind.
Certainly, admitted Fitzvassal.
Of course, then, he
wills
to do the thing
designed
,
said Mr. Temple.
I cannot understand that this follows of course,
objected Fitzvassal; for I believe that a man often
wills one thing and does another, and now I think of
it, I recollect hearing my mother read something just
like that out of the Bible.
There is such a passage in Paul's letter to the
Romans, replied the philosopher; but Paul
declared
,
in his religious letters, that he spake after the
manner of men; and when he expressed the
natural
feeling we have described, he only meant to
say that he willed to do that which he had learned
to be contrary to right, and that he did not will to do
that which he knew to be according to goodness; or,
in plainer language, he lamented that his sense of duty
and his fondness for the same, were in opposition to
each other.
I think I understand you then to say, said
Fitzvassal
,
that whatever a man does, however
repugnant
it may be to his taste or inclination, he must do
it
voluntarily
.
Precisely, added the philosopher; for,
without
the will, we cannot move a finger, and as we will,
so we act. In every act, therefore, man proposes
some end as the result of the action, and this end
may be good or it may be bad. Man must then be
in a state of equilibrium between good and evil, and
his
will
to do one or the other determines his
character
.
Recollect now the distinction between an
inclination to do, and a will
not
to do; for, however
much a man may be tempted to commit an act by a
strong inclination that way,if from a sense of duty
he does
refrain
from so doing, his will has triumphed,
and his freedom brings joy, because it is in the right.
I wish, ejaculated Fitzvassal, that I could
have had the privilege of knowing you before.
I thank you, replied Mr. Temple, gratified but
not flattered by this involuntary tribute to truth, I
thank you; or rather, I ought to say that it gives
me pleasure to find a man whose daily pursuits more
or less lead him away from such reflections as these
we are now indulging, taking any pleasure in them;
for it is the truth, and not its medium, with which
you are captivated; and I am glad that it is so. But
do not let us lose sight of our present object; you
understand now that there is no such power as
destiny; do you not?
Yes; if you mean, said the pupil, that all
human conduct must, when we examine it closely,
be regarded as voluntary.
That is all I mean; resumed Mr. Temple; for
if all actions of men are voluntary, liberty is only
another name for their inseparable condition; but
this moral liberty is distinct from civil liberty, for the
former is vital and the latter accidental.
I never thought of the distinction before, said
Fitzvassal, but I perceive that it is so.
The highest degree of liberty, therefore, which
a man can enjoy, is the liberty of freedom, or the
unrestrained
permission of co-operating with the
infinite
will in the completion of all good works.
I begin now to perceive the application of your
philosophy to the matter in hand, said Fitzvassal.
For you will find, continued the philosopher,
that the infinite
will
proposes great moral ends, and
13
that he uses spiritual causes, which ultimate in
natural
effects. The operations of external nature and
the conduct of men are the effects from these causes
and ends.
It would seem then, objected Fitzvassal, that
bad actions are means of divine operation; for we
find even more bad than good actions in all ages.
You are partly mistaken, replied his teacher,
yet are partly right. As the divine providence
proposes
the good of man, it wills that man may be
good; but since man is at liberty to do as he loves
to do, it is plain there is only one possible way
in which such a co-operation can be effected, and
that is, by a man shunning evil as sin; for, so long
as he indulges even an affection for sin, it is
impossible
for his will, which is his love, to co-act with the
divine will for his benefit. Evil is of many degrees
of enormity, and sometimes less evil is permitted to
prevent the appearance of greater. In this sense
evil may sometimes be considered as according to
the providence of God.
The conduct of an individual, then, suggested
Fitzvassal, is not only important as it regards
himself
,but
as it must affect the whole society of mankind.
Not only so, said Mr. Temple, but as a stone
thrown from the hand effects a change in the
balance
of the whole Solar System, so the smallest
activity
of man's has its influence through the
immeasurable
all of intellect and of affection.
Still, replied Fitzvassal, I cannot understand
the necessity of evil.
The word
necessity,
said the philosopher, ought
to be expunged from the vocabulary of man, because
it has no meaning. In common discourse it implies
the absence of a cause, when in fact it was intended
to admit one, though it be inconceivable. It is more
rational to say that evil abounds, because man being
free to choose, voluntarily does that which he
erroneously
supposes to be good when it is not so; or
voluntarily does that which he
knows
to be evil. If
man were perfect, he could not be progressive, and
he
is
progressive, because he is constantly separating
evil from good; and thus, by preferring the latter,
assimilating
his own will to that which is infinite.
There must be yet a deeper reason for the
existence
of evil than that you have stated, suggested
Fitzvassal.
And there
is
a deeper reason for it, replied the
sage; the state of perfection is a state of
innocence
.
A departure from this state is a state of
conscious
nakedness, an idea which implies a knowledge
of good only through its opposite, evil. So long as
a man is inclined to evil, through the gratification
arising from its imagination, and yet refrains from
committing it, not on account of its wickedness, but
for some mere worldly consideration,he deceives
himself if he supposes that he is a moral man and
is free from contamination: such a man would
do what he longs to be about, if the worldly
restraints
were removed from him; and therefore he
is at heart very far from pure. It is on this account
that where man is inclined to evil, and deceives
himself, he is permitted to do overtly what he
inwardly
desires; and thus he is no longer deceived
as respects himself, but may now renounce what he
knows and experiences to be bad.
Fitzvassal admitted the cogency of this argument.
You have opened, said he to his instructor, an
entirely new field for my mind to labor in, and I
thank you for it. In recognizing the idea of progress,
I can readily understand how all the by-gone
transactions
of mankind are directed with a view to their
final development: and how
the spiritual character
of man is the real creation which
IS TO BE
HEREAFTER
,
and which is fore-shadowed in existing
nature
.
You will find no difficulty then, resumed Mr.
Temple, in comprehending the destiny (for we
may now use the word without danger,) the destiny,
I repeat it, of this North American continent. And
do not for a moment imagine that the tyranny or
ambition of all the kings on earth can quench the
spirit which at this moment burns within the bosoms
of Americans. That spirit is not a mere emotion,
which has been suddenly kindled in young and
energetic bosoms; but it is, so to speak, the very
flower and fragrance of all human thought, action,
and experience; and it has been directed to these
majestic dwelling-places of untutored man, that it
may not be polluted by the malaria of privileged
orders
,
but that it may expand itself to the broad light
of the immortal sun, and grow in the warm
effulgence
of heaven.
The clock now struck eleven, and warned our
adventurer
to depart; but before he went, he accepted
the invitation of Mr. Temple to stay at his house, and
regard it as entirely his home whenever he could
complete his arrangements to make Boston his
temporary
abode.
13*
CHAPTER VII.
I do remember an apothecary.
Romeo and Juliet
.
Oh God! this is death.
George IV
.
Fitzvassal
left the house of Mr. Temple with
his mind crowded with the revelations of truth which
had been opened to him that evening. He now began
to feel that his voyage of life had heretofore been
pursued
without compass or chart, and he could not help
regretting that more light had not been imparted to
him, by which he might have avoided the quicksands
and breakers upon which he had run.
It is singular, thought he, as he paced his way
along in the clear moonlight, descending from the
common, it is very singular how every thing that
man said this evening seemed to me, as soon as I
understood it, like an old familiar truth. Why could
not I have arrived at the same conclusions without
his assistance, and in what consists the difference
between us? He seems to stand on an elevation
above me, so that his eye embraces a wider compass:
but I believe I discerned every object which he
pointed
out to me, and why could not I have seen them
as well as he if I had occupied the same ground?
New light seemed now to be dawning upon him;
his mind had foliated under the vernal influences of
a re-producing sun, and a wider surface was
present-sented
for radiant heat to act on.
It must be, thought he, that the difference
among minds consists more in the point of view from
which objects are seen, than from any radical,
essential
difference among them. And if this is true, our
ability to discern the true relations of things
principally
depends on the ground we occupy.
Fitzvassal felt that a new era of existence had
opened for him, and as he gazed upon the full-orbed
moon scudding away from the clouds, and
illuminating
the fathomless abyss, he thought how beautifully
it seemed the emblem of his own present condition,
reflecting the more subtile influences of another mind,
and driving away the errors that enveloped it, as
that influence descended into the depths of his being,
and spread light where all before was darkness.
From these lofty associations, his mind wandered
to the dwelling-place of Grace Wilmer, which he was
now slowly approaching. The streets were as silent
as in a city of the dead. There stood the house,
bathed in the moonlight, and it seemed to him the
holiest place on earth. Fitzvassal leaned on the rude
fence that divided the common from the street; and
while the beautiful elms waved gently above him,
and threw their fantastic shadows on the ground, he
gave free action to his heated and uncontrollable
fancy, and revelled in the fairy dreams of voluptuous
romance.
There is an involuntary as well as a voluntary
sympathy in our natures; and though the beautiful
and adored object of his love was dreaming all the
while of Seymour, the energetic mind of Fitzvassal
broke in upon her pure Arcadia, and she murmured
in her sleep from the momentary influence of his
passion.
Who shall go down into the depths of the human
heart, and unriddle all its mysteries: who shall bring
up its joys and its woes, and analyze them in his
mystic crucible?Oh love! human, passionate
affection
!
there is more in your least emotion than
poet ever revealed or philosopher thought of: but
there is a love of self, so like to its heavenly radiance,
that the angels are themselves deceived while they
rain down upon the heart the gladness of their happy
paradise.
As Fitzvassal was indulging in the luxury of
fancy-woven
images of love and beauty, a sound
arrested
his attention, that seemed to come from the very
depths of woe. He turned himself round in the
direction
whence the sound proceeded, but all again
was silent. He listened attentively, but it was not
repeated; and then, supposing that it proceeded from
his heat-oppressed brain, he relapsed again into the
indulgence of his rapt imagination.
Fitzvassal had already forgotten the occurrence
just mentioned, and was now completely lost in
reveries
of enchantment, when he observed a small
figure emerge from the shadow of a tree, and
cautiously
approach him. As it drew near, he
perceived
that it was a boy, apparently eleven years old; his
clothes much tattered, without any shoes on his feet.
He held a very much torn hat in his hand, and when
he hobbled within ten feet of his object, he stopped,
and asked in a very imploring tone:
A little charity, if you please, Sir!
The stepson of Abner Classon was what is
commonly
called a generous man: that is to say, he did
not love money for itself, and he was willing to
share what he possessed with others. He therefore,
as he happened to have money enough with him,
threw a piece of silver into the boy's hat without any
farther reflection, and walked away; for he had not
yet descended into the sanctuary of sorrow and been
baptized by the tears of human affliction. He who
had wanted sympathy without being conscious of
the want, had not learned that this, above most other
things, is salutary to man.
As he walked away, his thoughts already
reverting
to the same current, that can hardly be said
to have been been disturbed by this little incident,
he heard the same expression of grief which had
arrested
his attention some moments before, and he
now turned about, determined to ascertain its cause.
He soon discovered that the sounds proceeded from
the little boy who had seated himself on a stone in
the shade of a tree not far from where he had been
standing, and was now sobbing piteously.
There is no deception
here,
thought our
adventurer
;
I must find out what ails that boy; he
seems to be in great distress.
What is the matter, my little man? inquired
Fitzvassal of the shivering, sobbing boy.
But he returned no answer, except to sob the
more.
Are you ill? said he, as gently as he knew how
to ask.
I am cold, at last moaned the boy, andI
havn't had any thing to eat for two days.
And can't you buy something with the money I
have given you?
The shops are all shut up, replied the
half-famished
sufferer, and mammymammy isdying
And he burst into an agony of grief, and wrung
his hands, which glistened in the moonlight with the
tears that fell fast upon them.
But this will never dothis will never do, said
Fitzvassal, his sailor heart taking pity on the lonely
boy, and trying all he could to convey
encouragement
by his tone; we must see what can be done
for you. Your mammy shall not die, if I can do
any thing to save her.
And he then thought of his own mother, whom he
had not seen for years, and he could have wept with
the boy in right earnest.
Come, my little man, said he, patting him on
his head, go with me down to the apothecary's shop
yonder, and I guess we will contrive to get you
something to eat, and to take home to your mammy.
So saying, he took the boy by the hand, and led
him along with him till they stopped at an apothecary's
store with the sign of Galen's head, situated on
Cornhill
,
at the corner of what is now called Winter Street.
A dim light gleamed through the window, where was
placed several globular vessels with colored water in
them, and a number of chemical instruments, the
like of which have been in use time out of mind.
Fitzvassal knocked at the door, and almost
immediately
there were indisputable indications within
that the summons was about to be obeyed; for the
crash of a broken vial saluted the auditory nerves of
the customers.
In a minute or two the door was unbarred, and a
little hump-back man, with his head in a red nightcap,
made his appearance, holding in his hand a
tea-saucer
containing a burning taper.
The disciple of Galen was a middle-aged man,
who, could he have stood up straight, would have
measured five feet in his stockings; but, besides being
very much warped in the back, he stooped
considerably
.
He was very much goggle-eyed withal, an
indication of loquacity which the volubility of his
utterance
perfectly well answered. His nose, which
was naturally large and shaped at the end like a
Florence
flask or a full-blown bladder, was very much
the color of a beet that had been half bled to death,
while the mazes of the vine were pictured there in
exact representation, by the purple veins, several of
which seemed to have broken into one. He wore
under his nightcap a little cow-tail looking scratch,
which came straggling about his ears, and almost
veiled his eyes that were as red as a blistered skin,
and seemed like the peepers of an angry crab. When
he spoke to one, he kept them constantly rolling;
while as often as he could, he supplied his
hungry-looking
nose with snuff. He held the taper with his
left hand, and as he opened the door the light
gleamed over his face while he said:
What will you have to-night? what will you
have to-night, good man? Have you any
prescription
from the doctor?
Please to let us in, Mr. Saultz, for that was the
appellation of the apothecary, who had been a
fixture
in that place as long as Fitzvassal remembered;
please to let us in, I have an especial favor to ask
of you.
And so saying, he placed a piece of gold in the
druggist's
hand, which made him for once set his eyes
like those in a figure of wax, or like a boiled lobster's.
And what am I to do with all this, please you,
good man? exclaimed the gobbo, in astonishment;
what am I to do with all this, please you, good
man? You don't want it all in physic, do you?
For if you do, it will buy a precious quantity.
Perhapsah, I see how it is, said he, looking up
and discovering the mariner's dress of Fitzvassal,
I see how it isyou want to get a medicine chest,
I know you doare you going to the West Indies, or
are you
You misunderstand me altogether, said the
mariner, I am not at present in want of any
medicine
,
though I don't know how soon I may be; for
this lad here tells me that his mother is dying
and
Bless my stars! interrupted Saultz, you don't
say so? Well, I've got the best assortment of physic
you ever saw, and I will let you have it in any
quantity
.
I tell you that I don't want any of your drugs
and when I do, I will let you know, said our
adventurer
,
who was getting out of patience with the
garrulous
compounder of medicines: what I want of
you now is, to procure something for this boy to eat,
for he is half starved to death.
You don't say so! exclaimed goggle-eyes with
unaffected astonishment; poor little thing, is it
14
possible! Pray take my advice then, continued he,
and let him be very careful that he don't eat too
much all of a suddenfor it sometimes happens
For heaven's sake, cried Fitzvassal, have done
with this gabble, and tell me whether you can get
something for this child to eat? The shops are all
shut up, and we can't find any thing this time o'
night anywhere.
Why couldn't you go to the Red Lion yonder?
I guess they could have accommodated you;
but never mind, I can get something for you, if I can
only rouse up my good wife;wait a minutewait
a minute and sit down.
Whereupon Mr. Saultz very deliberately left the
shop, and thereby afforded his customer a better
opportunity
of examining the apartment: but he first
obliged the little sufferer to sit down on a snuff-keg
which was there, with a word or two of
encouragement
that it wouldn't be a long time before the
apothecary procured something for him to eat and to
carry to his mother.
The boy, though very ragged, had nothing else in
his appearance, like most beggars, to awaken
disagreeable
feelings; for his face and hands were clean, and
he gathered his naked feet under him, evidently from
a sense of shame rather than from the effect of cold;
and this expression of delicacy did not belie him,
though it did not do him justice; for his
mortificacation
proceeded from a fear that his squalid, or
rather
destitute state might reflect unfavorably on his
generous protectress.
How little do they who have grown up to man's
estate trouble themselves about the feelings of
children
!
It would really seem as if they fancied that
children were destitute of all those fine and delicate
springs of emotion which are recognized in maturer
life, and are the sources of all our joys and sorrows.
It is time that the grown world went to school to
some one who has not forgotten the tender
susceptibilities
of childhood, that it may learn to
sympathize
with the little sufferers. The germinating bud
has within its folded recesses all the beauty and the
fragrance of the flower; and the gentle distillations
of heaven sink as sweetly into its secluded shrine,
and the sunbeams fall there as soothingly, as on the
prouder petals that would claim all to themselves.
How many a sweet spirit withers beneath the
blighting
frown of an unsympathizing guardian; how many
a one retires to weep in solitude, because it is not
loved as it would be, and is not comprehended in its
affection! We little imagine what arcana we read
when the words of such is the kingdom of heaven
pass from our unheeded utterance!
The shop of Mr. Saultz was unlike any thing of
sort we would find in these days of improvement. It
looked more like the beginning of a museum than
any thing else; the shelves were filled, without much
order or arrangement, with bottles of various
descriptions
and sizes, interspersed with paper bundles
labelled as containing drugs and garden seeds, much
covered with dust, as though they had not been
disturbed
for years. Shells of various kinds were
scattered
here and there, and minerals in abundance. In
one corner of the room were seen the legs and feet
of a skeleton, hanging from under a very dusty and
old blue cloak; while from the ceiling, in the
opposite
corner, was suspended the skin and feathers of
an enormous screech-owl, gloaming on you with his
his round beady eyes. On the counter were several
jars of snuff, a box of wax candles, another of Dutch
pipes, and a pair of medicine scales. Over the
fireplace
were hanging two nearly obliterated engravings
in black frames, and one other round black frame,
a little over the others in the centre, contained five
profiles, cut from black paper on a white ground.
In the fireplace was a heap of smouldering ashes,
showing that the embers had been covered up; and on
one side, in the corner of the same, a tea-kettle was
swinging from the end of three interlocked pot-hooks,
the uppermost of which was attached to a large
crane. Near the fireplace was a round table, of hard
black wood like ebony; this stood on three claw feet,
supported by a stem, the whole like a bird's leg and
foot. The top of the table swung up and down, and
it now stood against one corner of the room like a
target
.
The shop was separated from the sleeping-room
of Mr. Saultz and his wife by a door, the upper half of
which was glazed, with a curtain of spotted calico on
the inside for the security and convenience of those
within.
While Fitzvassal was waiting for the
re-appearance
of Saultz, and was in the meantime amusing
himself by running his eyes over the premises, the
latter had dispelled the visions of undarned hose and
unpatched inexpressibles, and the phantoms of
sausage
meat, bacon, and smoked herrings, which danced
in strange confusion before the nocturnal vision of
Mistress Debora Saultz.
Good wife! good wife, exclaimed Saultz, the
smothered tones struggling through the door to the
shop; Debora, I say!
Yawaw! gaped the bewildered housewife,
brown soapsmoked herrings!
Good wife, I say! good wife! wake up, I say,
Debby! and from the sound that found its way to
the shop, Fitzvassal knew that the apothecary was
trying to shake the drowsiness out of his wife; get
up, good wifemarry I saystir your stumps
come!
Lord a' massy, Simonyawaw! replied the
dame, unconscious as yet of life; you're always
disturbing
a body.
Can't you get up? asked the apothecary, who
thought that his spouse was waking.
Soapherrings,murmured the woman with
14*
a long-drawn sighand she was sound asleep again
in a moment.
Seeing this, the desperate apothecary seized his rib
by the shoulders and shook her with all his might,
crying lustily at the same time;
Debby! Debby! stir your old lazy stumpsthe
house is a-fire!
This appalling sound, with the unaccustomed
agitation
of her mortal body, brought Mistress Saultz
bolt upright in bed in an instant, in another instant,
she was on her feet, crying out with all the agitation
conceivable,
Lord a' massy on us!is the house a-fire, sure
enough?Oh Simon, Simon; Oh my bacon, my
bacon
,
Lord a' massy on us!
The house has no notion of being a-fire, said
the apothecary, I only wanted to wake you, that's
all.
Lord, how you frightened a body;Oh dear!
I never shall get over it as long as I live, I am all
in a flusterationOh dear me! how came you to do
soyou good-for-nothing,you!
Debby, my love! said her husband, willing to
pacify her, you are well paid for this disturbance
see here!
And he placed in her hand the piece of gold that
Fitzvassal had given to him in advance for services
to be rendered.
And, my dearhe continuedthe good man
who gave you that, wants you to get something for
a poor hungry boy he has brought with him.
It would be difficult to say how large a share
the little yellow piece of eloquence had in moving
the sensibilities of Mistress Saultz; but at any rate
we will give the woman her due, and allow her that
large share of good-heartedness which seems to be
the common inheritance of her sex, and which even
vice and crime cannot wholly obliterate in their
bosoms; we will not pretend to analyze her motives
too closely, but she immedately exclaimed, on this
intelligence being imparted to her by her husband;
Massy on us! the dear, poor creature! Oh, yes,
Simon, it well becomes Christian folks to help the
poor and needy;there's the sausage-meat that was
left to-day, you know,and there's some cold
chocolate
that's easily warmed;do you kindle some fire,
Simon, and I'll be ready presently;the poor dear
boy! and so he
shall
have something to eat, he
shall!
And while she was so speaking, she was bustling
about and hurrying on her clothes with all possible
despatch.
Saultz, in the meantime, gathered together some
chips, and raking out the live coals from the ashes,
proceeded to build a fire: and as he was thus busily
employed, his guests drew nigh to catch the earliest
heat that was evolved from the crackling wood.
In a few minutes after, Mistress Saultz appeared,
with a stew-pan in her hand, courtesying as she
came to the man who had given gold for his
necessities
,
and patting the poor boy under the chin so
affectionately
,
that he broke out again into fresh
sobbings
,
while the big tears coursed down his cheeks.
Don't cry now, said the kind-hearted woman,
hoping to soothe the feelings of the child, don't cry,
my dear little fellow; you shall soon have
something
to eat,Simon! Simon, I say, get some more
chips here; you can never get the chocolate to boil
with such a fire as thismassy on us, what's got
into
the good man!
I can't find any more kindlings, Debby,
answered
Simon, can I split up this old cover here?
Lord a'massy on us!do hear the good man;
can he be crazy? Why, the next thing he'll be doing,
will be to split up the window shutters;go along
into the wood-house, Simon, there are plenty of chips
there;break up the boxes, indeed!I should like
to see it done in
my
house:If it wasn't for us
women
,
I don't know how the men
would
get along;
break up the boxes? I should like to see him do
it!
But before she had done talking about it, Saultz
had very meekly withdrawn on his wife's errand,
and he now appeared with his arms full of dry chips,
which were laid upon the fire, that soon imparted a
genial warmth to the room.
The good wife now brought out the
target-looking
table from the corner of the room, which she
spread with a clean white cloth, on which she placed
a couple of bowls; for, may be, she said, the
gentleman
himself would like to taste a spoonful of
chocolate
on such a coolish night.
Fitzvassal thanked the woman, but told her that
he did not require any food.
Mistress Saultz now poured out the steaming
chocolate, and encouraged the boy to partake of it
after adding suitable quantities of milk and sugar:
and the little fellow drank it with all the
eagerness
that might have been expected in one of his years,
who had tasted nothing for two days.
As the boy became refreshed by the food, his
countenance
brightened up, and he would now and then
cast a look upon his benefactors, a look in which a
sweet smile was blended with more familiar
melancholy
,
as if he had not words to express his
gratitude
,
but would have those to whom he was
indebted
be sensible of his feelings.
I wish, said he at last, breaking silence, and
heaving a sigh as if a part of his grief had been
taken from him, I wish mammy could have
something
too.
And hasn't your mammy any thing to eat no
more than youpoor, dear soul? inquired the
good-hearted
woman.
At this, the little fellow burst into tears again,
moved by the remembrance of his grief, and
melted
by the music of human sympathy.
I'll tell you what it is, exclaimed Fitzvassal,
turning to Saultz and his wife, who were sitting
by the table, and leaning their elbows there in a mood
of considerable interest, I'll tell you what it is
I am determined, now I'm in for it, to see the end
of this business. I met this little half-starved boy
in the street, and he told me that his mother was
dying
of hunger.
Lord 'a massy on usyou don't say so?
ejaculated
Mistress Deborah.
A thousand pities! joined Mr. Saultz.
And who knows, resumed Fitzvassal, but that
this poor woman is at this moment all alone; no
hand to help her, and destitute of common
comforts
?
May be she is lying inconjectured Mrs.
Saultz.
Is any body with your mother? inquired our
adventurer.
No, Sir, sobbed the boy, she is all alone.
When did you leave her?
At sun-down, Sir; she told me to call on the
governor.
And did you do so?
Yes; I went to his house on Fort-Hill.
Well! said his benefactor, did you inquire for
him?
Yes, Sir; but the servant turned me away.
The monster! exclaimed Fitzvassal, but
reflecting
a moment, he added; the man didn't realize
that you were so much in want. How far off does
your mother live?
Close by, Sir.
Will you go with me to the place?
Oh yes, indeed, yes indeed! exclaimed the boy,
who, never dreaming of so much kindness, was half
frantic with joy at the very suggestion.
And now, my good woman, said Fitzvassal,
turning to Mistress Saultz, and putting two pieces of
gold in her hand, I shall want you to go with us.
Oh certainly, replied the dame, rising and
court-seying
,
certainly, Sir, if good man has no objections:
and perhaps I had better take with me a leetle
motherwort
;
for if the poor woman, as is very likely,
should be really lying in, it would be a blessed
comfort
to her, as sure as you are born.
You have no objections to your wife's
accompanying
us? said Fitzvassal, rather inquiringly, and at
the same time placing a piece of gold in his hand
also
;
she may be wanted, and I shall probably require
some medicines, for which I will pay you most
liberally
.
Not the slightest objectionnot the slightest
answered the man, all but dumb-foundered by the
quantity of gold that had so suddenly fallen upon
himGo, get your hood, Debby, and go with this
gentleman;and if there is any cupping or bleeding
to be doneahem!
We shall certainly let you know, interrupted
Fitzvassal, helping out the assumed modesty of
goggle-eyes
,
and finishing what he would have said:
we shall certainly let you know, and shall depend
on your services; in which case you shall be paid
extra.
The apothecary's face shone with marked evidence
of satisfaction at this assurance, and Mistress Debora
turned into the bed-room, and in a minute after
re-appeared
with her cloak and hood on.
And now, exclaimed the woman, I only want
to get the motherwort, and then I shall be all ready;
poor, dear creature, I hope the child wont be born
and no motherwort tea for the woman;Simon,
sweet-heart! get an ounce of motherwort.
And Mistress Debora assumed all the blandishing
persuasion of manner of which she was capable.
The help-meet of good man Saultz was what the
world calls a kind soul; and she was, to do her
justice
,
as ugly as she was good. Her figure looked
like a well-stuffed pillow tied in the middle,
surmounted
by a New England old-fashioned
suet-pudding
in a night-cap. Her eyes were small and light
green; her nose, buried in her cheeks, showed its
whereabout more from its snuffiness than from its
extreme beauty of outline. Her hair was very red,
and could not be made smooth by any known art of
the barber's. Add to this a sharp, squeaking voice,
and the figure of Mistress Debora Saultz ought to
be before the reader.
Mistress Saultz, next to going to extra meetings
at the Reverend Sloman Morphines, liked nothing
so much as grannying, or, as she called it, seeing
women
comfortably lying in. She always insisted
that there was nothing wanting to make Boston a
perfect
paradise but a lying-in hospital, and she was at
that very time using her best endeavors to get up a
society for the promotion of the object dearest to her
heart.
The old women of Boston, she used to declare,
may say what they please about it; but I know
well enough that they will never be able to get along
without societies. Massy on us! there is more to
be done in a society than in a church congregation.
Notwithstanding all this zeal for the public good,
and her extraordinary care for posterity, there were
not wanting those who were malicious enough to
accuse
Dame Saultz of the diabolical crime of aiding
and abetting witchcraft. Some went so far as to charge
her directly with having furnished sundry women
with herbs, with a guide for preparing decoctions
that would enable those who drank of them to ride
through the air on pitchforks and broomsticks; and
one positively asserted that she had been in
company
with Debby Saultz at a communion near the
Spouting Horn, at Nahant, and that she saw her
15
kiss the goat and ride in company with more than a
dozen others over to Egg-Rock in a thunder-storm.
However this may have been, one thing was
certain
she
was fond of grannying, and was now in
her element; because she had worked herself up to
the belief that nothing short of her favorite
employment
could have been required at this time of the
night. Accordingly, every thing being made ready
for the expeditionfor it must not be imagined that
granny Saultz had left behind her any of those odds
and ends that in their sum-total constituted the fitting
out of such a craftthey started off in the cold
moonlight for the dwelling-place of the boy's mother.
It was now near the middle of October, when the
weather is very changeable, and it was still more so in
New England at the time we are now referring to.
Within the past hour and a half, a dark cloud had
been slowly rolling up its heavy drapery, and its deep
edge now nearly touched the moon. The wind,
too, had arisen, and was now howling mournfully
among the many trees with which the metropolis of
New England was provided, and the fallen leaves
were whirled about in eddies, whose rustling sound
hymned with the fitful gusts the most desolate
harmonies
.
There was a spirit of melancholy and
gloom abroad that sank into the very heart of
Fitzvassal
,
and perhaps sounded deeper vibrations for
the soft music that but a little while before had melted
on his heart of hearts, while he gave full swing to
his fancy and revelled in the elysium of love.
He now almost regretted that he had engaged in
this adventure; for he was cheerless and sad, and
withal weary with the unusual excitement he had
undergone that night; and he would fain have laid his
head upon his pillow, nay, willingly would he have
wrapped himself the closer in his watch-coat, and
thrown himself on the bare earth, so might he for a
few hours bury himself in the God-ordained oblivion
of sleep.
The little party walked along in silence, the boy
trotting with unequal footsteps, trying to keep up
with his benefactor, whose mood of abstraction
prevented
him from noticing with what rapidity he was
going.
Massy on us, exclaimed Mistress Debora, who,
like Johnson's Time in pursuit of the bard of Avon,
panted and toiled in vain after Fitzvassal, Massy
on us, how fast you travel! I wish Doctor Sikes,
bless his heart! had such a pair of legs as you have
he wouldn't keep the women a-waiting so then, as
he does now. Lauks! I could go as fast once
myself
,
but I can't now
'Ask your pardon, Madam, said Fitzvassal,
apologizing as well as he could for his forgetfulness,
but really I wasn't aware of walking quite so fast.
Did you ever have the rheumatis'? inquired
Mistress Debora, pathetically, and rubbing her
shoulder
as she spoke.
I can't say that I ever had, he replied.
It's pesky bad, I can tell you, said the dame,
continuing to rub her arm; I've had it now these
four weeks e'en-a-most, and it seems as if nothing
was
good for it. I've tried hards'-lard, that Dame
Jenkins recommended to me,she that lives by the
sign of the stump-tailed-bull, down the north eend,
right opposite good-man Giles's;I suppose you know
her
as well as you do the town pump. Says she to me,
one dayDon't walk quite so fast, if you please, Sir,
Debby, says shefor she always calls me Debby;
Debby, says she, and says I what? Where's
Thankful
?
says she, and says I, Thankful's down stairs,
and says she, is she? Call her, says she; and I
called her you know, and it so fell out that, after all,
she wasn't there. Dear me, how fast you do go;
well, as I was saying
How far is it, interrupted Fitzvassal, addressing
the boy, and wholly unmindful of the garrulous old
woman, to the place where your mother lives?
Just round the next corner, said the boy, we
are almost there.
They had now, after walking up Cornhill, turned
down an obscure alley at the left, not far from King's
Street, a place where a large number of rude
habitations
were crowded together on both sides, the
gables
of which projected over so far that it would have
been dark there in the brightest moonlight. But the
moon was now deeply veiled in the clouds, and the
wind increasing, drove down on the pedestrians a
sharp sleet, which almost cut through the skin, and
added materially to the uncomfortable feelings of
Fitzvassal and his companions.
Massy on us! exclaimed the woman, treading
very carefully behind the others, if I had known it
was going to be so dark, I would have fetched a
lantern
.
This is the place, said the boy, shivering with
the cold, and stopping at what appeared to be a
cellar
door, which slanted a little over the side of the
alley.
What! down this cellar? inquired Fitzvassal,
astonished that the boy did not go to the door of the
poor hovel at which they had stopped.
Yes, Sir, answered the boy, we've lived there
ever so long, but it isn't a good place for poor, sick
mammy.
The child then raised the cellar door, which was
comparatively light from its decayed state, and
laying
it back, said:
I will go down first, and strike a light, and then
you can see the way;it's very dark down there and
muddy;it won't take me long to get a light.
Whereupon the lad descended, followed by
Fitzvassal
,
leaving Mrs. Deborah Saultz alone in the
alley
.
15*
Lord 'a massy on us! vociferated the dame, I
shall be scared to death, e'en a-most to death, if you
leave me here all alone.
And she stood stamping her feet, and blowing on
the ends of her fingers to keep away the cold.
Meanwhile the boy, followed by his benefactor,
reached the bottom of the ladder that led down to
the apartment; for the steps consisted of nothing
but planks, nailed on the timbers in such a way as to
present their edges for a foothold. In a short time
the former was engaged with flint and steel in
striking
a light; and while this was going on, the ears of
our adventurer were pained by sounds of the most
helpless distress.
A small rush-candle was soon lighted, and a scene
of human poverty and suffering presented itself, of
which before he had no conception; and his first
reflection
was;
Is it possible, that in the heart of my native city,
the metropolis of New England, such abject want
and misery can be found, in the very midst of
affluence
,
luxury, and extravagance!
He then thought of Mistress Saultz, who was
waiting
above, and he proceeded immediately to bring her
down, which operation was effected with no little
difficulty.
Is it you? murmured the sick woman to the
boy, who now approached the bed where she lay
Oh Willy! thank God, you have come, my child.
I've passed a weary time since you were gone;
where have you been, my child? God bless you!
In reply to this, Willy put his arms round her
emaciated neck, and kissing her, wept profusely;
nor did he relinquish his position till Mrs. Saultz
came forwardFitzvassal, from motives of delicacy,
remaining in the back-ground.
These good people, mammy, said the boy, have
come to see you; they gave me something to eat,
and said that they would come and see you,
mammy
!
God bless them, cried the womanbut it is
too late!
Mistress Saultz was not inactive all this while;
but after feeling of the poor woman's pulse, and
looking
at her thin, pale face, with her eyes shining
unhealthily
in the large orbits where they had sunken,
said to her in a soothing manner:
Is there any thing I can do for you, my good
woman
?
Who
are
you? feebly inquired the patient.
Mistress Saultz is my name, ma'am; Mistress
Debora
Saultz,perhaps you have heard of Simon
Saultz, the apothecary?
Oh yes!I have heard the name
He is my good man, he is, said the woman.
Pray tell me what ails you?
Nothing! said the sick woman, mournfully.
It will soon be over!
You're not a-going to die, I hope, said Mrs.
Saultz, there's always hope, you know!
God's will be done! exclaimed the woman.
Amen! said Mrs. Saultz.But, cheer up, cheer
up, tell me what ails you, and I will try to do what
I can for your comfort.
Saying this, she applied a smelling bottle of
ammonia
to the woman's nose, thinking it might revive
her.
Water!
exclaimed the woman, feebly, as if she
were fainting, and had no power of further
utterance
.
Mrs. Saultz bustled about a good while, and at
last espied a broken cup and the lower half of a
pitcher containing some water, with particles of
rotten
wood and dirt settled at the bottom. She
poured
out a little of this, and gave it to the woman, who,
after keeping her eyes shut for a time, seemed to
revive
.
Thank you! said the woman.
Mistress Saultz! she resumed, after a pause,
when I am gone
Dearest mammy! exclaimed the boy, don't
talk so!oh ma'am! said he, turning to the other
imploringly,
do
give mammy something to eat,
she is starving to death
Massy 'on us, ma'am! inquired the woman,
energetically
,
you don't say you are famishing for
want of food!I didn't believe such a thing was
possible.
It's no matter now, replied the sinking sufferer,
God's will be done! I have deserved it all, and
more;but oh, she cried, and it seemed as if her
heart would break when she uttered itoh my
son! my son!
could my Heavenly Father but have
permitted me to see
you
but one moment before I
diedoh, how I have prayed for
that
for
that!
oh my son, my
Edward!
As those words struck upon the ear of Fitzvassal,
who in the meantime being beckoned to by the
amazed nurse, came forward, it seemed as if all the
blood in his body rushed to his head at once;for
his ears rang, and he staggered like a drunkard;
but as he pressed one hand to his forehead and the
other to his breast, while the equilibrium of vitality
was returninghe sprang to the side of the bed, and
gazed on the woman like one petrified with
astonishment
.The
patient, shading her glazed eyes with
her lean and skeleton fingers, glowed on him with a
most wo-worn expression, then choking and
struggling
for utterance, she suddenly spread out her hands
and exclaimed
My
son!
my
son!
merciful God, I thank thee!
Do not my eyes deceive me? can it be possible?
cried the bewildered man. Good God, am I not
dreaming? Oh, my
mother!
my
mother!
And Fitzvassal fell upon his knees at the side of
the rude pallet of straw on which his dying parent
was reclining, and seizing her cold, clammy hands
with his, he buried his head in his agony.
Mistress Saultz turned aside, and wept like a true
woman, holding her checked apron to her eyes.
She had never witnessed such a scene before, and
she held the boy by one hand, who fixed his gaze
on his protectress with his large, inquiring eyes,
staring as if he had just waked from a dream.
At length the paroxysm of surprise, distress, grief,
joy and suffering, all blending for a moment into one
thought, and that agony subsiding, Fitzvassal raised
his head, and gazing on his mother, while he still
pressed her damp, cold hands in his, exclaimed
And have I then been reserved for
this
my poor,
dear mother!Is it
indeed, you,
that I behold in this
forlorn situation?Great God! save me from such
a reality!drive from me the vision!let me not
be tortured beyond endurance!
Oh, my son, interrupted the woman, who
seemed
to be gifted for the time with extraordinary
energy
,
do not talk thus,rather thank the giver of all
good that we have been permitted to meet again in
this world
For the love of Heaven! exclaimed the son,
half-frantic with the reality of his situation, and
addressing
himself to Mistress Saultz, run to your
house, and procure some sustenance suitable to one
in such a condition.Go! cried he, almost madden.
ed because the woman did not spring forward to
execute
the order immediatelygo, or I will strike you
dead on the spot.
I shall never be able to find the way back again,
in the world, said the woman, half terrified out of
her senses.
Let the boy go with you, then.
Oh, yes, I will go with you, said the little
fellow
;I
know that this gentleman will take good
care of mammy.
It will do no good!murmured the woman
I cannot eatgive me a little waterthere! that
will do, said she, moistening her lips with it.
I tell you to go immediately, exclaimed
Fitzvassal
Some
good can be done, and shall be done
Go, Mistress Saultz, for God's sake! and that soon:
here, I will help you
So saying, he proceeded to assist the woman,
who mounted the ladder much more easily than she
had descended it, and the boy accompanied her.
Now, make all possible haste! urged Fitzvassal,
and by all means bring some good wine;you
shall be well paid, depend on it!
Mistress Saultz declared that she didn't care
about the money, and for the time she probably
spoke the truth. Guided by the boy, she now made
the best of her way toward her own house, while
Fitzvassal descended again to that unparalleled abode
of poverty and woe.
Do not grieve for me, Edward! said his
mother
,
anxiouslyas the afflicted son once more
approached
the bed of his suffering parentdo not
grieve for me, Edward, I shall soon be at rest
Tell me, mother, as you love me and value my
happinesstell me how you came to such a
deplorable
condition?
Oh, my child, it were a long story to telland I
have not strength enough to waste on it;it was all
for the bestyour father
What of him? eagerly inquired the son, stung
to the very quick by the name.
I forgive him from my heart;he loved me
once
at least I
thought
he loved me;but Heaven knows
how I have loved
him
even to the last
May the curses that come after a hard and
horrible
death cleave to him, and damn him forever!
screamed the son, almost forgetful of his mother's
sufferings, in the degree of hatred which he felt for
his unnatural sire
Oh, my son, said the sinking motherdo not
cursedo not cursebless rather!curses come
back with fearful fury on us;do not
curse
I
would bless thee, my son, with my dying breath
but I cannot bless thee
cursing!
And while she spake her eyes filled with tears,
and Fitzvassal fell down upon his knees and asked
her forgiveness.
There!
she continued, that is a good, dear
child, and may the giver of all good keep you from
evil
And there's that scoundrel, Classon! ejaculated
Fitzvassal, how could he see you suffering thus?
Do not blame him,said the mother,
imploringly
for
heaven's sake, my son, do not blame that
man;he never pretended to love me;poor man!
he has enough to be sorry for without thinking of
me
Fitzvassal ground his teeth, but said nothing;
while his breast heaved convulsively, and the demon
of vengeance gnawed at his very heart-strings.
What an age it seems, Edward! said his
mother
,
fixing her eyes on him, what an age it seems,
since I saw youand how you have altered, too!
The only response the object of her affections
could return to this, was a faint and melancholy
smile, in which the very picture of heartsickness
was undisguisedly portrayed.
While he gazed on herher eyes rolled upward.
Mother! exclaimed the son, wishing to arrest
her attention, that he might be relieved from an
apprehension
that she was faintingMother! will you
have some water?
It is growing dark, replied the dying woman,
don't take away the candle, Edward!
Dearest Mother! cried the terrified man; look
on me, dearest mother!
16
Where
are
you, my son? faintly murmured the
woman; I do not see you, where
are
you?
And as she spoke, the unequivocal signal of
dissolution
showed itself in that most appalling of all
sounds, the death-rattle.
Where
are
you, Edward?
Here I am, by your side, my dear, kind mother.
Don't leave me again.
Indeed, indeed, I will never leave you again.
Though Mistress Saultz had been gone but a few
minutes, those minutes seemed to Fitzvassal as many
hours;Why can they delay so? thought he in
the misery of his impatience.
Who are
they?
inquired the dying woman,
stretching her pale, emaciated fingers in the direction
of the cellar door.
What do you mean, my dear mother? replied
the son.
Who are they,
there!
Oh, now I know;
look
at them Edward!do you see them?
Dearest mother! ejaculated her son, believing
that her mind had wandered, and that any further
reference to the subject would add to her delirium.
They are beautiful and bright creatures.See!
they are beckoning to meI will go with thembut
not quite yetEdward, my love! are you
here?
Fitzvassal bowed his head upon his mother's
bosom
,
and wept like a childGod bless you, my son!
farewell!
The unhappy man perceived a slight shuddering
beneath him, and he lifted his head to gaze on his
mother's corpse!He laid his hand upon her heart,
but it was still and quiet; he lifted her arm, and it
fell from his grasp heavily and dead; her eyes were
fixed in their sockets, and as he pressed the cold lids
upon them, there came no sign of life, and he held
his hand there till the current of his own life
chilled
,
and he thought of her seducer and his affections
withered up, while his heart for the moment
overflowed
with bitterness.
The bereaved son then knelt on the bare ground,
and poured forth an imprecation, deep and earnest, on
that man who had given him life, and been the means
of destroying his mother; and before he rose again,
he had sworn terribly that nothing should prevent
that vengeance which the sacrifice before him
demanded
.
Yes! he exclaimed aloud, by thy sainted
spirit, thou best of mothers! by all thy deep
afflictions
and unheard-of sufferings! by thy pale, lifeless
body, that now lies before me, I
swear
that Edmund
Vassal shall
bitterly atone for this deed!
And he seated himself upon the side of the
stiffened
corpse, and gave vent to his concentrated misery.
The cellar in which these sufferings were, showed
the very picture of penury. The bare ground,
without
one plank to keep off the dampness, was its only
floor, and this so wet and muddy, that the most robust
health would have sunk under its influence. There
was no furniture there, unless a couple of old
packing-boxes
could be called such, which served for a
bedstead to keep the straw from the mud, and
another
which was used for a table. Other than these,
there was nothing that could be called so. The cellar
door was much broken, and the walls of which the
apartment was made, were so dilapidated, that in the
day-time one could not well help seeing into the street.
Such was the wretched abode in which the
unhappy
mother of Fitzvassal had lived for months,
and where she now lay in cold obstruction, dead.
To such a place it was provided that her miserable
son should be led, that he might take the blessing of
his mother. Happy for him if his heart had been
already softened by suffering to receive the imprint
of that impression which her dying words should
have made. But, unprepared for so great a
calamity
,
his heart rebelled against the ordinances of
heaven
,
and he cursed and bemoaned his fate, as one
which had been cruelly forced on him, and which
he believed he did not deserve.
Mrs. Saultz and the boy Willy now arrived with a
basket containing such matters as was judged to be
best for the poor woman whose spirit had already
gone: and when the good-hearted creature found
that she was dead, she wept with unaffected feeling.
The poor boy could find no limits to his affliction.
He threw himself on the lifeless body, and wept
bitterly
.
Though every sort of consolation was
offered
to him, he refused to be comforted.
Oh mammy, my dear, lost mammy, he would
say, I shall never see you againOh! I shall never
forget how kind and tender-hearted you have been
to me! I will die with you, my dear, dear mammy,
indeed I will.
The day now dawned, and Mistress Saultz, under
the direction of Fitzvassal, paid all those melancholy
offices to the dead which custom and propriety
render
necessary. A suitable coffin was procured, and
permission obtained from the apothecary for the body
to be conveyed to his own house, from which it was
intended
that the burial should proceed. The boy was
placed under the care of Mrs. Saultz, and Fitzvassal,
retiring to the Red Lion, called for a room, on
entering
which he locked the door, and threw himself
on the bed, exhausted and spiritless. In a few
moments
after he was buried in a death-like slumber.
16*
CHAPTER VIII.
The will of the people is above all law.
The Heaven-Born
.
The devil take the hindmost.
Old Saw
.
Fort Hill forever!
Boston Boys
.
It
was broad noon before our adventurer woke
from the heavy slumber in which the excitement and
suffering of the previous evening had thrown him.
As soon as he had hurried on his dress and taken a
short repast, he proceeded without delay to the house
of the hospitable apothecary, where he found every
thing ready prepared for the funeral. In less than two
hours after, the body was consigned to the earth; but
Fitzvassal felt that its spirit was still around him, to
warn him, and, if possible, to keep his feet from falling.
He now ascertained from the boy Willy, who had
been in the Poor-House with the unfortunate wife of
Classon, that so great were the privations, and so
humiliating
the mortifications to which they had been
compelled to submit, that she determined to rely in
future on her own poor abilities to support herself,
though her health was much broken, and there did
not seem to her to be a prospect of long continuance
on earth. The boy had become attached to her
because
she was the first and only person that ever
seemed to take any interest in him; and when she
left, he contrived means to deliver himself likewise
from the life-in-death they endured from the harsh
charities of the world.
Of all forms of human suffering, there can be
none (saving those which arise from acts of
depravity
),
to be compared with obligations which are
whispered in the ear, looked from the eyes, and
thrust upon the wretch that endures them, in every
shape of suppressed but never forgetting
consciousness
.
He who can endure
that,
is either more or
less than mortal.
Touched by the gentle affection of the boy,
Mistress
Classon took the lad under her protection,
and so long as she could earn a trifle by going out to
work, she contrived to support both him and herself.
Though they often had nothing but a crust of bread
and cold water for food, and a damp cellar without
the common necessaries of life for their lodging, yet
they slept sweetly in the consciousness of having
done their duty, and being free from the poisonous
atmosphere of that last of all curses which is falsely
called Charity.
Fitzvassal now engaged the kind apothecary to
take Willy(the poor foundling had been
christened
Willy May, from the month in which he had been
lost and found)as an apprentice in his shop, and
he made such provision for his wants as secured Mr.
Saultz from any expense to which he might
otherwise
have been liable for his support.
Our adventurer was rambling down King's Street
in the early part of the afternoon of that day, when
his attention was arrested by an unusual tumult
in the public avenue. The report of the attempt on
the part of the British officers to impress certain
freemen
of Boston was just then finding its way into
the more thickly settled parts of the town, and the
indignation
of the populace was without bounds.
Several hundred people had collected at the upper
part of King's Street, among whom Randal was
conspicuous
;
and from the great excitement visible in
their actions, it was manifest that insult and injury
had roused them to such a pitch of indignation, that
it would require something more than mere words
and promises to appease their irritation.
Let us to the Governor's! shouted Randal from
a truck in the midst of the crowd, on which he had
mounted to gain a vantage ground for his influence,
let us to the Governor's, and we will soon find
out whether the people of Boston are to be cuffed
and dragged about like cattle.Hurrah, for the
Governor's
!Liberty
and old Boston for ever!
Fort Hill, for ever! shouted a hundred voices
at once, in reply to the patriotic summons of Randal;
and a movement was instantly perceptible in the
direction of the Governor's house.
What is the matter? inquired Fitzvassal,
addressing
himself to a man who seemed rather to be
looking on than sympathizing with the offended
crowd.
Why, don't you know? answered the man, who
soon showed that he was a thorough-going Tory;
the people are getting crazy because they can't bear
the wholesome laws of his Majesty.
What do you refer to just now? Has any thing
new
happened to-day?
The king's officers, replied the man, only
endeavored
to impress a few seamen, that's all;and
hence all this fuss;confound this republican spirit
I
say!
This information was sufficient for Fitzvassal.
Without any further inquiry he plunged into the
crowd, and rather led than followed them towards
Fort Hill.
There was now one incessant succession of
shoutings
,
of Fort Hill for ever! Down with the
Tyrants
!
Sailors' Rights and no Impressment!
No Taxation without Representation!
And as the throng advanced, the doors and
windows
of the houses flew open; and it seemed as if
the Spirit of Liberty had all at once burst out like a
smothered blaze for a general conflagration.
Hundreds
were added to the hundreds already assembled
in the moving mass, at the head of which were seen
Randal and Fitzvassal, cheering the people on, and
sending forth new sentiments, which were taken up
and reiterated by the thousands who now
approached
Fort Hill.
The news of this insubordination among the
people
had in the meanwhile reached the ears of the
Governor, who, accompanied by his aides and other
attendants, (among whom was Classon, who had
been so ready, on the failure of the British officers to
impress the men, to carry the report to Sir Edmund
Andros,) transferred his quarters to the Fort, where,
having shut the gate, and secured himself from the
rage of the people, he waited restlessly for their
arrival
.
Fort Hill is one of the three eminences that have
given the name of Tremont to the metropolis of
New England. It is a very considerable elevation
of ground on the eastern part of the town, and
commands
one of the most beautiful prospects
imaginable
.
At present large stores and dwelling-houses
intercept
the fine water-prospect in part, and have
destroyed its principal features of beauty; but in the
times of the first revolution, under the second James,
it presented a very different appearance. In those
days there was an uninterrupted sweep from the
fortress
to the water's edge, and the eye, as it looked
from the heights, coursed over a charming slope of
greenery on every side, and towards the north-east
and east overlooked the beautiful bay and the many
green islands which then, more than now, were
unparalleled for picturesque loveliness.
At present, there is hardly any vestage of the fort
which, in the troublous hours we are chronicling, was
the retreat for the tyrant of New England; but it
was then a place of strong defence. It was so
contrived
,
that not only the harbor was partially
commanded
by it, but it overlooked from behind the
different
avenues from the town which led directly to
its base. The ramparts were defended by twelve
cannon, and the whole was surrounded by a moat,
over which a drawbridge was thrown on the side
fronting High Street, the principal way of approach
from the town.
Among the few houses in the intermediate
neighborhood
of the fort, was one commonly occupied by
the Governor and his suite when they were present
in the city. New-York was his permanent
residence
,
but, as we have already stated, Sir Edmund
Andros was now on a visit to Boston, partly on
account
of the distracted state of the people, and partly
on account of a new Indian war which was
threatening
to break out in the eastern parts of the
country
.
The flag of England was floating proudly from
Fort Hill, where Sir Edmund Andros had retired
from the fury of the people. He was guarded by
two hundred men, who constituted the garrison of
the fortress; but it had only one half its usual weight
of artillery, six of the cannon having been, a few
days before, transferred to the Rose Frigate.
So sudden had been the gathering of the people,
that the Governor had no time to spare in placing
himself where he could for a while check their
advance
towards him; and as the crowd heaved and
surged at the foot of the hill, the bridge was seen
drawing up, a very few moments having passed
since its inmates had betaken themselves to its
recesses
.
At the moment Classon came to the house of Sir
Edmund Andros with the intelligence of the
successful
resistance on the part of the people to the attempt
to impress the seamen, that dignitary was engaged in
earnest conversation with Mr. Wilmer, the only one
of his council in whom he placed implicit reliance,
and whom he therefore preferred to all the others
who composed his board of advisers. As may be
easily imagined, the report of such an occurrence
was in the last degree alarming, and they were
making
hasty calculations, what were best to be done in
the emergency, when messenger after messenger
arrived, with even exaggerated accounts of the
popular
movements, which were, in fact, serious enough
of themselves; so that the resolution was suddenly
taken to throw themselves into the fortress till the
indignation of the people could be appeased.
Sir Edmund Andros was now standing within the
fortress, by no means free from that apprehension
which his arbitrary and unreasonable conduct had
justly awakened; and near him were Mr. Wilmer,
Classon, and some other adherents, whom the
emergency
of the time placed on a footing which would
not have been permitted, but for the present agitation
of his mind.
It is not to be supposed that the Governor had any
cowardly shrinkings, other than such as arose from a
consciousness of having done wrong. Had he been
expecting an ordinary enemy which he could
oppose
like a soldier, he would unquestionably have
been as ready as any other man to conduct himself
well in the emergency: but his situation now was
very different. He had an infuriated people to
contend
with, whom he, to be sure, heartily despised, but
whom he dared not treat as rebels against his
tyrannical
authority: and he was never so much at a loss,
as when standing, as he did, in the midst of soldiers
with his friends about him, he saw the dark tide
swelling upward, with a purpose, perhaps, of
attempting
to carry the fort by storm.
Sir Edmund was a man about forty years old, very
polished in his manners and address, but whose
features
were harsh and forbidding. His courtesy was
too condescending to be agreeable, and his general
bearing was marked with aristocratic arrogance. He
was really a new man among the titled; being one
17
of the innumerables of his day, who had knighthood
forced upon them for the sake of the money which
thereupon went to the crown. At any rate
knight-hood
did not sit gracefully on the Governor; for, with
all his politenessif there is not an inconsistency
involved
hereinhe seemed to be perpetually
conscious
of his dignity. His dress was very splendid,
consisting
of crimson velvet much adorned with gold
lace, with thread-lace collar and wrist-bands,
diamond
knee-buckles, and brilliant Bristol stones in his
shoes.
Ambrose Wilmer, the father of Grace, to whom we
have already alluded, had been recently appointed
one of Sir Edmund Andros's council on account of
his religious principles. Heretofore he had not
obtruded
his opinions on a people who were generally
so opposed to them as the Bostonians; not only
because
he could expect to find very little sympathy
among them, but for the more prudential reason, that
a zealous avowal of his sentiments would be likely
to stand in the way of his practice at the bar. He
was now, however, an open and avowed Catholic,
and had for some time unhesitatingly declared his
principles, probably from a short-sighted view of
public
events, and from an ill-grounded belief that James
would effect an entire revolution in the established
Protestant religion. In personal appearance Mr.
Wilmer was extremely elegant, closely resembling his
daughter; but his predominant expression was one
of deep thoughtfulness. He spoke but little in
conversation
,
but his judgment was cool; and Sir
Edmund
Andros found in him an adviser that came too
late for his preservation.
This is a bad business, truly, exclaimed the
Governor
,
looking with undisguised concern at the
turbulent
sea of heads that was now rapidly
approaching
the moat; what is best to be done, Mr. Wilmer?
It is a difficult matter to determine, replied the
counsellor, shaking his head and looking down at his
feet.
It will never do to
fire
on them should they be
unreasonable? said the Governor, in a tone that
seemed to suggest an expedient, and at the same time
to inquire as to its practicability.
You may depend upon it, Sir Edmund, replied
Mr. Wilmer, that the moment any blood is spilt by
your soldiers, a revolution is inevitable.
Nonsense! interjected the Governor. Now that
is too good a joke, truly. Revolution, indeed! Come
now, Mr. Wilmer, do let us talk seriously about this
matter;would it answer to give the fellows a shot?
A shot, replied Mr. Wilmer, would find an
answer among those fanatics before it would be
agreeable for you to meet it. No, Sir; in the name of
heaven, do nothing at present, but endeavor to
reconcile
the people to your authority. They are, I
was going to say, justly offended at the peremptory
conduct of the king's officers, and great allowance
is therefore to be made for them.
The noise and uproar of the people had now
increased
to a fearful extent, and the situation of those
who were within the fort was by no means agreeable;
especially as a number of missiles found their way
over the parapet into the fort, and a shower of stones,
hurled from slings, struck the flag-staff, and showed a
disposition on the part of the crowd to use violence
in their measures.
A cry now went up among the people for Sir
Edmund
Andros. A number of persons rushed to his
house, which was found almost deserted; when they
joined the others round the fort, who were already
persuaded that the Governor had taken refuge within
its gates.
Hurrah! Hurrah! Hurrah! went up a thousand
voices - Sir Edmund Andros! Redress! Down
with tyranny! No taxation without representation!
Sailors' rights for ever! Hurrah! Hurrah!
Sir Edmund looked at his counsellor, and seemed
to implore his advice.
I think it would be prudent, said Mr. Wilmer,
if you were at least prepared for the worst; for in
case the populace are permitted to take possession of
the fort, there is no calculating to what extent they
may afterwards meditate mischief.
I think you are right, replied the Governor, and
he immediately gave orders to have the guns loaded
with grape shot; that in case an attempt were made
to carry the fort, the crowd might meet with such a
repulse as would at once, as he imagined, put an end
to the project.
The noise of the drums and fifes, and the
preparations
which were audibly going on in the fort,
seemed
only to infuriate the people the more.
Who'll follow me? cried Randal, as he
brandished
a club, and stood ready to leap into the moat.
Who'll follow me? we will soon find out whether
we are to be trampled on in this way or not; who
dares follow me?
A hundred voices simultaneously answered to this
call, and the ardor of the people would soon have
defeated their own purpose, or deluged the town in
blood, had not the Governor at that moment sprung
on the parapet, and taking off his hat, presented
himself
respectfully to the crowd.
The Governor! the Governor! shouted the
tumultuous
assembly; and attention being called to the
presence of Sir Edmund Andros, those who had been
just ready to spring into the moat, fell back as if they
had already gained the object of their search.
Have patience, my good people! exclaimed the
Governor, and I will presently send you an
ambassador
,
through whom we can have all our difficulties
adjusted;you shall have all you want, and more
too.
This was said in a tone which those who knew
17*
him best could not fail to understand as veiling the
bitterest sarcasm and contempt. Nevertheless they
did not give vent to their feelings, but joined the
general
cry, which was sent back responsive to the
apparent
peace-offering.
Hurrah! Hurrah! Hurrah! three cheers for
Liberty! Hurrah! Hurrah! Hurrah!
The Governor having bowed to the people as
hypocritically
as he knew how, leaped back into the
fort, and immediately addressed himself to Mr.
Wilmer
.
And whom, do you think, I intend to send as my
minister plenipotentiary to this rabble-rout, hey?
and he smiled contemptuously as he called;
Classon!
this way!
The miserable tool of power was at the Governor's
side in a moment.
For heaven's sake, what are you going to do, Sir
Edmund? whispered Mr. Wilmer.
You shall see, presently, replied the knight,
laughing; I am going to give this scamp of mine
a lesson in diplomacy, that's all. Do you go,
Classon
!
and nail a towel to a broomstick, and then come
back here; do you mind?
Ay! Ay! Sir, said the publican, entering at once
into the humor of the scheme, and running away to
execute the order of his master.
Does your excellency know what you are going
to do? inquired Mr. Wilmer, addressing the
Governor
,
who seemed to be delighted with a plan which he
thought would turn the whole affair into a frolic.
Oh yes! replied the chief magistrate, I know
well enough what I am going to do;I mean to
teach these plebeian scoundrels better manners than
to come here hollowing and shouting after they know
not what; the scurvy miscreants! I tell you what it
is, Sir; if you think I am going to govern hogs
without
ringing their noses, you are very much mistaken,
that's all.
You know your own business best, Sir Edmund;
but upon my honor as a gentleman, replied Mr.
Wilmer, I advise you to adopt a very different
course with these people. You must remember that
they are not English villains, but are all of them,
perhaps, freemen of Boston.
Freemen of the devil, exclaimed the Governor;
what right have they to call themselves freemen;
have they any charter of liberty, I should like to
know?
And the aristocratic mocker laughed at the idea
of that privation under which the people were
groaning
and toiling in almost hopeless misery.
Your excellency may laugh, said his adviser,
but I fear you don't understand the character of
this people so well as I do. They are puritans to be
sure, and they imagine that nobody else knows any
thing but they: for which bigotry and blind
infatuation
there is no remedy that I know of, but patience.
It seems to me that they might have been made
exemplary members of holy mother church if
they had been more frankly and generously dealt
with by our august sovereign; but you will be sorely
disappointed if you expect that they will be ruled
after the manner you devise.
But Sir Edmund only laughed the more
scornfully
at this intercession of Mr. Wilmer, and replied:
You must know, Sir, that ever since the
disagreeable
duty devolved on me, by his Majesty's
order
,
of governing these people, there has hardly a
week passed without some outrage or other having
been committed. There has not been one of his
Majesty's
laws obeyed without murmuring. I for one,
am tired of trifling; and now that they have seen fit
to resist the king's officers in a duty which had my
express sanction, I will show the puppies what it is
to bark at their masters. But here comes my ambas
sador!
Just then Abner Classon came up, bearing the
towel nailed to the broomstick, which he carried
with all that mock solemnity which he knew would
be agreeable to his master.
Now, Classon, said the Governor, put on that
red flannel cap of your's and carry the flag of truce
to your townsmenand tell them from me, that it is
a sign that they had better go home and make their
faces clean, and let alone matters that don't concern
them.
But I am afraid to carry such a message to
them, said Classon.
Nonsense! exclaimed the Governor, pulling his
ear, as if he meant to encourage him, do you fancy
that they will fail to respect the flag of truce? Go
to the commissary, and deluge yourself first with
drink. I suspect you will be ready enough then.
Bring some liquor here! the siege has made us
dry!
The last part of this speech was addressed to one
of his servants, who went immediately on his
errand
,
and forthwith brought a square bottle of
Hollands
and a silver goblet.
Help yourself now like a man, and let us see if
you can't get up a becoming outfit for the embassy.
And the Governor purposely turned aside, that the
fellow might not be interrupted in his agreeable task
of helping himself to gin.
There! resumed Sir Edmund, after he was
satisfied
that the man had swallowed about a pint of
the spirits, there, I think we shall now be in prime
order for treating with the beleaguers. Come now,
march!
Let me intreat you, again interposed Mr.
Wilmer
,
not to send this man on such a mad
errand
.
It is impossible to say what may be the
result. If they are not stimulated to throw themselves
precipitately on the fort, and thus meet an untimely
death, which would throw the whole country into a
fever, there is, at least, danger that they will sacrifice
this poor fool to their malice; do consider of it,
before
you proceed any further.
But the more Mr. Wilmer spoke against the thing,
the more firmly did it seem that Sir Edmund was
bent on having his own way; the former, therefore,
finally yielded, remarking:
As you please, Sir Edmund; but if your
excellency
has not cause to repent of this rash proceeding,
I will never again volunteer any advice respecting
a people in whom I am so much deceived.
With all his audacity, however, the Governor had
not courage enough to let down the drawbridge of
the fort, by which his mock ambassador might find
a convenient passage across the mote; but he
ordered
him to make the best of his way over that he
could.
Classon accordingly undertook to fulfil the
command
of his master, whom he was afraid to disobey;
and leaping from the parapet to which he had
ascended
,
he sprang with several bounds into the moat,
which he forthwith undertook to climb.
In the meanwhile the multitude, whose clamor
had to a great extent subsided since the appearance
of the Governor, in the confident expectation that he
would commission some respectable individual to
hear an account of their immediate subject of
complaint
,
and be the medium of conciliation, when they
saw the well-known pander of their detested Governor,
bearing such a contemptuous signal of the
mock-pacific
,
they could not control their indignation.
Hush! said Randal, making a sign to the
people
,
let him alone till he gets near enough,he is
the rascal that took part with the press-gang this
morningwe'll fix his flint for him presently.
Stand back a while, and don't scare him,let's hear
what his old groggy face has to say to us.
The people, over whom Randal seemed to have
complete authority, gave way at this intimation; and
as Classon struggled on the steep bank of the moat,
the former lent him his hand to enable him to reach
the ground above.
And what word do you bring from our gracious
master, Mr. Herald, inquired Randal, as with a giant
grasp he brought the fellow to his landing place;
what message, hey?
Sir Edmund Andros bade me say to you,
exclaimed
Classon, loud enough to be heard by every
man in the assembly, where a death-like silence
reigned
for the time, so anxious were they to hear a
report
from their Governor, that you may look upon
this ere as a sign that you had better all go home and
wash your faces, and not meddle any longer with
matter's
that don't concarn you.
The shouts and screams, mingled with curses and
execrations, that followed this announcement, rose on
the air like thunder, or the sound of the breaking up
of the ice when it has been heaped mountain high
by some partial thaw, and is now sent with
overwhelming
fury to the ocean.
Tar and feather the scoundrel! shouted five
hundred voices at once, as if the punishment had
been instantaneously suggested to them all at the
same time; tar and feather, the scoundrel! The
drunken old pander of the tyranthurrah for the
tar and feathers!give the Tory a court dress for once
in his life!to the rope-walk at the bottom of the
Common!
The idea of wreaking their vengeance on Classon,
whom they had always hated, and whom they now
detested as the mean tool of an unpardonable insult,
so possessed the minds of the people, that they were
diverted from their undefinable business with the
Governor, and were now bent on inflicting that
punishment
which in this country has often been
awarded to political offenders, who for some especial
act have made themselves obnoxious to it.
To the rope-walk! to the rope-walk! was the
continued cry;away with him to the rope-walk!
and while some seized the offender, and ran him on
toward the place of sacrifice, many of them shot
ahead to make all things ready, and to stir up more
people to partake in the promised entertainment.
The roar of the infuriated multitude now gradually
died away about Fort Hill, while other parts of the
town were called on to listen to the disturbance, and
contribute their share of citizens to the ungovernable
crowd.
In the meanwhile the Governor, flattering
himself
that this stratagem had succeeded, laughed at
the apprehensions of Mr. Wilmer, who knew the
people
too well to look for so sudden a pacification.
Sir Edmund, however, in his secret soul, began to
fear that he had gone too far, and had no small reason
to dread his ill-timed frivolity might have become
the means of sacrificing a man, who, however base
and worthless in the estimation of the community,
had always served him with a fidelity which
demanded
better treatment in return.
In vain did Classon cry out for mercy and for
help. There was none for such an offender as he.
He was regarded as a man lost to every principle of
virtue and good feeling, wholly devoid of honor and
patriotism, and the miserable instrument of a man
who was himself the instrument of a cruel and
oppressive
tyrant. The people therefore rejoiced in the
opportunity which the events of the day had
afforded
,
of showing their proper spirit, and making an
example
of a man who, in the point of Tory
subserviency
to a nefarious administration, had many
compeers
in Boston.
A sort of temporary pillory was now constructed and
placed upon a cart drawn by jacks, and in this
Classon
was placed and dragged to the neighborhood of
the rope-walk, which ran nearly the whole length of
18
the bottom of the Common. On the way thither he
was pelted with rotten eggs, decayed vegetables, and
all the nameless missiles which are gathered together
for such an occasion; so that the wretched man
was almost exhausted before he reached the place
where it was intended to make a more especial
example
of him.
The cry, as they turned round the Common, was
Feathers! feathers! now boys, for the feathers!
And a dispute seemed at one time likely to arise,
whether
they should go back to the house of the Governor,
and take his beds for the supply of their wants, or
whether they should make a requisition on the house
of Mr. Wilmer, which was close by, and seemed to
afford the greater convenience for the occasion.
As Mr. Wilmer was not so popular as he deserved
to be from the part he took on the side of the
Colonists
in opposition to the Governor, they were not
sorry for a pretext for showing him the state of their
disposition. They therefore determined to call at
his house, and procure the feathers necessary for the
meditated operation. As soon as this point was
settled
,
they drove down to Mr. Wilmer's house, and at
once invested it.
The people believing that Mr. Wilmer was in his
house, called loudly for him, and bade him contribute
something towards the court-dress, as they called it,
of Classon.
Hullo! there, cried one of the leading men,
I guess you have feathered your nest so well by
this time, you old priest-ridden hunks, that you can
afford to spare an armful for a poor, shivering Tory
brother,can't you?
Which declaration was applauded to the echo, by
the clapping of hands, and every conceivable kind of
noise which a promiscuous multitude of two or three
thousand persons could make.
The family, as might be supposed, were
exceedingly
alarmed at these proceedings, more especially
as they had not been prepared by any previous
intelligence
of the popular outbreak; and they feared
that some accident might have happened by which
Mr. Wilmer had awakened the displeasure of the
populace
,
though they knew well enough that nothing
remarkable had occurred that morning when he left
the house to visit the Governor.
Mrs. Wilmer and her daughter were so much
frightened, that after the first glance at the crowd
they were afraid to go the window; the servants
were, if possible, under still greater apprehension
than they, and Horace Seymour was, though fast
recovering
from his misfortune, unable as yet to leave
his chamber. The family could not even imagine what
could be the demand of such a crowd.
The anxiety of Fitzvassal at this moment may
easily be conjectured. In an instant he saw the true
position of affairs, and running round by the back
part of the house, where stood a small and
comparatively
humble tenement, he dashed into it, and,
ascending
to a chamber, seized a feather-bed, and
tossing
a handful of gold to the woman, who looked on
thunder-struck at the movement, he as rapidly
departed
,
and coming to the garden fence of the
Wilmers'
,
threw the bed over into the enclosure. He then
sprang over the fence, and taking the same in his
arms, he boldly entered the house by a back door,
and hurried as fast as possible to the front. In doing
this he was obliged to pass the apartment where
Grace and her mother were clinging to each other
in their agony of apprehension. But he heeded them
not, till, having thrown open a window which
looked
upon the street, he crowded the bed through it,
when the people outside seized upon the same amidst
the most tremendous acclamations.
The crowd having attained its object, and, as it is
supposed, compelled the counsellor to humble
himself
in obedience to their will, immediately began to
move off; and so rapid was their departure, that
before
Fitzvassal could collect himself sufficiently to
explain the cause of his intrusion, the ladies had
ceased to fear any further effects of their violence.
As Fitzvassal entered from one door of the
drawing-room
,
Mr. Temple came in through the other.
The latter had observed his conduct and perfectly
apprehended his purpose; and rejoining as he did to
find the expedient successful, it was not singular
that he should immediately congratulate him on his
adroitness.
Really, Captain Nix, said he, approaching our
adventurer, and grasping him cordially by the hand,
you seem to have been set apart by heaven for the
accomplishment of great objects: and this, too,
appears
to be a favorite field for your chivalry. It was
but the other day you saved the life of young
Seymour
as well as
Is it possible that this is the gentleman,
exclaimed
Mrs. Wilmer in astonishment, to whom we are
so deeply indebted? And she looked from one to the
other, as much as to indicate that she had not the
pleasure of Fitzvassal's acquaintance.
Pardon me, ladies, said Mr. Temple, I thought
that you were acquainted with my friend.
He then, without further ceremony, presented the
supposed Captain Nix to them.
The color slightly mantled on Fitzvassal's cheek
as he found himself playing the hypocrite in the
presence of her he adored; and the deep roses
shadowed
the cheeks and temples of the beautiful girl as
she courtesied before the enamored gaze of her
admirer
.
As Mrs. Wilmer had been the first to lead the
conversation
,
she did not suffer it to lag, but relieved
Fitzvassal from the unavoidable embarrassment of
one who had to meet the acknowledgments of their
18*
gratitude in advance, by addressing him with great
kindness.
It would not be easy for us, Captain Nix, to
express
to you how very much we thank you for your
great kindness to us; nor do we deem it a slight
favor
that you have been instrumental in preserving
the life of one whom we value so much as we do
Mr. Temple.
The venerable gentlemen bowed courteously at
this compliment, and the psuedo-captain Nix replied,
that it was the highest happiness a sailor could enjoy
to be the means of affording the slightest satisfaction
to the most accomplished of their sex.
Mr. Temple now explained to the ladies the cause
of the popular disturbance, and when they
understood
the peculiar favor which had been extended to
them by the presence of mind and the promptitude of
Fitzvassal's service, they renewed to him the sense
which they entertained of his goodness, and
overwhelmed
him with their thanksgivings.
The service which Fitzvassal had rendered in this
last instance to the Wilmers, was indeed more
important
than it appeared; for the crowd believing
that their demand had not been complied with from
the deliberate determination of Mr. Wilmer, whom
they supposed to be secreted in the house, were
already
proceeding to violent measures, and were
beginning
to tear down the fence that bordered on the
street; while some were taking the blinds from their
hinges, and doing other acts of an aggressive nature,
which, if they had not been timely put a stop to by
the sudden diversion of our adventurer, might have
been carried to the most deplorable lengths.
Mrs. Wilmer and her daughter, as we have before
noticed, regularly attended the congregational
churches
,
and were in fact strict Presbyterians, so far as the
observances of the sabbath required; but, as respects
the innocent amusements of life, they conformed as
nearly to the usages of the Catholics as Mr. Wilmer
did; so that, by a happy combination, they perhaps
evinced finer specimens of character than could be
anywhere else found among the colonists. Formed
as they were by the discipline and liberality of two
different sects, they made themselves agreeable to
individuals
of both parties; and it was a common
remark
,
that, go where you would, there was no society
in New England more cultivated and polite than
that in the domestic circle of the Wilmers.
The uproar of the distant multitude was now so loud,
that Fitzvassal and Mr. Temple, feeling a deep
interest
in the fate of the unhappy Classon, took their
leave of the ladies, and withdrew. Bending their
steps toward the bottom of the Common, they soon
came to the scene of the disturbance. A graver's kettle
had been brought out from the yard adjoining the
rope-walk, and a barrel of tar emptied into it, under
which a fire was soon kindled. Classon was then
stripped naked, and daubed, by means of a mop, from
head to foot, care being taken to leave his eyes, nose,
mouth and ears free from the unctuous matter. As
soon as this was done, the feather-bed was ripped
open, and Classon rolled over in it till he was more
effectually covered than a bird; presenting
altogether
the most grotesque appearance that could be
produced by any disguise.
While this operation was going on, the populace
kept up a continual uproar, seeming to take the
greatest delight in thus showing their abhorrence of
a man who, though a born citizen of the place,
added
to the most profligate and abandoned life a total
disregard of all the duties of a patriot.
They now replaced him in the pillory, and
paraded
him over the city with Sir Edmund Andros's
flag of truce flying above his head; nor did they fail
to make a circuit of Fort Hill, uttering groans and
imprecations, till finally, as if their rage had become
exhausted, they released the miserable man, who was
borne, half-lifeless, to his own house near
Winnissimmit
Ferry. The crowd now dispersed with more
order than could have been expected; and long
before
the sun had sunk below the horizon, there was
not the slightest indication in the town that any
rioting had occurred among the people.
CHAPTER IX.
The great agent in this affair is the Sibyl.
Warburton, Div. Leg.
A type of Heaven, a lively hue of hell.
Gascoigne
,
Voyage into Holland
.
the fruit
Of that forbidden tree, whose mortal taste
Brought death
Milton
.
We
return now to the Dolphin. The evening on
which she left her anchorage in the harbor of Mount
Wallaston, she passed down the inner bay of Boston,
with her sails all set, a gentle breeze blowing from
the south-west. Passing some of the loveliest islands
in the world, the rock-bound promontory of Nahant
appeared about a mile before her, just as the moon
arose from out the Atlantic horizon.
For wildness and natural beauty, few places can
compare with Nahant. It lies between Boston and
Salem, coastwise stretching out into the sea, and
nearly equidistant from those places. From the
main land it is nearly two miles away, approached
only by a path over two beautiful beaches rolled by
the pressure of the waves harder than the best
gravel-walk
,
and glittering in the sunshine with
exceeding
beauty. On the left, as you approach
Nahant
by the beach, Egg-Rock lies off about a mile
and a half, towering in solitary grandeur one
hundred
and fifty feet from the level of the sea.
At high tide it is very difficult to reach Nahant at
all by the beach, and it has sometimes happened, that
when there have been extraordinary tides, the
traveller
,
too rashly calculating on the possibility of the
passage, has been overwhelmed in the waves that on
such occasions roll in with terrific power and
rapidity
.
Many a time have we made that passage, when
the carriage was nearly lifted and borne away by the
surf,or on horseback, when the animal had to
struggle for his life in the billows.
The wild beauties of Nahant are exceedingly
peculiar
.
There is a place there called the
Spouting-Horn
,a
deep, curving fissure in the rocks, where
the waves, setting in with fury, dash the water up
mast-high with a subterranean roar that is sometimes
frightful;but as the waves roll back again, and the
thunder below you for the moment ceases, the spray
of the subsiding waters catches the rays of the
setting
sun, and forms the most beautiful rainbows.
The whole border of Nahant is one chain of black,
rugged rocks, that seem to have been heaved up
from the centre of the earth by some terrible
convulsion
,
and thrown there in the utmost disorder; and
against and over these dark masses, the north-east
furiously
drives the scared waves of the Atlantic, that
come tumbling in with unbroken precipitation, where
they are doomed to vex themselves for ever without
rest.
Next to the Spouting-Horn, Swallow's Cave is the
most remarkable feature of Nahant. It is a small
cavern lying to the south-west of the peninsula, close
to the water's edge, that seems to have been hollowed
out by the art and industry of man. From this cavern
there is a passage through to the south-east, formed
by a narrow fissure in the rock, which is bridged
ever by a single stone, covered with turf. The place
is supposed to have been named from a belief that it
was a favorite building-spot for swallows; but
tradition
provides us with a more fanciful origin,that it
was called after an Indian girl, who was the wonder
of the neighboring towns, and who was called the
Swallow, because she skimmed in her bark canoe,
swallow-like, over the waters.
Nameoke, the reputed grand-daughter of Massasoit,
and the daughter of Philip, king of the Wompanoags,
was now the sole occupant of Nahant. On the death
of her father and mother, whose fates were so
melancholy
,
the former having been slain after his defeat
by the white people, and the latter drowned in her
attempt to escape, Nameoke was for a while
protected
by the Narragansetts; till, becoming attached
to a young Englishman, she was seduced a way from
their guardianship and protection. But it was not
long before she was deserted by the heartless villain,
innocent through her own high virtue, but desolate
and brain-touched, to listen to the unhealthy throbbings
of her own sorrow-burthened heart, and to long for
that corporeal change which haply might bring with
it repose. In her despair she hired herself out as a
serving-maid to an old gentleman, who, in the
neighborhood
of Lynn, passed his days in lonely
contemplation
.
The history of that man was never wholly
known; but he was believed to have fled from
England
to shield himself from that fabricated scheme,
the Popish Plot, which it was the policy of the
reformed
people of England to keep alive in the
imagination
of the multitude, a participation in which
was more or less imputed to those who were
particularly
odious to them and of the Catholic persuasion.
This man devoted his life, as many did in that
day, to the study of judicial astrology, and of those
Chaldan experiments which at once show the
aspiring
and heaven-projected genius of man, and
explain
the mystery of the tree which stood in the
garden
of God. As Plato revived the
Know Thyself
of the ancients, and explained it to his disciples, so
shall still greater arcana be unfolded from those two
words, and revelations undreamed and unimagined
by man, be brought bodily before his vision. Here
and there, at immense distances of time, light has been
let down upon the eyes of humanity, but as yet it could
not bear it, and it was withdrawn; yet has it been given
to a few to see what is now ineffable, and to speak
darkly
of the future, that a gradual preparation may be
made for that which cannot be sudden in its advent.
To this man, Nameoke endeared herself by the
wildness and originality of her genius, and by the
gentleness of her affections. To her he imparted all
the wonders and mysteries of his learning. In short
he treated her more like a child of his own, than as
a domestic whose duty it was to serve him; and
as neither of them held much communion with the
world, they became mutually attached to each other
on that account. Under his tuition Nameoke soon
acquired the English language, which she spoke as
well as he, though she retained much of her native
modes of expression. The old man died, after
Nameoke
had lived with him five years; and then she
was a beautiful girl of nineteen, thrown on the rough
world without any protection but her own powerful
character, and on this she determined forth with to
implicitly rely.
Once only had she visited Nahant in company
with her generous protector, to gather the wild
yarrow
by moonlight, and pull the sponge from the
Sunken
Ledge. Here, in her wanderings, she discovered
the rocky cavern, which even then appeared the
most alluring spot she had seen; and to this
secluded
19
place her mind reverted, when the gravel
rattled
on the coffin of the old astrologer, and she found
herself once more alone in the pitiless world.
At the epoch of our story, Nameoke was
twenty-two
years old, and eminently beautiful. Her figure
was tall, and curving in all the lines of elegance and
grace. She moved like the bending maize, and
glided
over the ground like its shadow. Her eyes and
hair were as dark as the raven down of midnight
when to the vision of the poet it is smiling at the
music of the spheres. Her features were perfectly
regular: her teeth as white as the apple blossoms,
and her breath sweeter than their fragrance. The
expression of her eyes told of a bosom full of all
sweet harmonies, sweeter and infinitely purer and
dearer for the rude discords that had sometimes
disturbed
their undulations, but had driven them nearer
to heaven. Alas! how few are there who are
capable
of comprehending a true woman; how few of
the sex who are willing to be loved as they ought!
Nameoke's winter dress was a mantle of
mole-skins
,
opening over a neat tunic, upon which a
necklace
of the rarest and whitest shells hung in graceful
festoons. Around her waist she wore a belt made
of interwoven porcupine quills variously colored, in
which was thrust a dirk in a silver sheath. Her lower
dress was of fine deer-skin, highly ornamented with
quills and other fancy-work; and her feet were
protected
by half-boots of buck-skin, profusely in wrought
with small beads and shells. Her hair, which
streamed over her shoulders, was confined by a
narrow
band of silver round her forehead; and she held
in her hand a mace of ebony, damascened with
ivory and gold, and terminated by a massive head of
diamond cut steel, that glittered in the sunshine like
that it was intended to represent.
Such was Nameoke, or the Swallow as she was more
commonly called by those who know of her; and
now, since the death of her protector, she was often
sought by unhappy lovers or desperate maidens, and
sometimes by characters of the highest standing, who,
according to the current of the times, believed in the
influence of the stars.
When the Dolphin came within sight of the
Swallow's Cave, about half a mile off, and a little to
the east of the same, Morgan ordered to let go the
anchor, and in a few minutes the vessel was snug at
her moorings, with all her sails brailed up and furled
for the night.
During the passage down, Felton as well as
Morgan
kept a sharp look-out; and as they had
discovered
nothing in chase of them, and indeed no sail of
any sort in sight, they felt very confident that there
would no interruption occur that night: and they
accordingly
set the usual watch, and were preparing to
turn in, when Morgan called the attention of the
officer
to a singular light, which flamed up from the
peninsula in the neighborhood of the Spoting-Horn,
and operated powerfully to awaken the curiosity of
the latter to inquire into its cause.
While he was examining this appearance as well
as he could with the night-glass, he observed a figure
standing erect on the summit of Pulpit-Rock, a high
solitary cliff that, like the leaning tower of Pisa, seems
to threaten its down thundering every moment. The
figure looked to him like that of an Indian, but he
could not distinctly ascertain whether it were or not;
but while he was questioning his judgment relative
to it, a voice stole over the water, combining more
power, sweetness, and feeling than the mariner ever
remembered to have heard. So impressive was it, that
he bowed his head in his hands, and listened with
rapt entrancement. Presently it ceased; yet still he
listened in the hope of hearing more, when, raising
his eyes, he saw a canoe shoot forward in the bright
wake of the moon, while the same sweet sounds came
tremblingly over the water, and spell-bound the
hearer
with its melody.
Pray what sort of a place do you call this,
Morgan
?
inquired the bewildered seaman; it must be
Mermaid's Cove or the paradise of the Sirens, for I
never heard such music in my life.
It's a haunted island, to be sure, said the pilot;
pray tell us if you have never been here before?
Never! replied Felton. I never was in this
part of the world till this trip, and I must confess I
never saw any place wilder or more attractive.
Did you ever hear of a singing-swallow?
inquired
Morgan, spurting his tobacco-juice over the
leeward of the vessel, and looking up into the face of
the officer with a most knowing glance.
I can't say that I ever did, answered the other.
But you have, though, notwithstanding,
resumed
the joker; for the music which you have been
praising so mightily, comes from a swallow's throat as
sure as my name is Jake Morgan.
Don't try to fool me
that
way, Jake, said
Felton
,
I don't pretend to understand what you mean
by a singing-swallow and all that nonsense; but if
that voice which I heard just now doesn't come from
the throat of a woman, blow me if it did not come
from an angel's or a devil'sthat's all.
Morgan burst out into a loud fit of laughter at this
remark, but as he did not feel in a humor to joke any
more at present, he intimated his intention of taking
a night-cap, which he accomplished as soon as
possible
,
and then turned into his berth, where in a few
minutes he was sound asleep.
Felton paced the quarter-deck a long time in the
hope that the music would be repeated, but in vain.
At one time he thought that he perceived the canoe
glide by in the shadow of the shore toward the
Swallow's
Cave, and the lurid light in the neighborhood
of the Spouting-Horn was now almost extinguished.
He therefore, despairing of hearing a renewal of the
songs that fascinated him so strongly, determined to
19*
follow the example of the pilot, and, like him, he was
soon wrapped in the slumbers of oblivion; but though
the cares of the day were forgotten, he had
moonlight
visitations in his dreams, and a voice sweeter
than the song of the nightingale's, which he had often
listened to at home, came to him like a voice from
faery land invested with the gayest influences of
imagination
.
Though the Dolphin remained several days at her
anchorage, there occurred no repetition of the sights
and sounds which had engaged the attention of
Felton
,
who, though he went often ashore, could never
discover any vestige of the singular apparition which
he had seen on the first night of his coming: but
had he found his way to the Swallow's Cave, he
might have seen traces of one who was destined to
have so large an interest in his fortunes.
It was on the evening of the fourth day that
Felton
,
in watching the horizon, as he constantly did in
every direction, at length discovered a sail-boat, that
seemed to be bearing down towards them.
Take a squint through this glass, Morgan, said
the officer, and tell a body what you make of it; it
strikes me that it is the captain.
Morgan took the glass, and almost immediately
exclaimed;
That's she, as sure as a gun, and the Captain in
her. How the Jenny streaks it through the water!
There's a Swallow now, Mr. Felton, something like,
and she makes music too wherever she goesOh
she's a beauty, that she is!
And that reminds me, Morgan, said the officer,
that you have not yet explained to me what you
meant the other evening when you yarned so
obscurely
about a certain singing swallow. Come now,
clear away the fog, and give us a peep at your
meaning
.
Why, you see, said Morgan, the fact is, I was
afeard that if I gin you any information about the
petticoat that lives yonder, you would go crazy and
drown yourself. I knew well enough that such
information
as I might have gin you would have made
you desert the Dolphin;and by the way, I doubt
very much whether the Captain wouldn't have
changed his anchorage if he had known as much
about Nahant as I do.
You speak in riddles, exclaimed the officer,
whose curiosity was excited to the highest pitch by
the insinuation of Morgan, don't let a body die of
his ignorance, when you are able to relieve him; what
is
all this about the Swallow, Jake!
Why, the story's a purty long one, said Morgan,
and I am afeard the Captain will be here afore it
is completed; howsomever, I'll gin you some idea on't.
You see, then, in the first place, there's an Indian gal
lives on that are place over there, all alone by
herself
The devil, you say! exclaimed the mariner.
No; I don't say no such thing, said Morgan; but
I
do
say she's the handsomest gal, by golly, that ever
you set your eyes on.
By the thundering Mars, then, shouted the
officer
,
clapping his hands, I'll see her yet.
There! I knew how it would be with you; but I
can tell you, you had better attack a grampus than
that same Indian gal.
And what has she to do with the
singing-swallow
,
I should like to know?
Plenty to do with it; but the devil of it is she
won't let any body else meddle with the swallow at
allfor, d'ye see, she's the singing swallow herself.
Do you mean to say, inquired Felton, that the
delicious voice I heard the other evening came from
an Indian girl?
I do mean jest that, and nothing more or less,
replied Morgan; but only look, he continued, at
the Jenny; Jehu! how she goes it; the Captain will
be here in ten minutesI wonder if he will bring
us any news.
How long has that girl lived there? asked
Felton
,
who was so deeply interested in the Indian girl,
that he was not willing to be so readily baulked out
of an account of her.
Blazes! exclaimed Morgan, haven't you done
thinking of petticoat yet? I wonder if you have left
any wife at home who would be as much interested
in singing-swallows as you are:perhaps it would
be worth while to take one home with you, provided
always, as the lawyers say, you can get one:a
singing-swallow, in a cage
near
your house in the
country, hey? a good idea, isn't it?
Capital, no doubt;how old is this girl you tell
of?
Ah! there's the rubwhat do you think of
forty-five
?
inquired Morgan, delighted that he had an
opportunity of tantalizing the sailor.
Fudge! exclaimed the officer, if she had been
any thing like that time off the stocks, you wouldn't
have troubled your clam-shell all this while about her;
I suppose we may put her down at half that age,
hey?
You've hit it, cried Morgan, to the last turn of
a splice; the gal, they say, isn't twenty-two yet.
And is beautiful?
As the full moon!
And lives all alone?
A perfect she-hermit.
Won't she let people come to see her?
Ah, you are a knowing old wharf-rat, cried
Morgan
,
cutting his eye cunningly at the officer.
No, but none of your nonsense, replied the
officer
with a sort of moral indignant tone, can't a
fellow ask such a question as that without being taken
for a wharf-rat as you call it? I am interested
about that girl:but here comes your boat with the
Captain.
Sure enough, Morgan's boat was now alongside
the Dolphin, the Captain seated in the stern-sheets.
As he came came up to the gangway, he brailed up
the sail, and heaving the painter aboard the vessel,
the boat was secured, and Fitzvassal once more stood
upon the deck of his favorite.
Our adventurer nodded to his officers, and
expressed
towards them, as well as to his crew, the pleasure
he derived on being once more with them, and
casting
a scrutinizing glance at his spars and rigging,
and finding them all as they should be, he turned to
admire the lovely spot which had been selected as a
harbor for the Dolphin. He was now standing on
the quarter-deck with Felton, and his eye roved with
a pleasurable expression around the scene.
How is the bottom here, Mr. Felton? inquired
Fitzvassal of his lieutenant, does the anchor take
hold well?
Never better, Sir, was the reply; I think she
could hold on in a north-east gale of wind.
You have had no experience, Mr. Felton, of one
of our north-easters; they are hard enough
sometimes
almost to blow yonder rocks out of water.
We are pretty well sheltered though, by the
peninsula
,
which is the best natural break-water I ever
saw; but I had rather be well out at sea with the wind
blowing a hurricane off shore, than anywhere
hereabouts
within twenty miles of blue water.
Do the north easters prevail much this time
o'year? inquired the officer.
Not particularly, said the Captain; but they are
felt during all seasons. I have known as hard as any
in August. During the equinoxes, of course, they
rage most violently.
Have you any settled purpose about
remaining
here? asked the officer, turning his eyes in the
direction of the Swallow's Cave.
It it important, Sir, replied the commander, to
remain here for the presentfor you must know
that I am called on by circumstances unforeseen by
either of us, to take an active part in the political
movements of the day!
You surprise me! exclaimed Felton in
undisguised
astonishment; how has that happened?
Would you believe it? resumed Fitzvassal,
the leading characters in Boston take me for Nix,
and I pass as
Captain Nix
among them.
How is that possible?
The packet which I felt an interest in delivering
according to the address, for the sake of those who
are suffering under the galling chains of tyrants,
was marked, you are aware, `By the favor of
Captain
Nix;' it moreover contained a letter,
recommending
the said worthy to the particular
consideration
of the Bostonians, and so I, by a kind of pious
fraud, am reaping all the laurels of Nix.
Nix, then, was never in Boston?
Never.
And how are you so connected with political
matters, that your presence is necessary hereabouts?
There is a strong indication of a great popular
movement for liberty, and the people have no
navy.
Have you promised your assistance?
Most certainly!
Perhaps then, we shall have the honor of engaging
the Rose frigate! said the officer, his face flushing
with the thought.
I think it very probable, replied the
commander
,
that she will give us some work to do, and I
believe we could beat the frigate, though she is so
much heavier than the Dolphin. I think we shall
try it, if a chance offers.
What are they about in town?
They are as noisy and turbulent as butchers'
dogs, answered the commander, and no wonder at
it. There is nothing worth living for in that place,
with one glorious exception. Since the colonies
have been deprived of their charters, they have been
making leeway at a rapid rate. It is now several
years since I was in Boston, and positively I could
not believe my own eyes that such a change should
have taken place. There is no law or order there
whatever, and the people are treated like brutes.
Would yon believe it, Mr. Felton, a press-gang only
yesterday had the assurance to go ashore in open
day, and endeavor to carry off half a dozen citizens
to the frigate.
And did they succeed?
Succeed, hey? Why, what do you think the
people of Boston are made of? No, Sir, they did
not
succeed; but they got most gloriously hammered as
they deserved, and such a mob as grew out of it you
hardly ever saw in London.
Did any mischief ensue? inquired Felton.
They made out to tar and feather one
scoundrel
.
And Fitzvassal sighed deeply at the sorrows and
misery which the thought of his step-father
suggested
.
The fellow richly deserved it, he continued,
rallying
himself; he was a villain, and a Tory to boot.
But we must be in readiness for action, in case this
disturbance should result in a general insurrection;
though I have been assured that there is no danger of
it. The people are as yet ignorant of the extent of
their sufferings. They lean on hope, but the anchor
is too weak to hold them.
In conversation like the foregoing, the remainder
of the day passed off, the Dolphin lying idly at
anchor
within the curving bay, and nothing
transpiring
to interrupt the monotony of the scene but the
large gulls that wheeled away in the blue air, and
now and then dipped to the water for fish, or the
20
seals that occasionally showed themselves under the
stern of the vessel.
The mariners, some of them, were engaged in
mending the sails and rigging, and in such other
matters as were necessary to be attended to on
board; while others were fishing from about the
bows for perch and cod, and two were busying
themselves
in the jolly-boat among the rocks for lobsters.
All these were procured in the greatest abundance;
nor was there wanting a goodly supply of ducks,
which the skill of the men brought down as they
rose from the water.
In the meantime, Felton had not failed to inform
the commander of the surprising appearances on
shore, with a view to obtain permission to go that
night and explore the causes of the same. This was
readily granted; for Fitzvassal considered it as
nothing
more than a freak of sailor fancy, and a
pretext
,
perhaps, of passing a leisure hour on the main
land in the distance.
Felton was a gentlemanly-looking mariner, about
thirty years old. His eyes and hair were very black,
his complexion was olive. He was above the
middle
height, and in his whole expression, air, and
manner, seemed to be a sensualist and desperado.
He was a person of great enterprize and daring, and
was always ready to engage in perilous encounters
and hair-breadth dangers. He was now bent on
finding the beautiful girl, the brief hint of whose
existence
and solitude had fired his imagination; and
as the gong told the hour of changing the watch at
nine o'clock, he had entered a barge, and was on the
way to the shore.
His first determination was to land at the
Swallow's
Cave; but as he was afraid of being watched by
his commander or by Jake Morgan, he changed his
purpose in this particular, and ordered the coxswain
to steer round the Sunken Ledge, which is a reef
of rocks stretching out by the southern part of
the peninsula, and to land him as near the Pulpit
Rock as was practicable. Accordingly, the barge
ran close under that beetling crag, and Felton,
leaping
on the rocks, bade the coxswain return to the
vessel, and come again for him when he should make
a signal on the morning.
Felton was wrapped close in his watch-coat, a
pair of pistols and a dagger at his girdle inside; for
though he did not think of any thing but the lovely
recluse of Nahant, it was an indispensable habit with
all the officers as well as men of the Dolphin, to be
thus prepared for any emergency.
He had now climbed the rocks, and reached the
grassy plain above, from which position, by the
bright star-light, he could plainly discover the
schooner
lying away to the right in the range of Boston,
and the barge moving rapidly through the water to
the regular cadence of the rowers. He waited where
he was till he saw the boat along-side, and heard the
heave-hos of the sailors as they hoisted it again to
the vessel's davits; and then, after listening awhile to
the beating of the surf on the rocks, he bent his
footsteps
toward the eastern point of the peninsula, with
the purpose of reconnoitering the entire place.
He had not proceeded far before the same lurid
appearance, which had first attracted his notice,
presented itself in the vicinity of the Spouting-Horn;
and he heard from another direction the same
music
that had before entranced him. His first impulse
was to hasten, and ascertain by a nearer examination
from what cause it proceeded, when his purpose was
arrested by a symphonious breathing like olian
lyres in concert. He turned, and paused to listen to
the sounds which seemed to proceed from the
mysterious
cavern at the south-west; but as soon as he
had been convinced in this conjecture, the avenue
was on a sudden changed, and it seemed that Pulpit
Rock was the source of those sweet harmonies.
It is very remarkable, thought Felton, that
precisely the same sounds should proceed from such
opposite directions! And as he thought of the
heavenly minstrelsy, it seemed to him that he was
not so bad a man after all.
While he was yet flattering himself with this
consolatory
reflection, a peal of such unnatural and
diabolical
laughter rose on the wind from the
Spouting-Horn
,
that as Felton turned involuntarily in that
direction
,
his blood ran cold with horror.
Thrice was this hellish sound repeated ere the
mariner could sufficiently collect his energies to
think calmly and resolve coolly: and while he
rallied
his courage, he saw the thick smoke curl away
above the blue flame, and he now urged his footsteps
thither. He had already proceeded some way under
the full determination of confronting whomever they
might be that uttered such hideous noises, when he
started to feel a touch upon his shoulder. He
suddenly
turned, and the figure of the Indian
enchantress
was standing full before him, the light of the
high blazing fire gleaming vividly upon it. Never
was there such majestic beauty as presented itself that
moment before the mariner. Her head and figure
thrown a little back, her left arm stretched toward
him, and the mace in her right hand thrown over
her shoulder, as if to indicate the way he ought to
go, she exclaimed:
Fly! white-man, fly!Nameoke has read the
starsgo not where mirth is madnessfly ere it be
too late!
As she spake, her hair streamed to the breeze, while
her eyes looked wilder and more beautiful than the
startled fawn's; and as she ceased, her lips were still
parted, as if a spirit of intelligence breathed through
them.
What have I to fear, exclaimed the entranced
voluptuary, under the influence of such beauty?
20*
so electrified was he by the suddenness of her
appearance
.
Nameoke has seen the star of love in gloom,
she replied; and the cynosure drop blood from the
bear;turn, white-man, ere the moon comes up from
the waters, for it will else rise drenched in thy
life-blood
turn!
The fire that gleamed so fearfully, now went
strangely out, but it flamed again in a moment, and
the figure of the Indian girl was gone. Felton was
confounded; but before he could realize her
departure
,
the same sweet music swelled upon the air, and
seemed to woo him to its birth-place.
By the Spirit of darkness, muttered the man in
his amazement, but this is passing strange. Was
there ever such glorious beauty as that on earth
before
?
I will have her, if I go through hell to achieve
it!
As though it were responsive to this oath, a peal of
the same infernal laughter echoed among the crags,
and went like an ice-bolt to his bosom.
Felton nevertheless sprang forward, more resolved
than ever to find out the cause of the unearthly
voices, which would have intimidated a bolder man
than he. Grasping a pistol in his right hand, he
redoubled his pace, and was moving at a rapid rate,
when the enchantress again checked his career.
Beware! she exclaimed, the blood that falls
from the bear is now mingling with the dews
return
to your evil bark as you love the atmosphere you
are breathingreturn before it is too late.
Felton caught her hand, exclaiming,
Inexplicable woman! I will
not
return till my
curiosity is satisfiedI came here to find no other but
yourselfwhy do you now warn me away? I
already
love you as my life, and will never leave you.
The same diabolical laughter swelled again on the
airand a noise swept by them like the rushing of
a hundred rockets.
They have discovered you! exclaimed the
enchantress
,
I feared that it would be soLook
yonder
!
did you see that meteor stream upon the sky?
I care for no meteors, nor for the old boy
himself
,
said Felton; but I will swear that yon are a
thousand times more beautiful than the stars.
And more fatal, sighed the sibyl; Nameoke is
a poison-flower of the forest. The flower saves and
destroys.
Charming Nameoke! exclaimed the
impassioned
voluptuary, you are too beautiful to destroy;
save me then from the burning flames that consume
methe flames that are kindled by thy beauty!
Follow me! cried the beautiful enchantress,
Nameoke would save thee and
him
from ruin
but the stars tell of wailing and sorrowthere are
changes and deaths in their dwelling.
She then gathered the millefolio, and taking from her
bosom a sprig of the Chaldan roybra, said to him,
Hold these together in your hand, and you will be
secure from every fear and fantasm.
Felton took the plants, and held them as he was
directed to do; for the sorceress spoke with such
authority
,
that he vainly endeavored to throw off her
influence, and he was surprised to find that
immediately
a supernatural courage took possession of
him, and, without feeling reckless, his heart was
strengthened with an irresistible power, which
seemed
to clothe it in steel.
This is very wonderful truly, exclaimed the
astonished Felton; whence do these herbs derive
such singular virtue?
All things are for good and evil, replied
Nameoke
,
and it is the fate of man never to be
without
the knowledge of both. Nameoke loves to do
good, but her instruments are powerful as well for
evil.
After walking for a few minutes, they came to the
rocky cavern where the enchantress dwelt. They
descended over rough stones andg rael close to the
water's edge.
See where Nameoke dwells! she exclaimed,
a brave dwelling, where she sleeps and is lulled by
the lapsing of the waters; but we must have a
light.
With one stroke of her mace she caused the fire
to stream from a huge fragment of flint upon a
handful
of dry moss, and throwing on this pieces of wood
that had floated from some wreck, in an
inconceivable
short time a fire flamed up through the cavern,
and sent across the water toward the vessel a brilliant
sheet of light.
As the flame arose, a current of cold air swept
through the fissure, and a hundred different sea-birds
went flapping and screaming to the night, and a
dozen
bats came driving against the fire, attracted by its
dazzling splendor.
Nameoke is not alone! said the Sibyl, hear
how the fowls scream at her cominghark! 'tis the
roaring of the sea-monsters, the fire has aroused them
from their slumbers.
The enchantress now took an iron pot from
beneath
some sea-weed, and dipping up salt water with a
shell, poured it therein. She then cast into the same
handfulls of dried herbs, the Heliotrope,
Virga-Pastoris
,
Centaurea, Nepta Verbena, Rosa Serpentina,
and other magical plants, to which she added Alloes
and bits of Sandal-wood. She then climbed within
the fissure of the cavern, and brought down a couple
of star-fish, which she cast into the pot, murmuring
over it a charm in the Arabian dialect approved by
Albumazah.
Instantly a peculiarly red flame shot forth, and
then, a dense smoke smothering it, rose and filled the
cavern. Nameoke now murmured a brief
incantation
,
and the smoke again drove away and left the fire
flaming as before.
She now strained the decoction through a silver
seive, and pouring a part into a goblet of the same
metal, threw what remained into the sea.
Now drink from this, exclaimed the enchantress,
and it will render you invisible to all who work
charms for evil, and then come with Nameoke, and
she will show you things equally novel and
wonderful
.
Charming Nameoke! cried the ardent
voluptuary
,
I have drunk so deeply from the magic of
thy beauty, that further sorcery would kill me.
Come to my arms, he cried, clasping her violently;
come to my arms, beautiful Nameoke, and make me
the happiest of mortals.
Felton!
said the enchantress, in a tone that
surprised
him even more than the utterance of his name,
drive away that viper from your bosom, or it will
sting you to death. I know you well, and those with
whom you are living. Begone from me, unless you
can be a man and not a fiend!
Is it any crime to adore one so beautiful?
exclaimed
Felton; is there any thing more innocent
than love?
There is love in the heavens and love in the
hells, replied the enchantress; would Felton see
the difference between them?
Love knows no difference, said the mariner,
his visage reddening with excitement, and his eyes
gloating on the imperial beauty, with the fire of the
black snake when he would charm a bird to its
destruction
;
Love knows no difference, Nameoke;
it must be the same wherever it liveswhether in
a palace or in a rocky cavern, whether in your
fabled
heaven or in your hell.
Nameoke will show you then the difference,
exclaimed the Sibyl, and when you know how
far they are from being the same, perhaps you may fly
from the love that curses, and leave her and your
evil courses, unless you are too fixed in their delights.
This talisman will draw away the veil that hangs
between the natural and the spiritual: take it!
So saying, she suspended a mystic charm about
his neck, while she threw wood of the Aloes, Crocus
and Balsam into the fire, and at the same time smote
the rocky cavern with her mace: when immediately
a peal of thunder burst above their heads with the
uproar of an earthquake, and as if a thousand gongs
had been smitten at once, the cavern split asunder
and Felton found himself with Nameoke in the
midst of sylvan scenery, more magnificent and
lovely
than the imagination of poet ever conceived in
dreams of Arabian intoxication.
They were walking hand in hand in a garden,
where apparently Nature and not Art strove for
mastery
;
for though flowers of innumerable genera and
species were blooming in every direction and in the
exactest order, there was a wildness in the
arrangement
which was the result of perfect contrivance.
In all directions there were walks of natural mosaic,
where countless stones of every imaginable shade
were blended in beautiful forms; and with such skill
had the artist designed them, that pictures of the
most exquisite loveliness varied like moving
kaleidoscopes
,
and seemed to carry out the very happiness of
the gazer into bodily creations; over these walks,
trees of infinite variety, in blossom, in leaf, and
hanging
heavily with delicious fruits, arched in fantastic
garlands, and swung gracefully and wooingly in the
air. At the termination of some of the alleys
stretched
immense lawns, bordered by gently undulating
uplands, and swelling higher and higher in the
distance
,
till hills were overtopped by hills more lofty
and still more lofty, and at length terminated by
majestic
mountains, that sent their towering pinnacles
among the clouds, and rested in perpetual sunshine.
In the intermediate spaces were seen meandering
rivers, that, winding among the swelling waves of
greenery, broke out at intervals like sparkling
crystal
,
where swans were sailing two and two, and
plashing
in the wider and nearer lake-like harbor that
reflected
from its unruffled surface the whole landscape
and the sky around them; this deepened toward
the zenith, from the brightest ultramarine to the
celestial
sapphire. In all directions fountains of clearest
water burst forth in forms that mocked all human
contrivance, and painted on the heavens such
glorious
rainbows, that the heart overflowed with
gladness
while the eye rested upon them. Here and
there were children engaged in innocent delights;
some of them sitting on banks of flowers, and
weaving
garlands for each other's heads; others sporting
with lambs of brilliant whiteness, and bounding with
them over the waving hills of close herbage, laughing
and shouting, and clapping their hands, the very
pictures of careless enjoyment.
The enchantress watched the mariner, who gazed
around with a pale and haggard countenance.
Surprise
was depicted in his features, but gladness was
a stranger to their expression.
This is a paradise of beauty and innocence,
exclaimed
the enchantress; how does it suit the rover
of the seas?
I see no beauty here, exclaimed Felton, it is
more insipid and irksome than a dead calm.
But look upon the skies, said the enchantress,
Nameoke would live there for ever; look upon the
landscape, see how the lights and shades blend
harmoniously
around us; can any thing be more lovely
than these walks and arbors? See there, how the
shadows from those beautiful clouds chase each other
over the fields, and are now lost in that dark forest;
and these fountains breaking up in so many
directions
!
Nameoke will tell you what they mean.
They are the correspondences of divine truth, and
they all come from one source. Their reservoir is
among those distant mountains, and they fall into the
21
earth and fertilize the ground, and take a thousand
different directions, that they may scatter blessings in
their path. See how they break up again, and lift
themselves toward their heaven, and rise to their
source proclaiming truth in their operations; how
beautifully they paint Hope among their rainbows!
I see the skies and the clouds, the shadows and
the landscape, the fountains and the rainbows,
exclaimed
Felton, listlessly; but I see nothing to give
me any pleasurecome, let us go away!
Stay awhile, said the Sibyl, Nameoke has not
shown you all. Cast your eyes through those smaller
mountains, where toward the east they break into a
vista, and one more lofty and magnificent than the
rest rises toward the heavens: do you see the one
Nameoke means?
I see a mountain higher than the others, replied
the mariner.
And do you see any thing uncommon about its
appearance?
I see a bright light streaming from the side, like
a small cloud blushing in the sunset.
Nameoke would have you watch it narrowly,
said the enchantress.
As she spoke, it came rapidly onward toward the
place where they were standing; and as it
approached
,
a strong light streamed as from a centre of intense
brightness surrounded by a circular Iris of
transcendant
glory. As it approached, the day seemed to
dawn anew, and the birds among the branches
of the fruit trees sang aloud with the
bltyhsomeness
of morning. The clouds, which were
hanging
about the sky in thick masses, and showing
their fine teints by every variety of contrast, now put
on the richest dresses of crimson and gold, while the
air seemed at once to be laden with the fragrance of
water-lilies and verbena.
Presently the seeming blaze of radiance assumed
another appearance. There was a chariot of mother
of pearl, wreathed into a more graceful form than a
sea-shell, and shining with enamel, in which
diamonds
and chrysolites circled it in many beautiful
bands, and which was drawn by four white horses
abreast, whose manes and tails flowed like masses
of silver hair, and whose forms were such as never
were before seen by man, so faultlessly were they
modelled. As they trampled through the
atmosphere
,
it seemed as if they threw up clouds of gold
and diamond dust, which the winds scattered behind
them in glittering profusion; while the Iris
deepened
its colors, and from the midst of it appeared a
man more glorious than the Apollo of antiquity, in
the lustre and beauty of early manhood, with his
head bound by a wreath of myrtle. His face shone
brighter than the sun, but so mildly in its lustre, that
to gaze on it was peace and tranquillity; and his hair
flowed over his shoulders like tresses of shadowing
topaz. Presently the chariot reached the ground,
and as it touched the earth, the trees snowed down
their blossoms, and the vines waved their graceful
festoons
,
and the birds sang so melodiously that it
seemed
as if an atmosphere of love were the breath that
gave life to every thing present.
On a sudden, the young man who sat in the
chariot
appeared as two, a bride and a bridegroom. His
form and features were unchanged, but there sat by
his side a female, whose loveliness was so surpassing
all imagination, that it were mockery to attempt its
description. Her attention seemed wholly occupied
with her partner, and she gazed on him with such
gentle and delicate affection that she appeared to be
the embodied form of one delicious emotion, which
was that of a first and only love. He gazed on her
with reciprocal fondness, and seemed like personified
thought dwelling enamouredly on the ideal object of
its adoration. They were goodness and truth living
in inseparable communion.
The young man now gave his hand to the female,
and they both sprang lightly to the ground; and as
they walked in one of the arbors like two angels in
the paradise of marriage, music, from an
undiscovered
source, swelled sweetly and softly among the
foliage
;
while the fragrance of the water-lilies and
verbena gave place to that of the orange-blossom and
the lime.
The enchantress turned from gazing on those
celestial objects to watch the mariner: but his eyes
were fixed on the earth. There was gladness every
where but in his own bosom, and the cloud that
shadowed his heart cast its gloom upon his pallid
countenance.
Take me, exclaimed he, in pity take me from
this place, which is more horrible to me than the
grave!
As he spoke, she smote the ground with her mace,
and in the midst of deafening thunder they were
once again by the seaside in the cave.
The sea-breeze sighing fitfully,swept coldly through
the fissures of the rocks, and fanned the cheek of
Felton, who, on reviving, found Nameoke feeding
again the flame that was nearly extinguished.
Are you awake? inquired the maiden.
Yes! replied the mariner; but I have had a
disagreeable dream.
Nameoke would have the dream instructive, said
the enchantress, with a look of melancholy; return
now to thy vessel yonder, and think no more of love,
which flames only to destroy.
Never! exclaimed the mariner, more
impassionedly
than ever; the insipidity of such love as comes
to us in dreams of flowers and romance will never
do for Felton. Nameoke, you must be mine to-night,
or I perish!
Stay! cried the enchantress, did not Nameoke
say that she had seen the star of love in gloom, and
the cynosure dropping blood from the bear? Did
21*
not Nameoke say that the moon might rise this night
drenched in the white-man's blood?
You are wild, beautiful creature, cried the
enamoured
mariner, but your surprising beauty
inflames
the more for your very extravagance. By the
mad dogs of Hell, you shall be mine this moment!
Hold! shrieked the Sibyl, as the rude touch of
the sailor would have profaned her person! hold,
for the love of heaven.There is one chance for
Felton yet, before the moon shall bathe within his
bloodAppear!
As she spake, she threw a portion of galbanus,
dark sandalus and resin on the fire, and amidst the
most deafening clangor that roared from beneath the
sea, the cavern of the enchantress was rent from its
basis, and she stood with the mariner in the abodes of
the damned.
They were standing in one of a long,
interminable
succession of caverns that were vaulted by black
and smoky rocks, where bats of all horrible forms,
were flitting to and fro, and lizards and centipedes
were crawling amidst the damp, dripping walls.
There was a table spread in the centre of this
apartment
,
with a crimson cloth, and was lighted by
flam-beaux
of pitch; a number of guests were seated at
it, carousing from large goblets, their heads bound
with poppy and mandragora, their faces red and
glistening
with excitement. There were men and
women
in that company, seated alternately; and the
women were in half undress, and were kept from
falling to the ground by the arms of the men, so
drunken were they with the drink; but every now
and then a centipede dropped from the wall into a
goblet, and the man and woman who drank from it
fell together under the table, when a scream of
delight
went up from the company, and scared the
reptiles
on the walls.
The enchantress shuddered as she gazed on the
scene, and the heavy dew stood upon her forehead,
when she turned away sick at heart, for a smile of
delight was gleaming from the face of her
companion
.
This is rare sport, said he in a whisper, his heart
beating violently with emotion; let us join them,
Nameoke!
Wait awhile, responded Nameoke, let us see
more before we do that:Follow me!
They passed the hall of the drinkers, and came
where were sounds of music and dancing. Here
were crowds of both sexes half naked, with their arms
encircling each other, and wheeling round the room
in the delirium of the waltz; their faces wore an
expression of loathing mingled with morbid desire,
and their limbs could hardly support their bloated
bodies. Some of them were emaciated and haggard;
but they all had garlands on their heads, which had
been drenched in alcohol, and they were now faded
and dry. On one side of the cavern, which was like
the other in most respects, but was lighted by lamps
of skulls, was a number of persons, who dealt out
drink to the dancers, which was cold and black, and
seemed to refresh those who drank it, for they lay
down on couches and appeared to fall asleep.
Let us join these people, charming Nameoke!
exclaimed the heated Felton, let us drink and waltz
together;and he would have thrown off his
clothes for the pastime, but she checked him.
Stay a moment, said she, touching his arm;
follow me yet a little further!
They turned now into a hall, the odor of which
was horrible. The faint light which served it, came
only from the phosphorescence of putrifying bodies.
Thousands of coffins were piled up along the walls,
and pyramids of skulls and bones of men were
heaped
up without number. There was a solitary couch
in the room, but it was without an occupant.
Come, said the enchantress, we have seen
enoughlet us departit is time for us to begone.
Not without one hour of love with my Nameoke,
see, our bridal bed is ready! exclaimed the
infatuated
man.
And he seized her in his arms, and would have
thrown her on the couch in the midst of all the
horrors
of the grave.
Enough! screamed the enchantress, and she
smote the solid rock as she spake amidst the wailings
and blasphemies of a million dissolute spirits; and
the same terrific sounds brought her with her
companion
once more where the sea-breeze was moaning
in her cave.
Felton passed his hand across his eyes, as if to
relieve
himself from a sudden attack of giddiness, and
exclaimed
You shall not escape me so easily, fascinating
enchantress; your charms and your sorceries only
inflame
me the more.By the powers of evil, you shall
be mine this moment!
Stay! cried the enchantress, while her eye
gleamed with wildness; for the love of heaven,
stay. Felton! you have seen a picture of heavenly
love and its reward, and a picture of hellish love
and its retribution; Nameoke might have shown
you better and worse. Choose now between them!
The three sisters are ruled by the stars, and the stars
are ruled by the will of man.
Nameoke! exclaimed the mariner, frantic with
passion, attempting to spring towards her.
Forbear! replied the enchantressthe star of
love is even now in mourning, and the pole-star of
the mariner reddens for thy life; fly me ere it be too
late.
I care not for the stars, but for Nameoke only;
then come to my bosom, for I will not endure delay!
The expression of his countenance too well
proclaimed
his purpose, and he was already springing
toward his victim, when her mace smote on his
forehead
like a thunderbolt. He fell like an ox before
the altar; and as his body rolled to the mouth of the
cave, the round red moon came up from out the
water
,
and the prophecy of Nameoke was fulfilled.
CHAPTER X.
Either tropic now
'Gan thunder, and both ends of heaven, the clouds,
From many a horrid rift abortive, poured
Fierce rain with lightning mixed, water and fire
In ruin reconciled.
Paradise Regained
.
A brave vessel,
Who had, no doubt, some noble creatures in her,
Dash'd all to pieces.
Tempest
.
The earth hath bubbles, as the water hath,
And these are of them.
Macbeth
.
The
moon had scarcely been a moment above
the horizon, streaming her loveless light on the cold
and tremulous ocean, when a deep black cloud, that
had been slowly unrolling from the west, threw its
impenetrable drapery between her and the earth.
The wind had been gently breathing from the
south-west
,
its tranquil current disturbed only at intervals
by the fitful gusts that broke in upon its quietude,
like our passionate emotions which interrupt the
repose
of the soul,those spirit-birds of prey that hover
over our purer affections, and veil them awhile with
the shadow of their wings. It now suddenly veered
round to the north-west, and distant thunder rolling
heavily from the same direction, foretokened a
conflict
of the elements. For a few minutes afterward
its very breathing seemed to cease, and a sense of
suffocation was felt, as if for a time the electric fluid
had drawn to its mighty reservoir the principle of
life. Though the moon was up, there was no light,
and the stillness of nature appeared like the silence
of a man before his last agony of dissolution.
Presently a light breeze came puffing from the
north-west, and a few large drops fell heavily to
earth,when all at once a flash of chain lightning
burst forth from the exploding clouds, blinding and
bewildering with its intenseness, accompanied by a
simultaneous crash of thunder that made the heart
sick by its appalling power. The rain now poured
down like the water sheets of a cataract, and the blue
lightning, with incessant fires, flashed fearfully from
the clouds, the wind from the north-west blowing
with increasing violence. It seemed as if the
fountains
of the great deep had again been broken up
as if God's covenant with man had been cancelled
for his crimes.
Notwithstanding the comparatively secure harbor
that the Dolphin occupied, there was considerable
danger to be apprehended from the wind, which the
commander knew could not be relied on should the gale
continue. Accordingly all hands were piped on deck,
additional anchors were let go, and every needful
preparation was made to meet any contingency.
But the thunder-storm, after raging with great
violence
for three hours, gradually died away, and the
wind hauling round to the north-east, the rain
continued
to fall in cold, drizzling showers.
As the day broke, Fitzvassal was no longer
doubtful
about the weather. Though the lower currents
of the atmosphere were setting from the north-east,
the clouds above were flying in other directions, and
thin vapory mists scudding beneath the heavier and
denser, showed that the rain would certainly continue,
and probably be accompanied by extraordinary gales.
He now regretted, that while the wind was
blowing
from the north-west, he had not availed himself
of the advantage and run out to sea; for though he
believed that his anchors would hold the vessel in
any event that might occur, he felt that the open,
unobstructed
ocean, with a wind off shore, was better
than an indifferent harbor in a gale. Possibly,
however
,(was
his consolatory reflection,) the Dolphin could
not have cleared Cape Cod in time, and he knew
Nantucket Shoals too well to prefer their danger to
one of infinitely less magnitude.
Unlike the thunder-storm that heralded it, the
north-easter came on gradually. It is generally so
22
with the most violent tempests. In consequence of
the change of the wind, the waves rolled in upon
the rocks with tremendous energy, which seemed
now, as the day advanced, to increase every instant;
but the wind did not blow with such strength that
any vessel might not safely attempt a harbor along
the coast; and in the early part of the day several
ships and brigs, with some smaller craft, were seen
beating into Salem and Boston harbors, the
anchoring-grounds
of which they reached with little
difficulty
.
Towards evening, as the tide approached its full
flood, which was uncommonly high, the wind began
to rise, and soon raged like a tornado. The roar of
the waters could be heard even across the lower
harbor
of Boston as it thundered on Nantasket Beach;
coming, too, against the wind from a distance of
many miles, and partly drowned by the din that
sounded from the iron-bound coast of Massachusetts.
The sublimity of the scene that now presented
itself cannot be imagined, though it was soon to be
surpassed; for it is not while the storm is raging
that the waves run the highest; but when the
violence
of the tempest has abated, and the winds have
subsided to rest,then it is that the vexed waters
swell and heave with the most fearful fury, and show
their perfect resemblance to the action of human
passion:and how near to spiritual influences is the
analogy of the rains and the waves! For who,
when the ocean is troubled, and the billows toss him
with unrest, has not seen him tranquilized by the
descending
drops from heaven? So when the
agitated
bosom heaves with its lacerated affections, our
heaven-commissioned tears fall fast and soothingly
upon them, and leave us in the peace of the angels.
While the Dolphin was rocking on the waters,
Fitzvassal stood on the quarter-deck with Morgan,
gazing on the surrounding conflict with no little
uneasiness
.
The surf ran so high, that it would have
been madness to attempt forcing a boat in among the
rocks; and, notwithstanding their belief that Felton
had crossed the beach the night before, and was now
prevented from returning to Nahant, both the
commander
and his pilot could not help expressing their
apprehension that all was not well with the first
officer
of the Dolphin.
Morgan, said the commander, addressing the
pilot after they had been standing together some
time in silence, I wish I could only get a glimpse
of Mr. Felton somewhere; for though we could not
take him off at such an ugly time as this, it would
be some satisfaction to know that he is in the land
of the living.
He's safe enough, I guess, replied Morgan, who
seemed to be willing to afford all the encouragement
he could to hope for the best, for the reason that he
himself feared the worst; he's safe enough, I guess,
Sir; he's only larking about Lynn, sailor fashion.
He'll be heaving in sight by and bye, depend on't.
But Mr. Felton has always been punctual to an
hour whenever he has been ashore, and I can
hardly
believe that he would have run the risk of going
over to Lynn. But if he
did
go, why, it will be
difficult for him to get back again at present.
As for that matter, said Morgan, he can
manage
to get back well enough arter he gets through
his lark, if he starts at low tide; howsomever, it
would be a tough job jest now. He's pluck enough
though, and knows what's what; but I wouldn't give
much for all the petticoat he got on Nahant this time.
Morgan! exclaimed the commander, looking at
him steadfastly, you remind me of a horrible dream
I had last night.
What was it? inquired the pilot, with an
expression
of suddenly-awakened interest.
It's of no consequence, replied the other,
turning
away abruptly, as if inclined to obliterate the
remembrance
of it; thank heaven, I don't believe in
dreams.
But
I
do! exclaimed Morgan, for I've had'en
tell as true as a book. Did you ever hear of my
dream of the spectre-ship?Hullo! what's all
this? continued he, changing his tone to one of
more earnest inquiry, as he looked seaward.
The commander turned his eyes in the direction
indicated, and involuntarily started backward.
Bring me the glass, Morgan, instantly! he
demanded
.
Morgan did as he was ordered, when the
commander
,
having rapidly adjusted the instrument,
narrowly
examined the object of their attention. It was
a brig scudding before the wind, and heading
south-west
by west, as if she intended to make a harbor.
She was leaning down to the blast like a half-stripped
oak in a hurricane, and as she ploughed the huge
waves, the foam boiled up above her cutwater like
the surf of the cataract rapids.
By heavens! cried Fitzvassal, after carefully
observing her movements, and throwing out repeated
ejaculations of concern, that brig, Morgan, is in a
dangerous way; only look at her!
Morgan took the glass, and after a few moments'
examination, replied, with an emphasis of the utmost
excitement
You are
right!
you are
right!
the wind has
hauled out to the east, and will have the south with
it presently,she has got a lee-shore, that brig;
God have mercy on her, whoever she is! See there,
Sir! she has made signal for a pilotthe devil
himself
couldn't get aboard of her in such a storm as
this; do, for mercy's sake, look at her!
The violence of the wind had now brought the
vessel near enough to be clearly seen from the deck
of the Dolphin, where all hands had collected on the
forecastle to watch her dangerous progress.
22*
Whoever commands that vessel, said Fitzvassal
in a low and deliberate tone, expressive of the deep
interest he felt in the fate of the stranger,
understands
his business. He was right in bringing his
royal-masts and top-gallant yards on deck.
I never saw any thing to beat that, exclaimed
Morgan, whose eyes almost started from his head
with astonishment, as, leaning over the tafferel of the
vessel, his feet shuffled on the quarter-deck from
his mere inability to be quiet: that fellow
understands
a thing or two!
She is going right before the wind, Morgan!
Ay, ay, Sir; and if the wind would haul another
point to the east, and take a little of the north with
it, that poor devil might yet get into Boston harbor;
but the way she has it now, there is a small chance
for her.
That's right! my good fellow, that's right!
exclaimed
Fitzvassal, who was so highly excited by the
movements of the brig as not to heed what the pilot
was saying; that's right, close reef your main
top-sail
!
As he spoke, the close reefing of the sail was
executed
with a promptness and precision which drew
a loud murmur of approbation from the crowded
forecastle of the Dolphin.
The brig was evidently relieved by this movement,
and was still more so when, a moment after, the
intrepid
sailors sprang to the treadropes of the foresail,
and reefed that also in obedience to the
speaking-trumpet
below them.
Gallantly done, my boys! gallantly done, that!
shouted the commander of the Dolphin, as if the
mariners of the stranger brig were in hearing of his
voice, or were under his own command: now set
the foretopmast stay-sail! cried he, elevating his
voiceaway there, for your lives!
As if in obedience to that voice, the foretopmast
staysail of the brig was immediately set, and the
vessel
,
for a few seconds after, seemed to be feeling the
wind north-east by north.
At this juncture, while the brig was about
three miles distant from Nahant, bearing hardly two
points clear of the Sunken Ledge, the tide being
nearly high, and the wind and current setting in the
same direction, so that the danger was not so
apparent
to them on board, the wind suddenly shifted
several points to the southward, and at once revealed
to them the appalling danger of their vessel.
God have mercy on her now! groaned
Fitzvassal
,
there is nothing but a miracle can save her!
The manuvres of the brig were now most
painfully
interesting to every one that observed them,
and the boldest held his breath for a time. The
unhappy vessel immediately hauled on a wind in
the desperate attempt to work herself out of danger.
Fitzvassal seized the hand of Morgan, lost to every
other consideration in his overwhelming anxiety for
the stranger that was now exposed to the worst
possible
lee-shore, and seemed doomed to inevitable
destruction
.
That's right! bravely done! exclaimed
Fitzvassal
,
set your trysail! Right, again! Now your
double-reefed foretopsail! Well done, my fine
fellows
!
Thunder and Mars! was there ever such a
gale as this!
Hurrah! vociferated the pilot, she feels it now
that seamanship was to some purpose.
The brig was now evidently wearing away from
her dangerous bearings; but though she had a
possible
chance of clearing the Sunken Ledge, she made
too much lee-way to afford any security to her hopes.
She had already approached near enough to Nahant
to discover, by the boiling of the water, that a terrific
reef of rocks lay right in the course she had just
avoided. The commander of that devoted vessel
was unquestionably master of his art, and in the
midst of the horrors that surrounded him, had
displayed
all the skill it was possible to exercise in his
dreadful situation.
Since the trysail had been set, and the
double-reefed
foretopsail, the brig ploughed deeper furrows,
and tossed the foam about her like a wild horse
chased by a lion. The wind raged with such power
that the waves were torn up from their ocean-bed,
and scattered like the driving rain in the blast.
Never
had the spectators of the scene witnessed so
tremendous
a tempest. Fortunately for the Dolphin,
her anchors and cables proved sufficient for the trial,
though she rocked and pitched about most
dangerously
for her safety.
She makes too much lee-way, Morgan! said
the commander of the schooner, she can't clear
these rocks, I'm afraid.
What ought she to de? inquired the pilot;
what would
you
do, Captain, in such a case as this;
for, by the ghost of my great grandmother, I can't
see any get off in such a fix as that!
It would depend somewhat on the quality of my
spars, replied the commander. It is one of those
tough cases that a sailor doesn't like to think of,
much less to experience. Would to God the wind
would shift an atom to the north.
Amen! ejaculated Morgan.
The devoted brig, in the meanwhile, gained
rapidly
on the reef, and the hearts of the mariners,
steeled
as they were to extraordinary danger, quailed
with instinctive horror. They were but a mile from
Nahantrocks, where the surf ran mountain high; and
it was but too apparent that if they could clear the
Sunken Ledge, their chance was still but one in a
thousand of escaping a watery grave; for the brig
must have run down the Dolphin if it escaped the
Ledge. Their chance was in the desperate
movement
that followed.
Look! Morgan, only look! cried Fitzvassal,
stretching both arms in the direction of the brig, and
turning his face round to the pilot; she is going to
make the last, great move;every thing now
depends
on the toughness of her pine and canvass!
Good luck to that Captain, for a fine fellow;
said Morgan, in a tone that indicated his entire
interest
in the stranger.
As they spoke, the close reef was let out from
her main-topsail, which was hoisted up.
Now for it! Now for it! breathed Fitzvassal,
in hardly enunciated tones.
Immediately the brig bowed before the force of
the superadded canvass, burying herself in the foam.
God of mercy! it is
going!
it is
going!
exclaimed
Fitzvassal; it is all over with her now!
God have mercy on her crew!
While he was speaking, the main-topmast bent
like a strained bowthen cracked, and went by the
board,while the main-topsail and the trysail were
torn literally to ribbons, leaving the ill-fated vessel
perfectly unmanageable, and wholly at the mercy of
the storm. To keep her by the wind was now
impossible
;
her head payed off, and she ran before the
tempest in despair.
Amidst the roaring of the waters, the shrill
whistling
of the winds, and the beating of the surge,
came the agonizing shrieks of the passengers and
crew of the doomed vessel, as now, unmindful of
the helm, she rolled and pitched about at times with
her broadside to the gale.
In this moment of abandonment, a gleam of hope
still remained to those on board of her, that the brig
might possibly drive harmless over the Sunken Ledge.
That hope, in its fruition, would have been fatal to
the Dolphin, and perhaps as destructive to herself;
for a cussion of the two would have been almost
unavoidable, and either they would have chafed
themselves to pieces, or the Dolphin would have been
run down and foundered. It was a moment of
intense
agony to them. The hope of the one was the
despair of the other. The sacrifice of all on board
one or both of them seemed inevitable!
Alas! the hope that gleamed for a moment on the
hearts of the devoted crew was soon to be quenched
for ever. The brig once more turned her bow
towards
the Sunken Ledge, and gaining fresh headway
in the hurricane, amidst the heart-rending cries of the
voyagers, drove fast upon the treacherous reef. For
a moment the whole fabric shook like an earthquake,
and as the sea roared over her decks, her remaining
masts and spars were rent away, carrying with them
stays, rattlings and all, in one fell swoop of
destruction
.
The night was now fast closing incoming at a
stride, to throw its mantle over a scene of horror
that defies description. The last trace of despair
exhibited
to the appalled gaze of the spectators, was
the vision of a dozen men and as many women
lashed
to the weather gunwale of the brig, that lay
careened
on the rocks with her lee buried in the ocean.
Her whole deck was exposed to view; but in a few
minutes no knowledge would have been had of their
perilous endurance, except from the frantic screams
of the people on board.
The feelings of Fitzvassal and his crew may haply
be imagined by those who have been similarly placed,
where the agonizing cries of the dying have
appealed
to them in heart-rending entreaties under
circumstances
where relief was impossible.
We will now transfer the reader to the peninsula
of Nahant, where scenes were in the interim
enacted
that may at the present day seem incredible, but
which, about the time we refer to, were known and
authentically reported in every part of the known
world.
We live in the iron age of science, when men run
to and fro, and knowledge abounds. We have seen,
so to speak, the consummation of the sensual church,
when the spirit of selfishness has completed its
insane
philosophy in the reception of exclusive
egotism
or in dreams of pantheistic romance; we have
stripped spiritual truth of all the habiliments by
which she can be known to man; we have torn away
the beautiful vesture of holiness, and suffered her to
grow cold and die in the chill atmosphere of the
world; we have reduced all experience to faith, and
our principles to generalized facts; we cannot see
a truth that is not tangible by induction, we cannot
recognize a good which does not contribute to wealth.
What is art, what is literature, what is religion in
this utilitarian age? There is no art but mechanic
art that meets with encouragement, there is no
literature
called for but what the prurient irritation of a
morbid body desires, there is no religion but the
worship
of the idol
Self
.
Men would at this day deny the principles of the
Scriptures as boldly and as openly as they reject the
testimony of Cotton Mather, Chief Justice Holt, and
half the contemporary judges of Christendom, in
relation to witchcraft, if they dared to do so. And is
it strange, that they who are ashamed to be called or
even to be thought Christians, should strive hard to put
down all belief in those horrible forms of
spirituality
,
which, if we admit them to be true, go so far to
demonstrate the existence of their beautiful
opposites
,
the reality of angelic beingsthe certainty of a
state of living which to the worldly and
self-sufficient
would be any thing but congenial?
Our fathers have been studying psychology ever
since the Mosaic world began, and we, their
descendants
,
know absolutely nothing about it yet. A vast
many tomes of curious speculation have found the
present generation as ignorant as were their
renowned
authors. There was a time when a true
psychology
existed,or rather, when a perception of the
23
soul's nature was permitted to man; and hence we
see a ray of truth struggling here and there in the
writings of Plato and his followers, though nothing
more than a ray is discoverable. A gem of
inestimable
value has been lost by man, and because his
children have been vainly groping for ages in the
wrong path to find it, they have at last concluded
not only that there never was such a lose, but that
the reported existence of the gem itself is only an
historical blunder. Lord Shaftsbury's test of truth
is nothing more than a criterion of human firmness,
precisely as is any other form of persecution. The
ridicule of the encyclopedists
did
prostrate truth in
France, and the persecution of the English
ecclesiastics
did
shake the fortitude of Cranmer. The truth
was not essentially affected because religion became
unfashionable in Paris, and the faith of the English
dissenter was not touched by his temporary
recantation
.
It is time to overhaul and cast away many of
our old saws and most of our modern instances.
Since the sacrifice of Felton, an apparent change
had taken place in the feelings of Nameoke. She
had been disappointed in her efforts to avert evil, and
she bitterly lamented the fate of the unhappy wretch,
whose uncontrolable impulses had hurried him to
his death. Often would she suddenly start from her
fixed posture of thoughtfulness, and, as if to fly from
some predominant reflection, hurry away among the
rough passes of the rocks, and chant her wild songs
to the waves. Then as suddenly would she return
to her cave, and, rekindling the fire, go through her
mystic enchantments.
It was but a moment before the unhappy vessel
struck, that Nameoke, in one of those sudden fits of
transition, hastened toward Pulpit Rock, her favorite
observatory when the sky was clear at night, or when
the moon shone bright upon the waters.
It was already growing dark, but objects were as
yet sufficiently discernible. As she approached the
cliff, she shrunk back with horror at the spectacle
she beheld. The brig had already struck upon the
reef, and her masts were going by the board at the
very moment Nameoke arrived at the bank she would
have to descend before she could reach the rock.
The interval between is scooped out in a craggy
glen, over which the surf was then beating furiously,
so that it would have been impassable to the boldest
adventurer.
In the midst of this hell of waters, on a large
isolated fragment of rock, from which the Sunken
Ledge could casily be discerned through a rift in the
craggy mass, Nameoke saw two hideous women,
whose outward forms were expressive of the evil
which they loved. One of them looked like a
disinterred
body that had died of the plague, her livid
face blotched with the death-spots of the pestilence,
her pale blue eyes turning askant with the glazed
and suspicious expression of insanity. Her features
were sharp, her chin prominent, and her under-jaw
moved to and fro while she mumbled diabolical
sentences
.
The other was a short black woman, her
face deeply pock-marked, and her features of the very
worst stamp of African ugliness. She, too, looked as
if she had been dug up from the grave, a specimen
from the catacombs of Egypt.
Between these detestable shapes Nameoke
discovered
the body of a dead man stretched out upon the
rock; they were squatting one on each side of it,
and they were clapping their hands, and swaying
their bodies in the agitation of frantic mirth, while
their skinny fingers stopped only to point at the
devastation
that was going on in the storm.
Ho! ho! screamed the black hag, the charm
works rarely, Sister!
Sith, said the other, we never saw such sport
at the Brocken.
And the crags echoed the ha! ha! of their
spectre-laugh
,
till Nameoke's blood ran cold, familiar as
she had been with scenes of similar horror.
Brave fun for the hells! brave fun for the hells!
chuckled the livid witch, her long gray locksstreaming
to the gale, and her skeleton-looking arms creaking at
every joint as she tossed them about deliriously. Ha!
ha! ha! The thunder-spirits have felt the charm, and
the dragon-tongued lightnings are coming to the
festival
.
We shall have brave corpses to-night!
As she spoke, there was a noise like the roar of
subterranean artillery, and flashes of infernal fire
broke out from the scathed rocks, and streamed from
the sea brighter than the corruscations of the
Greenland
Aurora. By this terrific glare the awful
condition
of the lost brig was plainly visible, for the
light seemed to be concentrated on that alone,
leaving
the whole surrounding back-ground darker than
the depths of midnight. Every form on board the
brig was clearly defined. All order and discipline
among the crew was gone, and several of the sailors
were seen quaffing large draughts in their despair,
which, by the expression of their faces, had
evidently
brought on madness. Some were in the attitude
of prayer, and others were seen stretching their
clenched hands to the clouds, and howling their
imprecations
on providence. Among the passengers, there
were two that appeared to be lovers, for they hung
upon each other's necks with passionate tenderness,
and seemed to be lost to every thing but those last
precious moments of endearment.
Ho! ho! ejaculated the black hagthe
henbane
works, does it? Scorch brains! come
madness
!
drown all! Your resurrection-germs shall
wander
on the cold oceanthey shall not have a
church-yard
to grow merry in. Fall to pieces! split
asunder
!
stifle in the brine! stifle in the brine! I did it
all! 'twas
my
workI boiled the henbane for them!
Ha! ha! ha! hysterically laughed the pale
monster, and if you did, I'll finish the deed with a
vengeance; and then we'll away to the Brocken.
Sha'n't we have a rare tale for the Hartz to-night?
Sha'n't we kiss the goat merrily, Sister?
As she spoke, big drops of laughter-brine rolled
from her evil eyes, and her frame shook with maniac
mirthfulness.
Now for it, Sister!
With these words she tore a handful of hair from
the scalp of the dead man beneath her, and tossing
it to the winds, exclaimed,
Finish! finish! finish! Prince of the Air,
thy
promise!
At this moment the wind seemed to double its
violence
,
and a wave, enormously large, came towering
on from the sea. In an instant the brig was
overwhelmed
,
and as the wave rolled back, not a vestige
remained of the ruin.
Monsters! screamed Nameoke, whose horror
had till now made her speechless, Monsters and
not women! are ye at last satisfied with the blood of
the innocent?
They turned upon her their hideous visages while
she spoke, as if they had all along known that she
was their witness, and pointing to the corpse between
them, laughed loud and scornfully at Nameoke.
The thunder-peals now followed the fierce
lightning
with astounding power, and the hurricane was
at the height of its violence. As Nameoke stood in
its fury, petrified by the hellish spectacle before her,
a wave larger then the rest bounded over the
intervening
surge, bearing on its crested head the lovers
who had been seen on board the devoted brig, still
alive, and holding each other with the energy of
despair
.
They were both in the bloom and beauty of
youth; their hopes, their wishes, their happiness,
alas! lost, lost to earth for ever! The receding wave
had left them in the space between the hag-demons
and Nameoke, and their inflamed eyes fell suddenly
upon them.
Save them! for the love of the great God, save
them, save them! cried Nameoke; and she sprang
with superhuman alacrity to minister to their
sufferings
,
and, if possible, to shield them from the grave.
The attempt was in vain. The power of evil was
for a time apparently triumphant. With a scream
of frenzy the two hags seized the lovers, and with
inconceivable
strength threw them headlong into the sea.
Nameoke swooned away at the sight. When she
revived
,
she found herself alone among the rocks. The
day had dawned; the storm had died away to a clam;
but not the slightest trace was ever found of the
shipwrecked vessel, but her anchor on the Sunken
Ledge.
END OF VOL. I.